Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0858.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 6. (1) "Center program" means a program operated by a
district or by an intermediate district for special education
pupils from several districts in programs for pupils with autism
spectrum disorder, pupils with severe cognitive impairment, pupils
with moderate cognitive impairment, pupils with severe multiple
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


impairments, pupils with hearing impairment, pupils with visual
impairment, and pupils with physical impairment or other health
impairment. Programs for pupils with emotional impairment housed in
buildings that do not serve regular education pupils also qualify.
Unless otherwise approved by the department, a center program
either serves all constituent districts within an intermediate
district or serves several districts with less than 50% of the
pupils residing in the operating district. In addition, special
education center program pupils placed part-time in noncenter
programs to comply with the least restrictive environment
provisions of section 1412 of the individuals with disabilities
education act, 20 USC 1412, may be considered center program pupils
for pupil accounting purposes for the time scheduled in either a
center program or a noncenter program.
(2) "District and high school graduation rate" means the
annual completion and pupil dropout rate that is calculated by the
center pursuant to nationally recognized standards.
(3) "District and high school graduation report" means a
report of the number of pupils, excluding adult education
participants, in the district for the immediately preceding school
year, adjusted for those pupils who have transferred into or out of
the district or high school, who leave high school with a diploma
or other credential of equal status.
(4) "Membership", except as otherwise provided in this
article, means for a district, a public school academy, or an
intermediate district the sum of the product of .90 times the
number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually
enrolled and in regular daily attendance in the district, public
school academy, or intermediate district on the pupil membership
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


count day for the current school year, plus the product of .10
times the final audited count from the supplemental count day of
full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in
regular daily attendance in the district, public school academy, or
intermediate district for the immediately preceding school year. A
district's, public school academy's, or intermediate district's
membership is adjusted as provided under section 25e for pupils who
enroll after the pupil membership count day in a strict discipline
academy operating under sections 1311b to 1311m of the revised
school code, MCL 380.1311b to 380.1311m. All pupil counts used in
this subsection are as determined by the department and calculated
by adding the number of pupils registered for attendance plus
pupils received by transfer and minus pupils lost as defined by
rules promulgated by the superintendent, and as corrected by a
subsequent department audit. The amount of the foundation allowance
for a pupil in membership is determined under section 20. In making
the calculation of membership, all of the following, as applicable,
apply to determining the membership of a district, a public school
academy, or an intermediate district:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, and
pursuant to subsection (6), a pupil is counted in membership in the
pupil's educating district or districts. Except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, an individual pupil must not be
counted for more than a total of 1.0 full-time equated membership.
(b) If a pupil is educated in a district other than the
pupil's district of residence, if the pupil is not being educated
as part of a cooperative education program, if the pupil's district
of residence does not give the educating district its approval to
count the pupil in membership in the educating district, and if the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


pupil is not covered by an exception specified in subsection (6) to
the requirement that the educating district must have the approval
of the pupil's district of residence to count the pupil in
membership, the pupil is not counted in membership in any district.
(c) A special education pupil educated by the intermediate
district is counted in membership in the intermediate district.
(d) A pupil placed by a court or state agency in an on-grounds
program of a juvenile detention facility, a child caring
institution, or a mental health institution, or a pupil funded
under section 53a, is counted in membership in the district or
intermediate district approved by the department to operate the
program.
(e) A pupil enrolled in the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and
Blind is counted in membership in the pupil's intermediate district
of residence.
(f) A pupil enrolled in a career and technical education
program supported by a millage levied over an area larger than a
single district or in an area vocational-technical education
program established under section 690 of the revised school code,
MCL 380.690, is counted in membership only in the pupil's district
of residence.
(g) A pupil enrolled in a public school academy is counted in
membership in the public school academy.
(h) For the purposes of this section and section 6a, for a
cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised
school code, MCL 380.551, that is in compliance with section 553a
of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a, a pupil's participation
in the cyber school's educational program is considered regular
daily attendance, and for a district or public school academy, a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


pupil's participation in a virtual course as that term is defined
in section 21f is considered regular daily attendance. Beginning
July 1, 2021, this subdivision is subject to section 8c. It is the
intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence
apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. For the purposes
of this subdivision, for a pupil enrolled in a cyber school, all of
the following apply with regard to the participation requirement as
described in this subdivision:
(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the pupil
shall participate in each scheduled course on pupil membership
count day or supplemental count day, as applicable. If the pupil is
absent on pupil membership count day or supplemental count day, as
applicable, the pupil must attend and participate in class during
the next 10 consecutive school days if the absence was unexcused,
or during the next 30 calendar days if the absence was excused.
(ii) For a pupil who is not learning sequentially, 1 or more of
the following must be met on pupil membership count day or
supplemental count day, as applicable, for each scheduled course to
satisfy the participation requirement under this subdivision:
(A) The pupil attended a live lesson from the teacher.
(B) The pupil logged into a lesson or lesson activity and the
login can be documented.
(C) The pupil and teacher engaged in a subject-oriented
telephone conversation.
(D) There is documentation of an email dialogue between the
pupil and teacher.
(E) There is documentation of activity or work between the
learning coach and pupil.
(F) An alternate form of attendance as determined and agreed
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


upon by the cyber school and the pupil membership auditor was met.
(iii) For a pupil using sequential learning, the participation
requirement under this subdivision is satisfied if either of the
following occurs:
(A) Except as otherwise provided in this sub-subparagraph, the
pupil and the teacher of record or mentor complete a 2-way
interaction for 1 course during the week on which pupil membership
count day or supplemental count day, as applicable, occurs, and the
3 consecutive weeks following that week. However, if a school break
is scheduled during any of the weeks described in this sub-
subparagraph that is 4 or more days in length or instruction has
been canceled districtwide during any of the weeks described in
this sub-subparagraph for 3 or more school days, the district is
not required to ensure that the pupil and the teacher of record or
mentor completed a 2-way interaction for that week. As used in this
sub-subparagraph:
(I) "2-way interaction" means the communication that occurs
between the teacher of record or mentor and pupil, where 1 party
initiates communication and a response from the other party follows
that communication. Responses as described in this sub-sub-
subparagraph must be to the communication initiated by the teacher
of record or mentor, and not some other action taken. This
interaction may occur through, but is not limited to, means such as
email, telephone, instant messaging, or face-to-face conversation.
A parent- or legal-guardian-facilitated 2-way interaction is
considered a 2-way interaction if the pupil is in any of grades K
to 5 and does not yet possess the skills necessary to participate
in 2-way interactions unassisted. The interactions described in
this sub-sub-subparagraph must relate to a virtual course on the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


pupil's schedule and pertain to course content or progress.
(II) "Mentor" means a professional employee of the district
who monitors the pupil's progress, ensures the pupil has access to
needed technology, is available for assistance, and ensures access
to the teacher of record. A mentor may also be the teacher of
record if the mentor meets the definition of a teacher of record
under this sub-subparagraph and the district is the provider for
the course.
(III) "Teacher of record" means a teacher to whom all of the
following apply:
(1) The teacher is responsible for providing instruction,
determining instructional methods for each pupil, diagnosing
learning needs, assessing pupil learning, prescribing intervention
strategies and modifying lessons, reporting outcomes, and
evaluating the effects of instruction and support strategies. The
teacher of record may coordinate the distribution and assignment of
the responsibilities described in this sub-sub-sub-subparagraph
with other teachers participating in the instructional process for
a course.
(2) The teacher is certified for the grade level or is working
under a valid substitute permit, authorization, or approval issued
by the department.
(3) The teacher has a personnel identification code provided
by the center.
(IV) "Week" means a period that starts on Wednesday and ends
the following Tuesday.
(B) The pupil completes a combination of 1 or more of the
following activities for each scheduled course on pupil membership
count day or supplemental count day, as applicable:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(I) Documented attendance in a virtual course where
synchronous, live instruction occurred with the teacher.
(II) Documented completion of a course assignment.
(III) Documented completion of a course lesson or lesson
activity.
(IV) Documented pupil access to an ongoing lesson, which does
not include a login.
(V) Documented physical attendance on pupil membership count
day or supplemental count day, as applicable, in each scheduled
course, if the pupil will attend at least 50% of the instructional
time for each scheduled course on-site, face-to-face with the
teacher of record. As used in this sub-sub-subparagraph, "teacher
of record" means that term as defined in subparagraph (iii)(A).
(iv) For purposes of subparagraph (iii), each scheduled course
currently being attempted by the pupil, rather than every course on
the pupil's schedule for the entire term, is considered a part of
each scheduled course for the pupil.
(i) For a new district or public school academy beginning its
operation after December 31, 1994, membership for the first 2 full
or partial fiscal years of operation is determined as follows:
(i) If operations begin before the pupil membership count day
for the fiscal year, membership is the average number of full-time
equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular
daily attendance on the pupil membership count day for the current
school year and on the supplemental count day for the current
school year, as determined by the department and calculated by
adding the number of pupils registered for attendance on the pupil
membership count day plus pupils received by transfer and minus
pupils lost as defined by rules promulgated by the superintendent,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


and as corrected by a subsequent department audit, plus the final
audited count from the supplemental count day for the current
school year, and dividing that sum by 2.
(ii) If operations begin after the pupil membership count day
for the fiscal year and not later than the supplemental count day
for the fiscal year, membership is the final audited count of the
number of full-time equated pupils in grades K to 12 actually
enrolled and in regular daily attendance on the supplemental count
day for the current school year.
(j) If a district is the authorizing body for a public school
academy, then, in the first school year in which pupils are counted
in membership on the pupil membership count day in the public
school academy, the determination of the district's membership
excludes from the district's pupil count for the immediately
preceding supplemental count day any pupils who are counted in the
public school academy on that first pupil membership count day who
were also counted in the district on the immediately preceding
supplemental count day.
(k) For an extended school year program approved by the
superintendent, a pupil enrolled, but not scheduled to be in
regular daily attendance, on a pupil membership count day, is
counted in membership.
(l) To be counted in membership, a pupil must meet the minimum
age requirement to be eligible to attend school under section 1147
of the revised school code, MCL 380.1147, and must be less than 20
years of age on September 1 of the school year except as follows:
(i) A special education pupil who is enrolled and receiving
instruction in a special education program or service approved by
the department, who does not have a high school diploma, and who is
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


less than 26 years of age as of September 1 of the current school
year is counted in membership.
(ii) A pupil who is determined by the department to meet all of
the following may be counted in membership:
(A) Is enrolled in a public school academy or an alternative
education high school diploma program, that is primarily focused on
educating pupils with extreme barriers to education, such as being
homeless as that term is defined under 42 USC 11302.
(B) Had dropped out of school.
(C) Is less than 22 years of age as of September 1 of the
current school year.
(iii) If a child does not meet the minimum age requirement to be
eligible to attend school for that school year under section 1147
of the revised school code, MCL 380.1147, but will be 5 years of
age not later than December 1 of that school year, the district may
count the child in membership for that school year if the parent or
legal guardian has notified the district in writing that the parent
or legal guardian intends to enroll the child in kindergarten for
that school year.
(m) An individual who has achieved a high school diploma is
not counted in membership unless the individual is enrolled in a
state-approved early middle college and at least 1 college course
is transcribed for high school credit each membership count during
the individual's fifth year. An individual who has achieved a high
school equivalency certificate is not counted in membership unless
the individual is a student with a disability as that term is
defined in R 340.1702 of the Michigan Administrative Code. An
individual participating in a job training program funded under
former section 107a or a jobs program funded under former section
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


107b, administered by the department of labor and economic
opportunity, or participating in any successor of either of those 2
programs, is not counted in membership.
(n) If a pupil counted in membership in a public school
academy is also educated by a district or intermediate district as
part of a cooperative education program, the pupil is counted in
membership only in the public school academy unless a written
agreement signed by all parties designates the party or parties in
which the pupil is counted in membership, and the instructional
time scheduled for the pupil in the district or intermediate
district is included in the full-time equated membership
determination under subdivision (q) and section 101. However, for
pupils receiving instruction in both a public school academy and in
a district or intermediate district but not as a part of a
cooperative education program, the following apply:
(i) If the public school academy provides instruction for at
least 1/2 of the class hours required under section 101, the public
school academy receives as its prorated share of the full-time
equated membership for each of those pupils an amount equal to 1
times the product of the hours of instruction the public school
academy provides divided by the number of hours required under
section 101 for full-time equivalency, and the remainder of the
full-time membership for each of those pupils is allocated to the
district or intermediate district providing the remainder of the
hours of instruction.
(ii) If the public school academy provides instruction for less
than 1/2 of the class hours required under section 101, the
district or intermediate district providing the remainder of the
hours of instruction receives as its prorated share of the full-
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


time equated membership for each of those pupils an amount equal to
1 times the product of the hours of instruction the district or
intermediate district provides divided by the number of hours
required under section 101 for full-time equivalency, and the
remainder of the full-time membership for each of those pupils is
allocated to the public school academy.
(o) An individual less than 16 years of age as of September 1
of the current school year who is being educated in an alternative
education program is not counted in membership if there are also
adult education participants being educated in the same program or
classroom.
(p) The department shall give a uniform interpretation of
full-time and part-time memberships.
(q) The number of class hours used to calculate full-time
equated memberships must be consistent with section 101. In
determining full-time equated memberships for pupils who are
enrolled in a postsecondary institution or for pupils engaged in an
internship or work experience under section 1279h of the revised
school code, MCL 380.1279h, a pupil is not considered to be less
than a full-time equated pupil solely because of the effect of the
pupil's postsecondary enrollment or engagement in the internship or
work experience, including necessary travel time, on the number of
class hours provided by the district to the pupil.
(r) Full-time equated memberships for pupils in kindergarten
are determined by dividing the number of instructional hours
scheduled and provided per year per kindergarten pupil by the same
number used for determining full-time equated memberships for
pupils in grades 1 to 12. However, to the extent allowable under
federal law, for a district or public school academy that provides
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


evidence satisfactory to the department that it used federal title
I money in the 2 immediately preceding school fiscal years to fund
full-time kindergarten, full-time equated memberships for pupils in
kindergarten are determined by dividing the number of class hours
scheduled and provided per year per kindergarten pupil by a number
equal to 1/2 the number used for determining full-time equated
memberships for pupils in grades 1 to 12. The change in the
counting of full-time equated memberships for pupils in
kindergarten that took effect for 2012-2013 is not a mandate.
(s) For a district or a public school academy that has pupils
enrolled in a grade level that was not offered by the district or
public school academy in the immediately preceding school year, the
number of pupils enrolled in that grade level to be counted in
membership is the average of the number of those pupils enrolled
and in regular daily attendance on the pupil membership count day
and the supplemental count day of the current school year.
Membership is calculated by adding the number of pupils registered
for attendance in that grade level on the pupil membership count
day plus pupils received by transfer and minus pupils lost as
defined by rules promulgated by the superintendent, and as
corrected by subsequent department audit, plus the final audited
count from the supplemental count day for the current school year,
and dividing that sum by 2.
(t) A pupil enrolled in a cooperative education program may be
counted in membership in the pupil's district of residence with the
written approval of all parties to the cooperative agreement.
(u) If, as a result of a disciplinary action, a district
determines through the district's alternative or disciplinary
education program that the best instructional placement for a pupil
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


is in the pupil's home or otherwise apart from the general school
population, if that placement is authorized in writing by the
district superintendent and district alternative or disciplinary
education supervisor, and if the district provides appropriate
instruction as described in this subdivision to the pupil at the
pupil's home or otherwise apart from the general school population,
the district may count the pupil in membership on a pro rata basis,
with the proration based on the number of hours of instruction the
district actually provides to the pupil divided by the number of
hours required under section 101 for full-time equivalency. For the
purposes of this subdivision, a district is considered to be
providing appropriate instruction if all of the following are met:
(i) The district provides at least 2 nonconsecutive hours of
instruction per week to the pupil at the pupil's home or otherwise
apart from the general school population under the supervision of a
certificated teacher.
(ii) The district provides instructional materials, resources,
and supplies that are comparable to those otherwise provided in the
district's alternative education program.
(iii) Course content is comparable to that in the district's
alternative education program.
(iv) Credit earned is awarded to the pupil and placed on the
pupil's transcript.
(v) If a pupil was enrolled in a public school academy on the
pupil membership count day, if the public school academy's contract
with its authorizing body is revoked or the public school academy
otherwise ceases to operate, and if the pupil enrolls in a district
within 45 days after the pupil membership count day, the department
shall adjust the district's pupil count for the pupil membership
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


count day to include the pupil in the count.
(w) For a public school academy that has been in operation for
at least 2 years and that suspended operations for at least 1
semester and is resuming operations, membership is the sum of the
product of .90 times the number of full-time equated pupils in
grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular daily attendance on
the first pupil membership count day or supplemental count day,
whichever is first, occurring after operations resume, plus the
product of .10 times the final audited count from the most recent
pupil membership count day or supplemental count day that occurred
before suspending operations, as determined by the superintendent.
(x) If a district's membership for a particular fiscal year,
as otherwise calculated under this subsection, would be less than
1,550 pupils, the district has 4.5 or fewer pupils per square mile,
as determined by the department, and the district does not receive
funding under section 22d(2), the district's membership is
considered to be the membership figure calculated under this
subdivision. If a district educates and counts in its membership
pupils in grades 9 to 12 who reside in a contiguous district that
does not operate grades 9 to 12 and if 1 or both of the affected
districts request the department to use the determination allowed
under this sentence, the department shall include the square
mileage of both districts in determining the number of pupils per
square mile for each of the districts for the purposes of this
subdivision. If a district has established a community engagement
advisory committee in partnership with the department of treasury,
is required to submit a deficit elimination plan or an enhanced
deficit elimination plan under section 1220 of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1220, and is located in a city with a population
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


between 9,000 and 11,000, as determined by the department, that is
in a county with a population between 150,000 and 160,000, as
determined by the department, the district's membership is
considered to be the The membership figure calculated under this
subdivision. The membership figure calculated under this
subdivision for a district is the greater of the following:
(i) The average of the district's membership for the 3-fiscal-
year period ending with that fiscal year, calculated by adding the
district's actual membership for each of those 3 fiscal years, as
otherwise calculated under this subsection, and dividing the sum of
those 3 membership figures by 3.
(ii) The district's actual membership for that fiscal year as
otherwise calculated under this subsection.
(y) Full-time equated memberships for special education pupils
who are not enrolled in kindergarten but are enrolled in a
classroom program under R 340.1754 of the Michigan Administrative
Code are determined by dividing the number of class hours scheduled
and provided per year by 450. Full-time equated memberships for
special education pupils who are not enrolled in kindergarten but
are receiving early childhood special education services under R
340.1755 or R 340.1862 of the Michigan Administrative Code are
determined by dividing the number of hours of service scheduled and
provided per year per pupil by 180.
(z) A pupil of a district that begins its school year after
Labor Day who is enrolled in an intermediate district program that
begins before Labor Day is not considered to be less than a full-
time pupil solely due to instructional time scheduled but not
attended by the pupil before Labor Day.
(aa) For the first year in which a pupil is counted in
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


membership on the pupil membership count day in a middle college
program, the membership is the average of the full-time equated
membership on the pupil membership count day and on the
supplemental count day for the current school year, as determined
by the department. If a pupil described in this subdivision was
counted in membership by the operating district on the immediately
preceding supplemental count day, the pupil is excluded from the
district's immediately preceding supplemental count for the
purposes of determining the district's membership.
(bb) A district or public school academy that educates a pupil
who attends a United States Olympic Education Center may count the
pupil in membership regardless of whether or not the pupil is a
resident of this state.
(cc) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's
district of residence under section 1148(2) of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1148, is counted in the educating district.
(dd) For a pupil enrolled in a dropout recovery program that
meets the requirements of section 23a, the pupil is must be counted
as 1/12 of a full-time equated membership for each month that the
district operating the program reports that the pupil was enrolled
in the program and was in full attendance or based on the number of
successfully completed courses by the pupil, with each successfully
completed course equivalent to 1/12 of a full-time equated
membership. A district may claim more than 1/12 of a full-time
equated membership within a month for an enrolled pupil who was in
full attendance and successfully completed more than 1 required
course. However, if If the special membership counting provisions
under this subdivision and the operation of the other membership
counting provisions under this subsection result in a pupil being
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


counted as more than 1.0 FTE in a fiscal year, the payment made for
the pupil entire FTE amount, including any amount in excess of 1.0
FTE, must be funded under sections 22a and 22b. must not be based
on A district may generate more than 1.0 FTE for that a pupil , and
any portion of an FTE for that pupil that exceeds 1.0 is instead
paid enrolled in a program under section 25g. 23a. The district
operating the program shall report to the center the number of
pupils who were enrolled in the program and were in full attendance
for a month not later than 30 days after the end of the that month.
A district shall not report a pupil as being in full attendance for
a month unless both of the following are met:
(i) A personalized learning plan is in place on or before the
first school day of the month for the first month the pupil
participates in the program.
(ii) Either of the following is met:
(A) The pupil meets the district's definition under section
23a of satisfactory monthly progress for that month or, if the
pupil does not meet that definition of satisfactory monthly
progress for that month, the pupil did meet that definition of
satisfactory monthly progress in the immediately preceding month
and appropriate interventions, as defined by the district, are
implemented within 10 school days after it is determined that the
pupil does not meet that definition of satisfactory monthly
progress.
(B) For the first 2 months that the pupil participates in the
program, the pupil earns 0.25 credit by the end of the second
month. A pupil described in this sub-subparagraph may be
retroactively reported as being in full attendance for the first
month that the pupil participated in the program.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(ee) A pupil participating in a virtual course under section
21f is counted in membership in the district enrolling the pupil.
(ff) If a public school academy that is not in its first or
second year of operation closes at the end of a school year and
does not reopen for the next school year, the department shall
adjust the membership count of the district or other public school
academy in which a former pupil of the closed public school academy
enrolls and is in regular daily attendance for the next school year
to ensure that the district or other public school academy receives
the same amount of membership aid for the pupil as if the pupil
were counted in the district or other public school academy on the
supplemental count day of the preceding school year.
(gg) If a special education pupil is expelled under section
1311 or 1311a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311 and
380.1311a, and is not in attendance on the pupil membership count
day because of the expulsion, and if the pupil remains enrolled in
the district and resumes regular daily attendance during that
school year, the district's membership is adjusted to count the
pupil in membership as if the pupil had been in attendance on the
pupil membership count day.
(hh) A pupil enrolled in a community district is counted in
membership in the community district.
(ii) A part-time pupil enrolled in a nonpublic school in
grades K to 12 in accordance with section 166b must not be counted
as more than 0.75 of a full-time equated membership.
(jj) A district that borders another state or a public school
academy that operates at least grades 9 to 12 and is located within
20 miles of a border with another state may count in membership a
pupil who is enrolled in a course at a college or university that
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


is located in the bordering state and within 20 miles of the border
with this state if all of the following are met:
(i) The pupil would meet the definition of an eligible student
under the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL
388.511 to 388.524, if the course were an eligible course under
that act.
(ii) The course in which the pupil is enrolled would meet the
definition of an eligible course under the postsecondary enrollment
options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, if the course
were provided by an eligible postsecondary institution under that
act.
(iii) The department determines that the college or university
is an institution that, in the other state, fulfills a function
comparable to a state university or community college, as those
terms are defined in section 3 of the postsecondary enrollment
options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.513, or is an independent
nonprofit degree-granting college or university.
(iv) The district or public school academy pays for a portion
of the pupil's tuition at the college or university in an amount
equal to the eligible charges that the district or public school
academy would pay to an eligible postsecondary institution under
the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511
to 388.524, as if the course were an eligible course under that
act.
(v) The district or public school academy awards high school
credit to a pupil who successfully completes a course as described
in this subdivision.
(kk) A pupil enrolled in a middle college program may be
counted for more than a total of 1.0 full-time equated membership
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


for any of the school years in which the pupil is enrolled in the
middle college program, but the total full-time equated membership
for that pupil for all of the school years in which the pupil is
enrolled in high school must not be greater than 5.00 full-time
equated membership if the pupil is enrolled in more than the
minimum number of instructional days and hours required under
section 101 and the pupil is expected to complete the 5-year
program with both a high school diploma and at least 60
transferable college credits or is expected to earn an associate's
degree in fewer than 5 years. A pupil who graduates with both a
high school diploma and at least 60 transferable college credits or
an associate degree at least 1 semester early is considered to have
completed the middle college program in fewer than 5 years.
(ll) If a district's or public school academy's membership for
a particular fiscal year, as otherwise calculated under this
subsection, includes pupils counted in membership who are enrolled
under section 166b, all of the following apply for the purposes of
this subdivision:
(i) If the district's or public school academy's membership for
pupils counted under section 166b equals or exceeds 5% of the
district's or public school academy's membership for pupils not
counted in membership under section 166b in the immediately
preceding fiscal year, then the growth in the district's or public
school academy's membership for pupils counted under section 166b
must not exceed 10%.
(ii) If the district's or public school academy's membership
for pupils counted under section 166b is less than 5% of the
district's or public school academy's membership for pupils not
counted in membership under section 166b in the immediately
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


preceding fiscal year, then the district's or public school
academy's membership for pupils counted under section 166b must not
exceed the greater of the following:
(A) Five percent of the district's or public school academy's
membership for pupils not counted in membership under section 166b.
(B) Ten percent more than the district's or public school
academy's membership for pupils counted under section 166b in the
immediately preceding fiscal year.
(iii) If 1 or more districts consolidate or are parties to an
annexation, then the calculations under subparagraphs (i) and (ii)
must be applied to the combined total membership for pupils counted
in those districts for the fiscal year immediately preceding the
consolidation or annexation.
(5) "Public school academy" means that term as defined in
section 5 of the revised school code, MCL 380.5.
(6) "Pupil" means an individual in membership in a public
school. A district must have the approval of the pupil's district
of residence to count the pupil in membership, except approval by
the pupil's district of residence is not required for any of the
following:
(a) A nonpublic part-time pupil enrolled in grades K to 12 in
accordance with section 166b.
(b) A pupil receiving 1/2 or less of the pupil's instruction
in a district other than the pupil's district of residence.
(c) A pupil enrolled in a public school academy.
(d) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's
district of residence if the pupil is enrolled in accordance with
section 105 or 105c.
(e) A pupil who has made an official written complaint or
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


whose parent or legal guardian has made an official written
complaint to law enforcement officials and to school officials of
the pupil's district of residence that the pupil has been the
victim of a criminal sexual assault or other serious assault, if
the official complaint either indicates that the assault occurred
at school or that the assault was committed by 1 or more other
pupils enrolled in the school the pupil would otherwise attend in
the district of residence or by an employee of the district of
residence. A person who intentionally makes a false report of a
crime to law enforcement officials for the purposes of this
subdivision is subject to section 411a of the Michigan penal code,
1931 PA 328, MCL 750.411a, which provides criminal penalties for
that conduct. As used in this subdivision:
(i) "At school" means in a classroom, elsewhere on school
premises, on a school bus or other school-related vehicle, or at a
school-sponsored activity or event whether or not it is held on
school premises.
(ii) "Serious assault" means an act that constitutes a felony
violation of chapter XI of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328,
MCL 750.81 to 750.90h, 750.90g, or that constitutes an assault and
infliction of serious or aggravated injury under section 81a of the
Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.81a.
(f) A pupil whose district of residence changed after the
pupil membership count day and before the supplemental count day
and who continues to be enrolled on the supplemental count day as a
nonresident in the district in which the pupil was enrolled as a
resident on the pupil membership count day of the same school year.
(g) A pupil enrolled in an alternative education program
operated by a district other than the pupil's district of residence
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


who meets 1 or more of the following:
(i) The pupil has been suspended or expelled from the pupil's
district of residence for any reason, including, but not limited
to, a suspension or expulsion under section 1310, 1311, or 1311a of
the revised school code, MCL 380.1310, 380.1311, and 380.1311a.
(ii) The pupil had previously dropped out of school.
(iii) The pupil is pregnant or is a parent.
(iv) The pupil has been referred to the program by a court.
(h) A pupil enrolled in the Michigan Virtual School, for the
pupil's enrollment in the Michigan Virtual School.
(i) A pupil who is the child of a person who works at the
district or who is the child of a person who worked at the district
as of the time the pupil first enrolled in the district but who no
longer works at the district due to a workforce reduction. As used
in this subdivision, "child" includes an adopted child, stepchild,
or legal ward.
(j) An expelled pupil who has been denied reinstatement by the
expelling district and is reinstated by another school board under
section 1311 or 1311a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311 and
380.1311a.
(k) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's
district of residence in a middle college program if the pupil's
district of residence and the enrolling district are both
constituent districts of the same intermediate district.
(l) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's
district of residence who attends a United States Olympic Education
Center.
(m) A pupil enrolled in a district other than the pupil's
district of residence under section 1148(2) of the revised school
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


code, MCL 380.1148.
(n) A pupil who enrolls in a district other than the pupil's
district of residence as a result of the pupil's school not making
adequate yearly progress under the no child left behind act of
2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public
Law 114-95.
However, if a district educates pupils who reside in another
district and if the primary instructional site for those pupils is
established by the educating district after 2009-2010 and is
located within the boundaries of that other district, the educating
district must have the approval of that other district to count
those pupils in membership.
(7) "Pupil membership count day" of a district or intermediate
district means:
(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), either of
the following:
(i) The first Wednesday in October each school year.
(ii) For a district or building in which school is not in
session on the Wednesday described in subparagraph (i) due to
conditions not within the control of school authorities, with the
approval of the superintendent, the immediately following day on
which school is in session in the district or building.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), for a
district or intermediate district maintaining school during the
entire school year, the following days:
(i) Fourth Wednesday in July.
(ii) First Wednesday in October.
(iii) Second Wednesday in February.
(iv) Fourth Wednesday in April.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(c) If a date listed in subdivision (a) or (b) is on a day of
religious or cultural significance, as determined by the district
or intermediate district, the immediately following day on which
school is in session in the district or building.
(8) "Pupils in grades K to 12 actually enrolled and in regular
daily attendance" means, except as otherwise provided in this
section, pupils in grades K to 12 in attendance and receiving
instruction in all classes for which they are enrolled on the pupil
membership count day or the supplemental count day, as applicable.
Except as otherwise provided in this section and subsection, a
pupil who is absent from any of the classes in which the pupil is
enrolled on the pupil membership count day or supplemental count
day and who does not attend each of those classes during the 10
consecutive school days immediately following the pupil membership
count day or supplemental count day, except for a pupil who has
been excused by the district, is not counted as 1.0 full-time
equated membership. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
pupil who is excused from attendance on the pupil membership count
day or supplemental count day and who fails to attend each of the
classes in which the pupil is enrolled within 30 calendar days
after the pupil membership count day or supplemental count day is
not counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, in addition, a pupil who was
enrolled and in attendance in a district, intermediate district, or
public school academy before the pupil membership count day or
supplemental count day of a particular year but was expelled or
suspended on the pupil membership count day or supplemental count
day is only counted as 1.0 full-time equated membership if the
pupil resumed attendance in the district, intermediate district, or
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


public school academy within 45 days after the pupil membership
count day or supplemental count day of that particular year. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, a pupil not counted as 1.0
full-time equated membership due to an absence from a class is
counted as a prorated membership for the classes the pupil
attended. For purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Appropriately placed" means holding a valid Michigan
educator credential with the required grade range and discipline or
subject area for the assignment, as defined by the superintendent
of public instruction.
(b) "Class" means either of the following, as applicable:
(i) A a period of time in 1 day when pupils and an individual
who is appropriately placed under a valid certificate, substitute
permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department, are
together and instruction is taking place. This subdivision does not
apply for the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years.
(ii) For the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years only, a
period of time in 1 day when pupils and a certificated teacher, a
teacher engaged to teach under section 1233b of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1233b, or an individual working under a valid
substitute permit, authorization, or approval issued by the
department are together and instruction is taking place.
(9) "Rule" means a rule promulgated pursuant to the
administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to
24.328.
(10) "The revised school code" means the revised school code,
1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852.
(11) "School district of the first class", "first class school
district", and "district of the first class" mean, for the purposes
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


of this article only, a district that had at least 40,000 pupils in
membership for the immediately preceding fiscal year.
(12) "School fiscal year" means a fiscal year that commences
July 1 and continues through June 30.
(13) "State board" means the state board of education.
(14) "Superintendent", unless the context clearly refers to a
district or intermediate district superintendent, means the
superintendent of public instruction described in section 3 of
article VIII of the state constitution of 1963.
(15) "Supplemental count day" means the day on which the
supplemental pupil count is conducted under section 6a.
(16) "Tuition pupil" means a pupil of school age attending
school in a district other than the pupil's district of residence
for whom tuition may be charged to the district of residence.
Tuition pupil does not include a pupil who is a special education
pupil, a pupil described in subsection (6)(d) to (n), or a pupil
whose parent or guardian voluntarily enrolls the pupil in a
district that is not the pupil's district of residence. A pupil's
district of residence shall not require a high school tuition
pupil, as provided under section 111, to attend another school
district after the pupil has been assigned to a school district.
(17) "State school aid fund" means the state school aid fund
established in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution
of 1963.
(18) "Taxable value" means, except as otherwise provided in
this article, the taxable value of property as determined under
section 27a of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL
211.27a.
(19) "Textbook" means a book, electronic book, or other
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


instructional print or electronic resource that is selected and
approved by the governing board of a district and that contains a
presentation of principles of a subject, or that is a literary work
relevant to the study of a subject required for the use of
classroom pupils, or another type of course material that forms the
basis of classroom instruction.
(20) "Total state aid" or "total state school aid", except as
otherwise provided in this article, means the total combined amount
of all funds due to a district, intermediate district, or other
entity under this article.
(21) "Weighted pupil membership" means that term as calculated
in this subsection. For the purposes of calculations under this
subsection, the base weighted pupil membership for a district is 0.
All of the following apply to the weighted pupil membership under
this subsection:
(a) For each full-time English language learner counted in
membership in a district in the immediately preceding fiscal year,
the weighted pupil membership for that district must be increased
as follows:
(i) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who was
assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the WIDA
ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS
with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between
1.0 and 1.9, as applicable to each assessment, an increase of
0.1990. The increase under this subparagraph must be adjusted
annually as follows until the increase equals 0.75:
(A) For 2027-2028, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2384.
(B) For 2028-2029, the weighted pupil membership under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


subparagraph must be increased to 0.2778.
(C) For 2029-2030, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3171.
(D) For 2030-2031, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3565.
(E) For 2031-2032, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3959.
(F) For 2032-2033, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.4353.
(G) For 2033-2034, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.4746.
(H) For 2034-2035, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.5140.
(I) For 2035-2036, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.5534.
(J) For 2036-2037, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.5928.
(K) For 2037-2038, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.6321.
(L) For 2038-2039, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.6715.
(M) For 2039-2040, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.7109.
(N) Beginning in 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter,
the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be
increased to 0.75.
(ii) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who
was assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the
WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score
between 2.0 and 2.9, as applicable to each assessment, an increase
of 0.1374. The increase under this subparagraph must be adjusted
annually as follows until the increase equals 0.50:
(A) For 2027-2028, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.1636.
(B) For 2028-2029, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.1899.
(C) For 2029-2030, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2161.
(D) For 2030-2031, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2424.
(E) For 2031-2032, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2686.
(F) For 2032-2033, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2949.
(G) For 2033-2034, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3211.
(H) For 2034-2035, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3474.
(I) For 2035-2036, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3736.
(J) For 2036-2037, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3999.
(K) For 2037-2038, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.4261.
(L) For 2038-2039, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.4524.
(M) For 2039-2040, the weighted pupil membership under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


subparagraph must be increased to 0.4786.
(N) Beginning in 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter,
the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be
increased to 0.50.
(iii) For a full-time equivalent English language learner who
was assessed in the immediately preceding fiscal year under the
WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate
ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score
between 3.0 and 4.7, as applicable to each assessment, an increase
of 0.0224. The increase under this subparagraph must be adjusted
annually as follows until the increase equals 0.35:
(A) For 2027-2028, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.0464.
(B) For 2028-2029, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.0703.
(C) For 2029-2030, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.0943.
(D) For 2030-2031, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.1183.
(E) For 2031-2032, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.1423.
(F) For 2032-2033, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.1662.
(G) For 2033-2034, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.1902.
(H) For 2034-2035, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2142.
(I) For 2035-2036, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2382.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(J) For 2036-2037, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2621.
(K) For 2037-2038, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.2861.
(L) For 2038-2039, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3101.
(M) For 2039-2040, the weighted pupil membership under this
subparagraph must be increased to 0.3341.
(N) Beginning in 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter,
the weighted pupil membership under this subparagraph must be
increased to 0.35.
(b) For each economically disadvantaged pupil counted in
membership in a district, the weighted pupil membership for that
district must be increased as follows:
(i) For the purpose of this subparagraph, the department shall
determine the number of pupils in membership who are economically
disadvantaged as the greatest of the following:
(A) The number of membership pupils in the district who are
determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the
center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later
than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of
the immediately preceding fiscal year.
(B) If the district is in the community eligibility program,
the number of pupils determined to be eligible based on the product
of the identified student percentage multiplied by the total number
of pupils in the district, as reported to the center in the form
and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth
Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of the immediately
preceding fiscal year. These calculations must be made at the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


building level. This sub-subparagraph applies only to an eligible
district for the fiscal year immediately following the first fiscal
year in which it is in the community eligibility program. As used
in this sub-subparagraph, "identified student percentage" means the
quotient of the number of pupils in an eligible district who are
determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the
center in a form and manner prescribed by the center not later than
the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day in the
fiscal year preceding the first fiscal year in which the eligible
district is in the community eligibility program, divided by the
total number of pupils counted in an eligible district on the pupil
membership count day in the fiscal year preceding the first fiscal
year in which the eligible district is in the community eligibility
program.
(C) If the district began operations as a district after the
pupil membership count day of the current fiscal year, the number
of membership pupils in the district who are determined to be
economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form
and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth
Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the current fiscal
year.
(D) If, for a particular fiscal year, the number of membership
pupils in a district who are determined under sub-subparagraph (A)
to be economically disadvantaged or to be eligible based on the
identified student percentage varies by more than 20 percentage
points from the number of those pupils in the district as
calculated under sub-subparagraph (A) for the immediately preceding
fiscal year caused by an egregious reporting error by the district,
the department may choose to have the calculations under sub-
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


subparagraph (A) instead be made using the number of membership
pupils in the district who are determined to be economically
disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner
prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after
the supplemental count day of the immediately preceding fiscal
year.
(ii) Each district or public school academy must be assigned an
opportunity index score each fiscal year, the value of which is the
quotient of the number of economically disadvantaged pupils as
determined under this subdivision for the district or public school
academy and the total number of pupils in the district or public
school academy in the immediately preceding fiscal year, multiplied
by 100 and rounded up to the nearest whole number. Each district or
public school academy must be assigned an opportunity index band as
follows:
(A) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or
equal to 0 but less than 20 must be assigned to band 1 and shall
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.1994
and not more than 0.2051 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-
subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity
index score minus 1, multiplied by the band adjustment factor
applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.1994 multiplied by the
number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under
this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership
under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it
reaches between 0.35 and 0.36 per economically disadvantaged pupil:
(I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 1 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2101 and not
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


more than 0.2162 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 1 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2209 and not
more than 0.2272 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 1 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2316
and not more than 0.2383 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 1 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2424 and not
more than 0.2493 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 1 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2531 and not
more than 0.2604 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 1 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2638 and not
more than 0.2714 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 1 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2746
and not more than 0.2825 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 1 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2853
and not more than 0.2935 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 1 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2961 and not
more than 0.3046 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 1 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3068 and not
more than 0.3156 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 1 must receive
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3176 and not
more than 0.3267 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 1 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3283
and not more than 0.3377 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 1 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3391
and not more than 0.3488 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIV) For 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, a
district assigned to band 1 must receive an additional weighted
pupil membership of at least 0.35 and not more than 0.36 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(B) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or
equal to 20 but less than 44 must be assigned to band 2 and shall
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2051
and not more than 0.2136 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-
subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity
index score minus 20, multiplied by the band adjustment factor
applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.2051 multiplied by the
number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under
this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership
under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it
reaches between 0.36 and 0.375 per economically disadvantaged
pupil:
(I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 2 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2162 and not
more than 0.2251 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 2 must receive
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2272 and not
more than 0.2367 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 2 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2383
and not more than 0.2482 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 2 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2493 and not
more than 0.2597 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 2 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2604 and not
more than 0.2712 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 2 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2714 and not
more than 0.2827 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 2 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2825
and not more than 0.2942 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 2 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2935
and not more than 0.3057 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 2 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3046 and not
more than 0.3172 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 2 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3156 and not
more than 0.3288 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 2 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3267 and not
more than 0.3403 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 2 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3377
and not more than 0.3518 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 2 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3488
and not more than 0.3633 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIV) For 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, a
district assigned to band 2 must receive an additional weighted
pupil membership of at least 0.36 and not more than 0.375 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(C) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or
equal to 44 but less than 59 must be assigned to band 3 and shall
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2136
and not more than 0.2223 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-
subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity
index score minus 44, multiplied by the band adjustment factor
applicable to this subdivision, plus 0.2136 multiplied by the
number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under
this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership
under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it
reaches between 0.375 and 0.39 per economically disadvantaged
pupil:
(I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 3 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2251 and not
more than 0.2342 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 3 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2367 and not
more than 0.2462 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 3 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2482
and not more than 0.2582 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 3 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2597 and not
more than 0.2701 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 3 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2712 and not
more than 0.2821 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 3 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2827 and not
more than 0.2941 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 3 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2942
and not more than 0.3061 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 3 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3057
and not more than 0.3180 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 3 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3172 and not
more than 0.3300 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 3 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3288 and not
more than 0.3420 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 3 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3403 and not
more than 0.3540 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 3 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3518
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


and not more than 0.3659 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 3 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3633
and not more than 0.3779 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIV) For 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, a
district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted
pupil membership of at least 0.375 and not more than 0.39 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(D) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or
equal to 59 but less than 73 must be assigned to band 4 and shall
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2223
and not more than 0.2393 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-
subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity
index score minus 59, multiplied by the band adjustment factor
applicable to this sub-subparagraph, plus 0.2223 multiplied by the
number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under
this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership
under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it
reaches between 0.39 and 0.42 per economically disadvantaged pupil:
(I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 4 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2342 and not
more than 0.2521 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 4 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2462 and not
more than 0.2650 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 4 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2582
and not more than 0.2779 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 4 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2701 and not
more than 0.2908 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 4 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2821 and not
more than 0.3037 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 4 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2941 and not
more than 0.3166 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 4 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3061
and not more than 0.3295 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 4 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3180
and not more than 0.3424 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 4 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3300 and not
more than 0.3553 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 4 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3420 and not
more than 0.3682 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 4 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3540 and not
more than 0.3811 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 4 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3659
and not more than 0.3940 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 4 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3779
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


and not more than 0.4069 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIV) For 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, a
district assigned to band 3 must receive an additional weighted
pupil membership of at least 0.39 and not more than 0.42 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(E) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or
equal to 73 but less than 85 must be assigned to band 5 and shall
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2393
and not more than 0.2679 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
The additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-
subparagraph must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity
index score minus 73, multiplied by the band adjustment factor
applicable to this sub-subparagraph, plus 0.2393 multiplied by the
number of pupils identified as economically disadvantaged under
this sub-subparagraph. The additional weighted pupil membership
under this sub-subparagraph must be increased as follows until it
reaches between 0.42 and 0.47 per economically disadvantaged pupil:
(I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 5 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2521 and not
more than 0.2823 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 5 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2650 and not
more than 0.2967 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 5 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2779
and not more than 0.3112 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 5 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.2908 and not
more than 0.3256 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 5 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3037 and not
more than 0.3400 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 5 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3166 and not
more than 0.3544 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 5 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3295
and not more than 0.3689 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 5 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3424
and not more than 0.3833 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 5 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3553 and not
more than 0.3977 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 5 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3682 and not
more than 0.4122 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 5 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3811 and not
more than 0.4266 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 5 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.3940
and not more than 0.4410 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 5 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of at least 0.4069
and not more than 0.4555 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIV) For 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, a
district assigned to band 5 must receive an additional weighted
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


pupil membership of at least 0.42 and not more than 0.47 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(F) A district with an opportunity index score greater than or
equal to 85 must be assigned to band 6 and shall receive an
additional weighted pupil membership at a rate of 0.2679 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil. It is intended that the
additional weighted pupil membership under this sub-subparagraph
will be increased as follows until it reaches 0.47 per economically
disadvantaged pupil:
(I) For 2027-2028, a district assigned to band 6 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.2823 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(II) For 2028-2029, a district assigned to band 6 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.2967 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(III) For 2029-2030, a district assigned to band 6 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3112 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IV) For 2030-2031, a district assigned to band 6 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3256 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(V) For 2031-2032, a district assigned to band 6 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3400 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VI) For 2032-2033, a district assigned to band 6 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3544 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VII) For 2033-2034, a district assigned to band 6 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3689 for each
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


economically disadvantaged pupil.
(VIII) For 2034-2035, a district assigned to band 6 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3833 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(IX) For 2035-2036, a district assigned to band 6 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.3977 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(X) For 2036-2037, a district assigned to band 6 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.4122 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XI) For 2037-2038, a district assigned to band 6 must receive
an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.4266 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XII) For 2038-2039, a district assigned to band 6 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.4410 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIII) For 2039-2040, a district assigned to band 6 must
receive an additional weighted pupil membership of 0.4555 for each
economically disadvantaged pupil.
(XIV) For 2040-2041 and every fiscal year thereafter, a
district assigned to band 6 must receive an additional weighted
pupil membership of 0.47 for each economically disadvantaged pupil.
(G) As used in this subparagraph, "band adjustment factor"
means an amount equal to the difference between the lowest and
highest reimbursement bounds for each band, divided by the number
of possible opportunity index scores in that band.
(c) To assist the legislature in determining necessary funding
levels to support foundation allowance payments for weighted pupil
membership calculated in this subsection, each revenue estimating
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


conference conducted under section 367b of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b, must include estimated pupil
counts necessary to determine a weighted pupil membership under
this subsection for the current and subsequent 2 fiscal years.
(d) As used in this subsection:
(i) "Economically disadvantaged" means a pupil who has been
determined eligible for free or reduced-price meals as determined
under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751
to 1769j; who is in a household receiving supplemental nutrition
assistance program or temporary assistance for needy families
assistance; or who is homeless, migrant, or in foster care, as
reported to the center.
(ii) "English language learner" means limited English
proficient pupils who speak a language other than English as their
primary language and have difficulty speaking, reading, writing, or
understanding English as reported to the center.
Sec. 11. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025,
there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and
certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of
$17,936,546,300.00 from the state school aid fund, the sum of
$78,830,600.00 from the general fund, an amount not to exceed
$41,000,000.00 from the community district education trust fund
created under section 12 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA
489, MCL 12.262, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 from the
school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not
to exceed $71,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund
created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00
from the school meals reserve fund created under section 30e, an
amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 from the great start readiness
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


program reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to
exceed $481,400,000.00 from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform
reserve fund created under section 147b, and an amount not to
exceed $30,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider
fund created in section 27d. For the fiscal year ending September
30, 2026, there is appropriated for the public schools of this
state and certain other state purposes relating to education the
sum of $18,366,334,700.00 $18,189,425,300.00 from the state school
aid fund, the sum of $73,151,100.00 from the general fund, an
amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 from the school consolidation
and infrastructure fund created under section 11x, an amount not to
exceed $125,000,000.00 from the school transportation fund created
under section 22k, an amount not to exceed $71,000,000.00 from the
enrollment stabilization fund created under section 29, an amount
not to exceed $18,000,000.00 from the great start readiness program
reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to exceed
$30,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund
created under section 27d, an amount not to exceed $97,037,400.00
from the state school aid pupil support reserve fund created under
section 22r, and an amount not to exceed $600,000.00 from the
general pupil support reserve fund created under section 22s. For
the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, there is appropriated
for the public schools of this state and certain other state
purposes relating to education the sum of $19,143,728,500.00 from
the state school aid fund, the sum of $50,834,900.00 from the
general fund, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 from the
school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not
to exceed $130,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund
created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


from the great start readiness program reserve fund created under
section 32e, an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 from the
educator fellowship public provider fund created under section 27d,
an amount not to exceed $108,037,400.00 from the state school aid
pupil support reserve fund created under section 22r, and an amount
not to exceed $720,000.00 from the general pupil support reserve
fund created under section 22s. In addition, all available federal
funds are only appropriated as allocated in this article for the
fiscal years ending September 30, 2025 and September 30, 2026 and
September 30, 2027.
(2) The appropriations under this section are allocated as
provided in this article. Money appropriated under this section
from the general fund must be expended to fund the purposes of this
article before the expenditure of money appropriated under this
section from the state school aid fund.
(3) Any general fund allocations under this article that are
not expended by the end of the fiscal year are transferred to the
school aid stabilization fund created under section 11a.
Sec. 11a. (1) The school aid stabilization fund is created as
a separate account within the state school aid fund.
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the school aid stabilization fund. The
state treasurer shall deposit into the school aid stabilization
fund all of the following:
(a) Unexpended and unencumbered state school aid fund revenue
for a fiscal year that remains in the state school aid fund as of
the bookclosing for that fiscal year.
(b) Money statutorily dedicated to the school aid
stabilization fund.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(c) Money appropriated to the school aid stabilization fund.
(3) Money available in the school aid stabilization fund may
not be expended without a specific appropriation from the school
aid stabilization fund. Money in the school aid stabilization fund
must be expended only for purposes for which state school aid fund
money may be expended.
(4) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the
school aid stabilization fund. The state treasurer shall credit to
the school aid stabilization fund interest and earnings from fund
investments.
(5) Money in the school aid stabilization fund at the close of
a fiscal year remains in the school aid stabilization fund and does
not lapse to the unreserved school aid fund balance or the general
fund.
(6) If the maximum amount appropriated under section 11 from
the state school aid fund for a fiscal year exceeds the amount
available for expenditure from the state school aid fund for that
fiscal year, there is appropriated from the school aid
stabilization fund to the state school aid fund an amount equal to
the projected shortfall as determined by the department of
treasury, but not to exceed available money in the school aid
stabilization fund. If the money in the school aid stabilization
fund is insufficient to fully fund an amount equal to the projected
shortfall, the state budget director shall notify the legislature
as required under section 296(2) and state payments in an amount
equal to the remainder of the projected shortfall must be prorated
in the manner provided under section 296(3).
(7) For 2025-2026 2026-2027, in addition to the appropriations
in section 11, there is appropriated from the school aid
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


stabilization fund to the state school aid fund the amount
necessary to fully fund the allocations under this article.
Sec. 11j. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$23,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for payments to the school
loan bond redemption fund in the department of treasury on behalf
of districts and intermediate districts. Notwithstanding section
296 or any other provision of this act, funds allocated under this
section are not subject to proration and must be paid in full.
Sec. 11k. For 2025-2026, 2026-2027, there is appropriated from
the general fund to the school loan revolving fund an amount equal
to the amount of school bond loans assigned to the Michigan finance
authority, not to exceed the total amount of school bond loans held
in reserve as long-term assets. As used in this section, "school
loan revolving fund" means that fund created in section 16c of the
shared credit rating act, 1985 PA 227, MCL 141.1066c.
Sec. 11m. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount
not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for fiscal year cash-flow borrowing
costs solely related to the state school aid fund established under
section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963.
Sec. 11s. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $5,000,000.00 for
2025-2026 2026-2027 only and from the general fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $3,000,000.00 for
2025-2026 2026-2027 only for the purpose of providing services and
programs to children who reside within the boundaries of a district
with the majority of its territory located within the boundaries of
a city for which an executive proclamation of emergency concerning
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


drinking water is issued in the current or immediately preceding 10
fiscal years under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL
30.401 to 30.421, and that has at least 4,500 pupils in membership
for the 2016-2017 fiscal year or has at least 2,600 pupils in
membership for a fiscal year after 2016-2017.
(2) From the general fund money allocated in subsection (1),
there is allocated to a district with the majority of its territory
located within the boundaries of a city for which an executive
proclamation of emergency concerning drinking water is issued in
the current or immediately preceding 10 fiscal years under the
emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421, and
that has at least 4,500 pupils in membership for the 2016-2017
fiscal year or has at least 2,600 pupils in membership for a fiscal
year after 2016-2017, an amount not to exceed $2,425,000.00 for
2025-2026 2026-2027 for the purpose of employing school nurses,
classroom aides, school social workers, and community health
workers; for the provision of behavioral or mental health supports,
parental engagement activities, community coordination activities,
and other support services; and for purchasing program supplies.
The district shall provide a report to the department in a form,
manner, and frequency prescribed by the department. The department
shall provide a copy of that report to the governor, the house and
senate school aid subcommittees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget director within 5 days after
receipt. The report must provide at least the following
information:
(a) How many personnel were hired using the funds allocated
under this subsection.
(b) A description of the services provided to pupils by those
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


personnel.
(c) How many pupils received each type of service identified
in subdivision (b).
(d) Any other information the department considers necessary
to ensure that the children described in subsection (1) received
appropriate levels and types of services.
(3) For 2025-2026 2026-2027 only, from the general fund money
allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $575,000.00 for nutritional services to children described
in subsection (1).
(4) For 2025-2026 2026-2027 only, from the state school aid
fund money allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an
amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 to an intermediate district that
has a constituent district described in subsection (2) for
interventions and supports for students in grades K to 12 who were
impacted by an executive proclamation of emergency described in
subsection (1) concerning drinking water. Funds under this
subsection must be used for behavioral supports, social workers,
counselors, psychologists, nursing services, including, but not
limited to, vision and hearing services, transportation services,
parental engagement, community coordination, and other support
services.
(5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 12d. (1) From the school consolidation and infrastructure
fund created under section 11x, there is allocated for 2023-2024
only an amount not to exceed $110,000,000.00 for the purposes of
this section.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(2) From the amount allocated in subsection (1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $75,000,000.00 for grants to
districts and intermediate districts to support costs related to
internal consolidation within the district or intermediate
district. All of the following apply to grants under this
subsection:
(a) The department shall allow grants for applicants that have
already taken actions for internal consolidation within the
previous 2 years and grants for applicants that have not yet begun
internal consolidation activities.
(b) The department shall prioritize applications from
districts and intermediate districts that meet any of the following
criteria:
(i) Are in an opportunity index band, as described in section
31a, determined under section 6(21), of 3 or higher.
(ii) Are an intermediate district for which the percentage of
pupils in membership who were determined to be economically
disadvantaged in the immediately preceding fiscal year is equal to
or greater than the minimum percentage for a district or public
school academy to be in an opportunity index band, as described in
section 31a, determined under section 6(21), of 3 or higher.
(iii) Are experiencing declining enrollment.
(iv) Have no ability to issue bonds for infrastructure needs,
or have made a good-faith effort, as determined by the department,
to issue bonds for infrastructure needs.
(c) Grants may be used for operational expenses related to
internal consolidation and for infrastructure needs. Infrastructure
needs may include, but are not limited to, the removal of
buildings.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(3) From the amount allocated in subsection (1),
$35,000,000.00 is allocated as follows:
(a) $15,000,000.00 to Detroit Public Schools Community
District to support the construction of the Cooley High School
athletic complex.
(b) $10,000,000.00 to Wayne RESA to support the construction
of an academic and professional building in the city of Wayne.
(c) $5,000,000.00 to Beecher Community School District to
support the construction of a high school in the district.
(d) $4,000,000.00 to Taylor School District for costs related
to a new high school in the district.
(e) $1,000,000.00 to the School District of the City of
Hamtramck to support the costs of building infrastructure upgrades
and maintenance.
(4) Subject to the provisions of this subsection, in addition
to the money appropriated in section 11, from the state school aid
fund, there is appropriated and allocated for 2025-2026 an amount
not to exceed $4,000,000.00 to Taylor School District for costs
related to a new high school in the district or for other
infrastructure purposes. The appropriation and allocation under
this subsection is contingent on the effective issuance of a
directive by the budget director, pursuant to section 451a of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.451a, 18.1451a, to
lapse $4,000,000.00 of remaining funding from a work project that
was established under this section in 2023-2024. The amount
allocated under this subsection may not exceed the amount lapsed
from the work project referenced in the immediately preceding
sentence.
(5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 12e. (1) From the school consolidation and infrastructure
fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-
2026 only an amount estimated at $100,000,000.00 for grants to
districts and intermediate districts for infrastructure needs as
described in this section.
(2) Districts and intermediate districts must apply on a
competitive basis for funding in a form and manner determined by
the department.
(3) If the amount allocated under subsection (1) is
insufficient to fully fund awards under this section, there is
appropriated from the school consolidation and infrastructure fund
described in section 11x the amount necessary to fully fund these
awards, or the maximum available in the fund, whichever is less.
The state budget director shall provide notification to the house
and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid and the house
and senate fiscal agencies regarding any additional appropriation
described in this subsection.
(4) The department shall prioritize applications from
districts and intermediate districts that meet any of the following
criteria:
(a) Are in an opportunity index band, as described in section
31a, determined under section 6(21), of 4 or higher.
(b) Are an intermediate district for which the percentage of
pupils in membership who were determined to be economically
disadvantaged in the immediately preceding fiscal year is equal to
or greater than the minimum percentage for a district or public
school academy to be in an opportunity index band, as described in
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


section 31a, determined under section 6(21), of 4 or higher.
(c) Have infrastructure needs related to HVAC systems or
roofing.
(d) Have no ability to issue bonds for infrastructure needs,
or have made a good-faith effort, as determined by the department,
to issue bonds for infrastructure needs.
(5) Funds awarded in subsection (4) may be used only to
address infrastructure needs that were identified in the statewide
school facilities study issued pursuant to the former section 11y.
(6) The funds allocated under this section for 2025-2026 are a
work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026
are carried forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project
is to fund district and intermediate district infrastructure needs.
The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30,
2030.
(7) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 15. (1) If a district or intermediate district fails to
receive its proper apportionment, the department, upon satisfactory
proof that the district or intermediate district was entitled
justly, shall apportion the deficiency in the next apportionment.
Subject to subsections (2) and (3), if a district or intermediate
district has received more than its proper apportionment, the
department, upon satisfactory proof, shall deduct the excess in the
next apportionment. Notwithstanding any other provision in this
article, state aid overpayments to a district, other than
overpayments in payments for special education or special education
transportation, may be recovered from any payment made under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


article other than a special education or special education
transportation payment, from the proceeds of a loan to the district
under the emergency municipal loan act, 1980 PA 243, MCL 141.931 to
141.942, or from the proceeds of millage levied or pledged under
section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. State aid
overpayments made in special education or special education
transportation payments may be recovered from subsequent special
education or special education transportation payments, from the
proceeds of a loan to the district under the emergency municipal
loan act, 1980 PA 243, MCL 141.931 to 141.942, or from the proceeds
of millage levied or pledged under section 1211 of the revised
school code, MCL 380.1211.
(2) If the result of an audit conducted by or for the
department affects the current fiscal year membership, the
department shall adjust affected payments in the current fiscal
year. A deduction due to an adjustment made as a result of an audit
conducted by or for the department, or as a result of information
obtained by the department from the district, an intermediate
district, the department of treasury, or the office of auditor
general, must be deducted from the district's apportionments when
the adjustment is finalized. At the request of the district and
upon the district presenting evidence satisfactory to the
department of the hardship, the department may grant up to an
additional 4 years for the adjustment and may advance payments to
the district otherwise authorized under this article if the
district would otherwise experience a significant hardship in
satisfying its financial obligations. However, a district that
presented satisfactory evidence of hardship and was undergoing an
extended adjustment during 2018-2019 may continue to use the period
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


of extended adjustment as originally granted by the department.
(3) If, based on an audit by the department or the
department's designee or because of new or updated information
received by the department, the department determines that the
amount paid to a district or intermediate district under this
article for the current fiscal year or a prior fiscal year was
incorrect, the department shall make the appropriate deduction or
payment in the district's or intermediate district's allocation in
the next apportionment after the adjustment is finalized. The
department shall calculate the deduction or payment according to
the law in effect in the fiscal year in which the incorrect amount
was paid. If the district does not receive an allocation for the
fiscal year or if the allocation is insufficient to pay the amount
of any deduction, the amount of any deduction otherwise applicable
must be satisfied from the proceeds of a loan to the district under
the emergency municipal loan act, 1980 PA 243, MCL 141.931 to
141.942, or from the proceeds of millage levied or pledged under
section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, as
determined by the department.
(4) If the department makes an adjustment under this section
based in whole or in part on a membership audit finding that a
district or intermediate district employed an educator in violation
of certification requirements under the revised school code and
rules promulgated by the department, the department shall prorate
the adjustment according to the period of noncompliance with the
certification requirements.
(5) The department may conduct audits, or may direct audits by
designee of the department, for the current fiscal year and the
immediately preceding fiscal year of all records related to a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


program for which a district or intermediate district has received
funds under this article.
(6) Expenditures made by departments under this article that
are caused by the write-off of prior year accruals may be funded by
revenue from the write-off of prior year accruals.
(7) In addition to funds appropriated in section 11 for all
programs and services, there is appropriated for 2024-2025 and
2025-2026 and 2026-2027 for obligations in excess of applicable
appropriations an amount equal to the collection of overpayments,
but not to exceed amounts available from overpayments.
Sec. 18. (1) Except as provided in another section of this
article, each district or other entity shall apply the money
received by the district or entity under this article to salaries
and other compensation of teachers and other employees, tuition,
transportation, lighting, heating, ventilation, water service, the
purchase of textbooks, other supplies, and any other school
operating expenditures defined in section 7. However, not more than
20% of the total amount received by a district under sections 22a
and 22b or received by an intermediate district under section 81
may be transferred by the board to either the capital projects fund
or to the debt retirement fund for debt service. A district or
other entity shall not apply or take the money for a purpose other
than as provided in this section. The department shall determine
the reasonableness of expenditures and may withhold from a
recipient of funds under this article the apportionment otherwise
due upon a violation by the recipient. A district must not be
prohibited or limited from using funds appropriated or allocated
under this article that are permitted for use for noninstructional
services to contract or subcontract with an intermediate district,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


third party, or vendor for the noninstructional services.
(2) A Subject to subsection (17), a district or intermediate
district shall adopt an annual budget in a manner that complies
with the uniform budgeting and accounting act, 1968 PA 2, MCL
141.421 to 141.440a. Within 15 days after a district board adopts
its annual operating budget for the following school fiscal year,
or after a district board adopts a subsequent revision to that
budget, the district shall make all of the following available
through a link on its website homepage, or may make the information
available through a link on its intermediate district's website
homepage, in a form and manner prescribed by the department:
(a) The annual operating budget and subsequent budget
revisions.
(b) Using data that have already been collected and submitted
to the department, a summary of district expenditures for the most
recent fiscal year for which they are available, expressed in the
following 2 visual displays:
(i) A chart of personnel expenditures, broken into the
following subcategories:
(A) Salaries and wages.
(B) Employee benefit costs, including, but not limited to,
medical, dental, vision, life, disability, and long-term care
benefits.
(C) Retirement benefit costs.
(D) All other personnel costs.
(ii) A chart of all district expenditures, broken into the
following subcategories:
(A) Instruction.
(B) Support services.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(C) Business and administration.
(D) Operations and maintenance.
(c) Links to all of the following:
(i) The current collective bargaining agreement for each
bargaining unit.
(ii) Each health care benefits plan, including, but not limited
to, medical, dental, vision, disability, long-term care, or any
other type of benefits that would constitute health care services,
offered to any bargaining unit or employee in the district.
(iii) The audit report of the financial audit conducted under
subsection (4) for the most recent fiscal year for which it is
available.
(iv) The bids required under section 5 of the public employees
health benefit act, 2007 PA 106, MCL 124.75.
(v) The district's written policy governing procurement of
supplies, materials, and equipment.
(vi) The district's written policy establishing specific
categories of reimbursable expenses, as described in section
1254(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1254.
(vii) Either the district's accounts payable check register for
the most recent school fiscal year or a statement of the total
amount of expenses incurred by board members or employees of the
district that were reimbursed by the district for the most recent
school fiscal year.
(d) The total salary and a description and cost of each fringe
benefit included in the compensation package for the superintendent
of the district and for each employee of the district whose salary
exceeds $100,000.00.
(e) The annual amount spent on dues paid to associations.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(f) The annual amount spent on lobbying or lobbying services.
As used in this subdivision, "lobbying" means that term as defined
in section 5 of 1978 PA 472, MCL 4.415.
(g) Any deficit elimination plan or enhanced deficit
elimination plan the district was required to submit under the
revised school code.
(h) Identification of all credit cards maintained by the
district as district credit cards, the identity of all individuals
authorized to use each of those credit cards, the credit limit on
each credit card, and the dollar limit, if any, for each
individual's authorized use of the credit card.
(i) Costs incurred for each instance of out-of-state travel by
the school administrator of the district that is fully or partially
paid for by the district and the details of each of those instances
of out-of-state travel, including at least identification of each
individual on the trip, destination, and purpose.
(3) For the information required under subsection (2)(a),
(2)(b)(i), and (2)(c), an intermediate district shall provide the
same information in the same manner as required for a district
under subsection (2).
(4) For the purposes of determining the reasonableness of
expenditures, whether a district or intermediate district has
received the proper amount of funds under this article, and whether
a violation of this article has occurred, all of the following
apply:
(a) The department shall require that each district and
intermediate district have an audit of the district's or
intermediate district's financial and pupil accounting records
conducted at least annually, and at such other times as determined
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


by the department, at the expense of the district or intermediate
district, as applicable. The audits must be performed by a
certified public accountant or by the intermediate district
superintendent, as may be required by the department, or in the
case of a district of the first class by a certified public
accountant, the intermediate superintendent, or the auditor general
of the city. A district or intermediate district shall retain these
records for the current fiscal year and from at least the 3
immediately preceding fiscal years.
(b) If a district operates in a single building with fewer
than 700 full-time equated pupils, if the district has stable
membership, and if the error rate of the immediately preceding 2
pupil accounting field audits of the district is less than 2%, the
district may have a pupil accounting field audit conducted
biennially but must continue to have desk audits for each pupil
count. The auditor must document compliance with the audit cycle in
the pupil auditing manual. As used in this subdivision, "stable
membership" means that the district's membership for the current
fiscal year varies from the district's membership for the
immediately preceding fiscal year by less than 5%.
(c) A district's or intermediate district's annual financial
audit must include an analysis of the financial and pupil
accounting data used as the basis for distribution of state school
aid.
(d) The pupil and financial accounting records and reports,
audits, and management letters are subject to requirements
established in the auditing and accounting manuals approved and
published by the department.
(e) All of the following must be done not later than November
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


1 each year for reporting the prior fiscal year data:
(i) A district shall file the annual financial audit reports
with the intermediate district and the department. If the issuance
of single audits is delayed for the 2024-25 school year due to a
late issuance of a Compliance Supplement, the single audit portion
of that audit must be filed within 30 days of the issuance of the
Compliance Supplement by OMB.
(ii) The intermediate district shall file the annual financial
audit reports for the intermediate district with the department. If
the issuance of single audits is delayed for the 2024-25 school
year due to a late issuance of a Compliance Supplement, the single
audit portion of that audit must be filed within 30 days of the
issuance of the Compliance Supplement by OMB.
(iii) The intermediate district shall enter the pupil membership
audit reports, known as the audit narrative, for its constituent
districts and for the intermediate district, for the pupil
membership count day and supplemental count day, in the Michigan
student data system.
(f) The annual financial audit reports and pupil accounting
procedures reports must be available to the public in compliance
with the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to
15.246.
(g) Not later than January 31 of each year, the department
shall notify the state budget director and the legislative
appropriations subcommittees responsible for review of the school
aid budget of districts and intermediate districts that have not
filed an annual financial audit and pupil accounting procedures
report required under this section for the school year ending in
the immediately preceding fiscal year.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(5) By the first business day in November of each fiscal year,
each district and intermediate district shall submit to the center,
in a manner prescribed by the center, annual comprehensive
financial data consistent with the district's or intermediate
district's audited financial statements and consistent with
accounting manuals and charts of accounts approved and published by
the department. For an intermediate district, the report must also
contain the website address where the department can access the
report required under section 620 of the revised school code, MCL
380.620. The department shall ensure that the prescribed Michigan
public school accounting manual chart of accounts includes standard
conventions to distinguish expenditures by allowable fund function
and object. The functions must include at minimum categories for
instruction, pupil support, instructional staff support, general
administration, school administration, business administration,
transportation, facilities operation and maintenance, facilities
acquisition, and debt service; and must include object
classifications of salary, benefits, including categories for
active employee health expenditures, purchased services, supplies,
capital outlay, and other. A district shall report the required
level of detail consistent with the manual as part of the
comprehensive annual financial report.
(6) By the last business day in September of each year, each
district and intermediate district shall file with the center the
special education actual cost report, known as "SE-4096", on a form
and in the manner prescribed by the center. An intermediate
district shall certify the audit of a district's report.
(7) By not later than 1 week after the last business day in
September of each year, each district and intermediate district
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


shall file with the center the audited transportation expenditure
report, known as "SE-4094", on a form and in the manner prescribed
by the center. An intermediate district shall certify the audit of
a district's report.
(8) The department shall review its pupil accounting and pupil
auditing manuals at least annually and shall periodically update
those manuals to reflect changes in this article. Any changes to
the pupil accounting manual that are applicable for the school year
that begins after March 31 of a fiscal year must be published by
not later than March 31 of that fiscal year. However, if
legislation is enacted that necessitates adjustments to the pupil
accounting manual after March 31 of a fiscal year, and a district
incurs a violation of the amended pupil accounting manual in the
subsequent fiscal year, the department must notify the district of
that violation and allow the district 30 days to correct the
violation before the department is allowed to impose financial
penalties under this act related to the violation.
(9) If a district that is a public school academy purchases
property using money received under this article, the public school
academy shall retain ownership of the property unless the public
school academy sells the property at fair market value.
(10) If a district or intermediate district does not comply
with subsections (4), (5), (6), (7), and (12), or if the department
determines that the financial data required under subsection (5)
are not consistent with audited financial statements, the
department shall withhold all state school aid due to the district
or intermediate district under this article, beginning with the
next payment due to the district or intermediate district, until
the district or intermediate district complies with subsections
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(4), (5), (6), (7), and (12). If the district or intermediate
district does not comply with subsections (4), (5), (6), (7), and
(12) by the end of the fiscal year, the district or intermediate
district forfeits the amount withheld.
(11) If Subject to subsection (17), if a district or
intermediate district does not comply with subsection (2), the
department may withhold up to 10% of the total state school aid due
to the district or intermediate district under this article,
beginning with the next payment due to the district or intermediate
district, until the district or intermediate district complies with
subsection (2). If the district or intermediate district does not
comply with subsection (2) by the end of the fiscal year, the
district or intermediate district forfeits the amount withheld.
(12) By November 1 of each year, if a district or intermediate
district offers virtual learning under section 21f, or for a school
of excellence that is a cyber school, as defined in section 551 of
the revised school code, MCL 380.551, the district or intermediate
district shall submit to the department a report that details the
per-pupil costs of operating the virtual learning by vendor type
and virtual learning model. The report must include information
concerning the operation of virtual learning for the immediately
preceding school fiscal year, including information concerning
summer programming. Information must be collected in a form and
manner determined by the department and must be collected in the
most efficient manner possible to reduce the administrative burden
on reporting entities.
(13) By March 31 of each year, the department shall submit to
the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on state school
aid, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


agencies a report summarizing the per-pupil costs by vendor type of
virtual courses available under section 21f and virtual courses
provided by a school of excellence that is a cyber school, as
defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551.
(14) As used in subsections (12) and (13), "vendor type" means
the following:
(a) Virtual courses provided by the Michigan Virtual
University.
(b) Virtual courses provided by a school of excellence that is
a cyber school, as defined in section 551 of the revised school
code, MCL 380.551.
(c) Virtual courses provided by third party vendors not
affiliated with a public school in this state.
(d) Virtual courses created and offered by a district or
intermediate district.
(15) An allocation to a district or another entity under this
article is contingent upon the district's or entity's compliance
with this section.
(16) The department shall annually submit to the senate and
house subcommittees on school aid and to the senate and house
standing committees on education an itemized list of allocations
under this article to any association or consortium consisting of
associations in the immediately preceding fiscal year. The report
must detail the recipient or recipients, the amount allocated, and
the purpose for which the funds were distributed.
(17) If the legislature has not enacted and the governor has
not approved the general appropriations act for state school aid
for the fiscal year beginning July 1 of that year before July 1,
the department shall not withhold funds or impose any penalty under
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


subsection (11) against a district or intermediate district for
failure to comply with subsection (2) until 30 days after the
enactment of the general appropriations act for state school aid
for that fiscal year.
Sec. 18a. (1) This subsection applies only to grant funds
awarded and allotted from appropriations in this article that have
not been designated as a work project appropriation under section
451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 1451a.
Except as otherwise provided in this article, grant funds described
in this subsection that are awarded and allotted to a district,
intermediate district, or other entity, unless otherwise specified
in this article, must be expended by the grant recipient before the
end of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in
which the funds are received. Except as otherwise provided in this
article, if a grant recipient does not expend the funds received
under this article before the end of the fiscal year in which the
funds are received, the grant recipient shall submit a report to
the department not later than November 1 after the fiscal year in
which the funds are received indicating whether it expects to
expend those funds during the fiscal year in which the report is
submitted. Except as otherwise provided in this article, a
recipient of a grant shall return any unexpended grant funds to the
department in the manner prescribed by the department not later
than September 30 after the fiscal year in which the funds are
received.
(2) This subsection applies only to grant funds awarded and
allotted from appropriations in this article that have been
designated as a work project appropriation under section 451a of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. Except as
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


otherwise provided in this article, grant funds described in this
subsection that are awarded and allotted to a district,
intermediate district, or other entity, unless otherwise specified
in this article, must be expended by the grant recipient before the
end of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in
which the work project is closed pursuant to section 451a of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. Except as
otherwise provided in this article, a recipient of a grant shall
return any unexpended grant funds to the department in the manner
prescribed by the department not later than September 30 after the
fiscal year in which the work project is closed.
Sec. 19. (1) A district or intermediate district shall comply
with all applicable reporting requirements specified in state and
federal law. Data provided to the center, in a form and manner
prescribed by the center, must be aggregated and disaggregated as
required by state and federal law. In addition, a district or
intermediate district shall cooperate with all measures taken by
the center to establish and maintain a statewide P-20 longitudinal
data system.
(2) Each district shall furnish to the center not later than 5
weeks after the pupil membership count day and by the last business
day in June of the school fiscal year ending in the fiscal year, in
a manner prescribed by the center, the information necessary for
the preparation of the district and high school graduation report,
information regarding completion of early middle college
credentials obtained and postsecondary credits obtained in any
college acceleration program, and information necessary for the
preparation of the state and federal accountability reports. This
information must meet requirements established in the pupil
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


auditing manual approved and published by the department. The
center shall calculate an annual graduation and pupil dropout rate
for each high school, each district, and this state, in compliance
with nationally recognized standards for these calculations. The
center shall report all graduation and dropout rates to the senate
and house education committees and appropriations committees, the
state budget director, and the department not later than 30 days
after the publication of the list described in subsection (5).
Before reporting these graduation and dropout rates, the department
shall allow a school or district to appeal the calculations. The
department shall consider and act upon the appeal within 30 days
after it is submitted and shall not report these graduation and
dropout rates until after all appeals have been considered and
decided.
(3) By the first business day in December and by the last
business day in June of each year, and within 30 days of any change
in employment or assignment status related to a criminal act, a
district shall furnish to the center, in a manner prescribed by the
center, information related to educational personnel and personnel
vacancies as necessary for reporting required by state and federal
law. For the purposes of this subsection, the center shall only
require districts and intermediate districts to report information
that is not already available from the office of retirement
services in the department of technology, management, and budget,
including, but not limited to, vacancy start and end dates, reasons
for the vacancy, and vacancy termination.
(4) If a district or intermediate district fails to meet the
requirements of this section, the department shall withhold 5% of
the total funds for which the district or intermediate district
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


qualifies under this article until the district or intermediate
district complies with this section. If the district or
intermediate district does not comply with this section by the end
of the fiscal year, the department shall place the amount withheld
in an escrow account until the district or intermediate district
complies with this section.
(5) Before publishing a list of school or district
accountability designations as required by the no child left behind
act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act,
Public Law 114-95, and utilizing data that were certified as
accurate and complete after districts and intermediate districts
adhered to deadlines, data quality reviews, and correction
processes leading to local certification of final student data in
subsection (2), the department shall allow a school or district to
appeal any calculation errors used in the preparation of
accountability metrics. The department shall consider and act upon
the appeal within 30 days after it is submitted and shall not
publish the list until after all appeals have been considered and
decided.
(6) The department shall implement statewide standard
reporting requirements for education data approved by the
department in conjunction with the center. The department shall
work with the center, intermediate districts, districts, and other
interested stakeholders to implement this policy change. A district
or intermediate district shall implement the statewide standard
reporting requirements not later than 2017-2018 or when a district
or intermediate district updates its education data reporting
system, whichever is later.
(7) A district or intermediate district shall collect and
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


submit to the center tribal affiliation data for all students and
staff and the identification of student participation in federal
programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and participation in
federal programs funded under the Johnson-O'Malley Supplemental
supplemental Indian Education Program Modernization Act, education
program modernization act, Public Law 115-404. The data must be
reported in a form and manner prescribed by the center in
consultation with the federally recognized Indian tribes in this
state and the department in adherence to the department's tribal
consultation policy. A district or intermediate district shall
begin completion of the reporting requirement under this subsection
by not later than the 2024-2025 fiscal year.
Sec. 20. (1) For 2025-2026, 2026-2027, the target foundation
allowance is $10,050.00.$10,300.00.
(2) The department shall calculate the amount of each
district's foundation allowance as provided in this section, using
a target foundation allowance in the amount specified in subsection
(1).
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
department shall calculate the amount of a district's foundation
allowance as follows, using in all calculations the total amount of
the district's foundation allowance as calculated before any
proration:
(a) For a district that had a foundation allowance for the
immediately preceding fiscal year that was equal to the target
foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year, the
district receives a foundation allowance in an amount equal to the
target foundation allowance described in subsection (1) for the
current fiscal year.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(b) For a district that had a foundation allowance for the
immediately preceding fiscal year that was greater than the target
foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year, the
district's foundation allowance is an amount equal to the lesser of
(the sum of the district's foundation allowance for the immediately
preceding fiscal year plus any per pupil amount calculated under
section 20m(2) in the immediately preceding fiscal year plus the
increase in the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal
year, as compared to the immediately preceding fiscal year) or (the
product of the district's foundation allowance for the immediately
preceding fiscal year times the percentage increase in the United
States Consumer Price Index in the calendar year ending in the
immediately preceding fiscal year as reported by the May revenue
estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b).
(c) For a district that had a foundation allowance in the
immediately preceding fiscal year that was less than the target
foundation allowance in effect for that fiscal year, the district's
foundation allowance is an amount equal to the lesser of (the sum
of district's foundation allowance for the immediately preceding
fiscal year plus any per pupil amount calculated under section
20m(2) in the immediately preceding fiscal year plus the increase
in the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, as
compared to the immediately preceding fiscal year) or (the product
of the district's foundation allowance for the immediately
preceding fiscal year times the percentage increase in the United
States Consumer Price Index in the calendar year ending in the
immediately preceding fiscal year as reported by the May revenue
estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b).
(d) For a district that has a foundation allowance that is not
a whole dollar amount, the department shall round the district's
foundation allowance up to the nearest whole dollar.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the state
portion of a district's foundation allowance is an amount equal to
the district's foundation allowance or the target foundation
allowance for the current fiscal year, whichever is less, minus the
local portion of the district's foundation allowance. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, for a district described in
subsection (3)(b) and (c), the state portion of the district's
foundation allowance is an amount equal to the target foundation
allowance minus the district's foundation allowance supplemental
payment per pupil calculated under section 20m and minus the local
portion of the district's foundation allowance. For a district that
has a millage reduction required under section 31 of article IX of
the state constitution of 1963, the department shall calculate the
state portion of the district's foundation allowance as if that
reduction did not occur. For a receiving district, if school
operating taxes continue to be levied on behalf of a dissolved
district that has been attached in whole or in part to the
receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved
district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12,
the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the receiving
district used for the purposes of this subsection does not include
the taxable value of property within the geographic area of the
dissolved district. For Before the fiscal year ending September 30,
2027, for a community district, if school operating taxes continue
to be levied by a qualifying school district under section 12b of
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


the revised school code, MCL 380.12b, with the same geographic area
as the community district, the taxable value per membership pupil
of property in the community district to be used for the purposes
of this subsection does not include the taxable value of property
within the geographic area of the community district. Beginning
with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, it is the intent of
the legislature that the previous sentence no longer applies and
the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the community
district used for the purposes of this subsection includes the
taxable value of property within the geographic area of the
community district on or after July 1, 2026 and thereafter.
(5) The allocation calculated under this section for a pupil
is based on the foundation allowance of the pupil's district of
residence. For a pupil enrolled under section 105 or 105c in a
district other than the pupil's district of residence, the
allocation calculated under this section is based on the lesser of
the foundation allowance of the pupil's district of residence or
the foundation allowance of the educating district. For a pupil in
membership in a K-5, K-6, or K-8 district who is enrolled in
another district in a grade not offered by the pupil's district of
residence, the allocation calculated under this section is based on
the foundation allowance of the educating district if the educating
district's foundation allowance is greater than the foundation
allowance of the pupil's district of residence. The calculation
under this subsection must take into account a district's per-pupil
allocation under section 20m.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for
pupils in membership, other than special education pupils, in a
public school academy, the allocation calculated under this section
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


is an amount per membership pupil other than special education
pupils in the public school academy equal to the target foundation
allowance specified in subsection (1), or, for a public school
academy that was issued a contract under section 552 of the revised
school code, MCL 380.552, to operate as a school of excellence that
is a cyber school, $10,050.00. $8,240.00. Notwithstanding section
101, for a public school academy that begins operations after the
pupil membership count day, the amount per membership pupil
calculated under this subsection must be adjusted by multiplying
that amount per membership pupil by the number of hours of pupil
instruction provided by the public school academy after it begins
operations, as determined by the department, divided by the minimum
number of hours of pupil instruction required under section 101(3).
The result of this calculation must not exceed the amount per
membership pupil otherwise calculated under this subsection.
(7) For pupils in membership, other than special education
pupils, in a community district, the allocation calculated under
this section is an amount per membership pupil other than special
education pupils in the community district equal to the foundation
allowance of the qualifying school district, as described in
section 12b of the revised school code, MCL 380.12b, that is
located within the same geographic area as the community district.
(8) Subject to subsection (4), for a district that is formed
or reconfigured after June 1, 2002 by consolidation of 2 or more
districts or by annexation, the resulting district's foundation
allowance under this section beginning after the effective date of
the consolidation or annexation is the lesser of the sum of the
average of the foundation allowances of each of the original or
affected districts, calculated as provided in this section,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


weighted as to the percentage of pupils in total membership in the
resulting district who reside in the geographic area of each of the
original or affected districts plus $100.00 or the highest
foundation allowance among the original or affected districts. This
subsection does not apply to a receiving district unless there is a
subsequent consolidation or annexation that affects the district.
The calculation under this subsection must take into account a
district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m.
(9) The department shall round each fraction used in making
calculations under this section to the fourth decimal place and
shall round the dollar amount of an increase in the target
foundation allowance to the nearest whole dollar.
(10) State payments related to payment of the foundation
allowance for a special education pupil are not calculated under
this section but are instead calculated under section 51e.
(11) To assist the legislature in determining the target
foundation allowance for the subsequent fiscal year, each revenue
estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b, must
calculate a pupil membership factor, a revenue adjustment factor,
and an index as follows:
(a) The pupil membership factor is computed by dividing the
estimated membership in the school year ending in the current
fiscal year, excluding intermediate district membership, by the
estimated membership for the school year ending in the subsequent
fiscal year, excluding intermediate district membership. If a
consensus membership factor is not determined at the revenue
estimating conference, the principals of the revenue estimating
conference shall report their estimates to the house and senate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


subcommittees responsible for school aid appropriations not later
than 7 days after the conclusion of the revenue conference.
(b) The revenue adjustment factor is computed by dividing the
sum of the estimated total state school aid fund revenue for the
subsequent fiscal year plus the estimated total state school aid
fund revenue for the current fiscal year, adjusted for any change
in the rate or base of a tax the proceeds of which are deposited in
that fund and excluding money transferred into that fund from the
countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund under the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, by
the sum of the estimated total school aid fund revenue for the
current fiscal year plus the estimated total state school aid fund
revenue for the immediately preceding fiscal year, adjusted for any
change in the rate or base of a tax the proceeds of which are
deposited in that fund. If a consensus revenue factor is not
determined at the revenue estimating conference, the principals of
the revenue estimating conference shall report their estimates to
the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid
appropriations not later than 7 days after the conclusion of the
revenue conference.
(c) The index is calculated by multiplying the pupil
membership factor by the revenue adjustment factor. If a consensus
index is not determined at the revenue estimating conference, the
principals of the revenue estimating conference shall report their
estimates to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for
state school aid appropriations not later than 7 days after the
conclusion of the revenue conference.
(12) Payments to districts and public school academies are not
made under this section. Rather, the calculations under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


section are used to determine the amount of state payments under
section 22b.
(13) If an amendment to section 2 of article VIII of the state
constitution of 1963 allowing state aid to some or all nonpublic
schools is approved by the voters of this state, each foundation
allowance or per-pupil payment calculation under this section may
be reduced.
(14) As used in this section:
(a) "Certified mills" means the lesser of 18 mills or the
number of mills of school operating taxes levied by the district in
1993-94.
(b) "Current fiscal year" means the fiscal year for which a
particular calculation is made.
(c) "Dissolved district" means a district that loses its
organization, has its territory attached to 1 or more other
districts, and is dissolved as provided under section 12 of the
revised school code, MCL 380.12.
(d) "Immediately preceding fiscal year" means the fiscal year
immediately preceding the current fiscal year.
(e) "Local portion of the district's foundation allowance"
means an amount that is equal to the difference between (the sum of
the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of all
property in the district that is nonexempt property times the
district's certified mills and, for a district with certified mills
exceeding 12, the product of the taxable value per membership pupil
of property in the district that is commercial personal property
times the certified mills minus 12 mills) and (the quotient of the
product of the captured assessed valuation under tax increment
financing acts times the district's certified mills divided by the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


district's membership excluding special education pupils).
(f) "Membership" means the definition of that term under
section 6 as in effect for the particular fiscal year for which a
particular calculation is made.
(g) "Nonexempt property" means property that is not a
principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified
forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal
property, commercial personal property, or property occupied by a
public school academy.
(h) "Principal residence", "qualified agricultural property",
"qualified forest property", "supportive housing property",
"industrial personal property", and "commercial personal property"
mean those terms as defined in section 1211 of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1211.
(i) "Receiving district" means a district to which all or part
of the territory of a dissolved district is attached under section
12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12.
(j) "School operating purposes" means the purposes included in
the operation costs of the district as prescribed in sections 7 and
18 and purposes authorized under section 1211 of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1211.
(k) "School operating taxes" means local ad valorem property
taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL
380.1211, and retained for school operating purposes.
(l) "Tax increment financing acts" means parts 2, 3, 4, and 6
of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL
125.4201 to 125.4420 and 125.4602 to 125.4629, or the brownfield
redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670.
(m) "Taxable value per membership pupil" means taxable value,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


as certified by the county treasurer and reported to the
department, for the calendar year ending in the current state
fiscal year divided by the district's membership excluding special
education pupils for the school year ending in the current state
fiscal year.
Sec. 20d. In making the final determination required under
former section 20a of a district's combined state and local revenue
per membership pupil in 1993-94 and in making calculations under
section 20 for 2025-2026, 2026-2027, the department and the
department of treasury shall comply with all of the following:
(a) For a district that had combined state and local revenue
per membership pupil in the 1994-95 fiscal year of $6,500.00 or
more and served as a fiscal agent for a state board designated area
vocational education center in the 1993-94 school year, total state
school aid received by or paid on behalf of the district under this
act in 1993-94 excludes payments made under former section 146 and
under section 147 on behalf of the district's employees who
provided direct services to the area vocational education center.
Not later than June 30, 1996, the department shall make an
adjustment under this subdivision to the district's combined state
and local revenue per membership pupil in the 1994-95 fiscal year
and the department of treasury shall make a final certification of
the number of mills that may be levied by the district under
section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, as a result
of the adjustment under this subdivision.
(b) If a district had an adjustment made to its 1993-94 total
state school aid that excluded payments made under former section
146 and under section 147 on behalf of the district's employees who
provided direct services for intermediate district center programs
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


operated by the district under former section 51 and sections 51a
to 56, if nonresident pupils attending the center programs were
included in the district's membership for purposes of calculating
the combined state and local revenue per membership pupil for 1993-
94, and if there is a signed agreement by all constituent districts
of the intermediate district agreeing to an adjustment under this
subdivision, the department shall calculate the foundation
allowances for 1995-96 and 1996-97 of all districts that had pupils
attending the intermediate district center program operated by the
district that had the adjustment as if their combined state and
local revenue per membership pupil for 1993-94 included resident
pupils attending the center program and excluded nonresident pupils
attending the center program.
Sec. 21b. (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3), a district
shall use funds received under section 22a or 22b to support the
attendance of a district pupil who is an eligible student at an
eligible postsecondary institution under the postsecondary
enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, or
under the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL
388.1901 to 388.1913, by paying eligible charges on behalf of the
district pupil as required under those acts.
(2) A district is not required to pay transportation costs,
parking costs, or activity fees on behalf of an eligible student
for attendance at an eligible postsecondary institution as
described in subsection (1).
(3) A district may pay more money to an eligible postsecondary
institution on behalf of an eligible student than required under
the postsecondary enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511
to 388.524, or the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


258, MCL 388.1901 to 388.1913, and may use local school operating
revenue for that purpose. An eligible student is responsible for
payment of the remainder of the costs associated with his or her
the eligible student's postsecondary enrollment that exceed the
amount the district is required to pay under the postsecondary
enrollment options act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, or the
career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1901 to
388.1913, and that are not paid by the district. As used in this
subsection, "local school operating revenue" means that term as
defined in section 22b.
(4) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to
exceed $60,000,000.00 to reimburse districts for eligible charges
paid on behalf of eligible students to an eligible postsecondary
institution.
(5) To receive funds under subsection (4), a district must
provide a report of the district's dual enrollment participation,
and eligible charges paid by the district, to the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential in a form and manner
consistent with data reported to the center for school aid
purposes. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential may require additional information be provided before
distributing funds under this section.
(6) If the allocation under subsection (4) is insufficient to
fully fund payments as calculated under subsection (4), the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall
prorate payments on an equal percentage basis.
(7) (4) As used in this section, "eligible charges", "eligible
student", and "eligible postsecondary institution" mean those terms
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


as defined in section 3 of the postsecondary enrollment options
act, 1996 PA 160, MCL 388.511 to 388.524, or in section 3 of the
career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1903, as
applicable.
Sec. 21f. (1) A primary district shall enroll an eligible
pupil in virtual courses in accordance with the provisions of this
section. A primary district shall not offer a virtual course to an
eligible pupil unless the virtual course is published in the
primary district's catalog of board-approved courses or in the
statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan
Virtual University pursuant to section 98. The primary district
shall also provide on its publicly accessible website a link to the
statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan
Virtual University. Unless the pupil is at least age 18 or is an
emancipated minor, a pupil must not be enrolled in a course that
meets virtually for more than 6 days in a school year without the
consent of the pupil's parent or legal guardian.
(2) Subject to subsection (3), a primary district shall enroll
an eligible pupil in up to 2 virtual courses as requested by the
pupil during an academic term, semester, or trimester.
(3) A pupil may be enrolled in more than 2 virtual courses in
a specific academic term, semester, or trimester if both of the
following conditions are met:
(a) The primary district has determined that it is in the best
interest of the pupil.
(b) The pupil agrees with the recommendation of the primary
district.
(4) If the number of applicants eligible for acceptance in a
virtual course does not exceed the capacity of the provider to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


provide the virtual course, the provider shall accept for
enrollment all of the applicants eligible for acceptance. If the
number of applicants exceeds the provider's capacity to provide the
virtual course, the provider shall use a random draw system,
subject to the need to abide by state and federal
antidiscrimination laws and court orders. A primary district that
is also a provider shall determine whether or not it has the
capacity to accept applications for enrollment from nonresident
applicants in virtual courses and may use that limit as the reason
for refusal to enroll a nonresident applicant.
(5) A primary district may not establish additional
requirements beyond those specified in this subsection that would
prohibit a pupil from taking a virtual course. A pupil's primary
district may deny the pupil enrollment in a virtual course if any
of the following apply, as determined by the district:
(a) The pupil is enrolled in any of grades K to 5.
(b) The pupil has previously gained the credits that would be
provided from the completion of the virtual course.
(c) The virtual course is not capable of generating academic
credit.
(d) The virtual course is inconsistent with the remaining
graduation requirements or career interests of the pupil.
(e) The pupil has not completed the prerequisite coursework
for the requested virtual course or has not demonstrated
proficiency in the prerequisite course content.
(f) The pupil has failed a previous virtual course in the same
subject during the 2 most recent academic years.
(g) The virtual course is of insufficient quality or rigor. A
primary district that denies a pupil enrollment request for this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


reason shall enroll the pupil in a virtual course in the same or a
similar subject that the primary district determines is of
acceptable rigor and quality.
(h) The cost of the virtual course exceeds the amount
identified in subsection (10), unless the pupil or the pupil's
parent or legal guardian agrees to pay the cost that exceeds this
amount.
(i) The request for a virtual course enrollment did not occur
within the same timelines established by the primary district for
enrollment and schedule changes for regular courses.
(j) The request for a virtual course enrollment was not made
in the academic term, semester, trimester, or summer preceding the
enrollment. This subdivision does not apply to a request made by a
pupil who is newly enrolled in the primary district.
(6) If a pupil is denied enrollment in a virtual course by the
pupil's primary district, the primary district shall provide
written notification to the pupil of the denial, the reason or
reasons for the denial under subsection (5), and a description of
the appeal process. The pupil may appeal the denial by submitting a
letter to the superintendent of the intermediate district in which
the pupil's primary district is located. The letter of appeal must
include the reason provided by the primary district for not
enrolling the pupil and the reason why the pupil is claiming that
the enrollment should be approved. The intermediate district
superintendent or designee shall respond to the appeal within 5
days after it is received. If the intermediate district
superintendent or designee determines that the denial of enrollment
does not meet 1 or more of the reasons specified in subsection (5),
the primary district shall enroll the pupil in the virtual course.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(7) To provide a virtual course to an eligible pupil under
this section, a provider must do all of the following:
(a) Ensure that the virtual course has been published in the
pupil's primary district's catalog of board-approved courses or
published in the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by
the Michigan Virtual University.
(b) Assign to each pupil a teacher of record and provide the
primary district with the personnel identification code assigned by
the center for the teacher of record. If the provider is a
community college, the virtual course must be taught by an
instructor employed by or contracted through the providing
community college.
(c) Offer the virtual course on an open entry and exit method,
or aligned to a semester, trimester, or accelerated academic term
format.
(d) If the virtual course is offered to eligible pupils in
more than 1 district, the following additional requirements must
also be met:
(i) Provide the Michigan Virtual University with a course
syllabus that meets the definition under subsection (14)(g) in a
form and manner prescribed by the Michigan Virtual University for
inclusion in a statewide catalog of virtual courses.
(ii) Not later than October 1 of each fiscal year, provide the
Michigan Virtual University with an aggregated count of enrollments
for each virtual course the provider delivered to pupils under this
section during the immediately preceding school year, and the
number of enrollments in which the pupil earned 60% or more of the
total course points for each virtual course.
(8) To provide a virtual course under this section, a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


community college shall ensure that each virtual course it provides
under this section generates postsecondary credit.
(9) For any virtual course a pupil enrolls in under this
section, the pupil's primary district must assign to the pupil a
mentor and shall supply the provider with the mentor's contact
information.
(10) For a pupil enrolled in 1 or more virtual courses, the
primary district shall use foundation allowance or per-pupil funds
calculated under section 20 to pay for the expenses associated with
the virtual course or courses. A primary district is not required
to pay toward the cost of a virtual course an amount that exceeds
6.67% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal
year as calculated under section 20.
(11) A virtual learning pupil has the same rights and access
to technology in the pupil's primary district's school facilities
as all other pupils enrolled in the pupil's primary district. The
department shall establish standards for hardware, software, and
internet access for pupils who are enrolled in more than 2 virtual
courses under this section in an academic term, semester, or
trimester taken at a location other than a school facility.
(12) If a pupil successfully completes a virtual course, as
determined by the pupil's primary district, the pupil's primary
district shall grant appropriate academic credit for completion of
the course and shall count that credit toward completion of
graduation and subject area requirements. A pupil's school record
and transcript must identify the virtual course title as it appears
in the virtual course syllabus.
(13) The enrollment of a pupil in 1 or more virtual courses
must not result in a pupil being counted as more than 1.0 full-time
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


equivalent pupils under this article. The minimum requirements to
count the pupil in membership are those established by the pupil
accounting manual as it was in effect for the 2015-2016 school year
or as subsequently amended by the department if the department
notifies the legislature about the proposed amendment at least 60
days before the amendment becomes effective.
(14) Subject to the requirements of this subsection, a
district may provide virtual instruction under this subsection for
not more than 6 days in a school year. If a district plans to
provide instruction under this subsection to pupils for more than 6
days during a school year, the district's plan must be approved by
the board of the district, and the district must provide notice of
the plan to impacted pupils and their parents or legal guardians
before enactment of the plan. Instruction may be provided
synchronously or asynchronously, as determined by the department.
Days of instruction under this subsection may be used only for the
following purposes, as defined by the department:
(a) A maximum of 3 days may be designated as testing days,
during which students are released from regular classroom
instruction to participate in state or federally mandated
assessments. Days of virtual instruction provided under this
subdivision are limited to buildings and grade levels impacted by
assessments.
(b) A maximum of 3 days of virtual instruction may be provided
due to conditions not within control of the district, including,
but not limited to, closures due to snow, ice, or other extreme
weather events or unforeseen emergencies. Days of virtual
instruction under this subdivision may be used only after a
district has exhausted all emergency closure days permitted under
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


section 101.
(15) The department shall promulgate rules for the conditions
under which virtual instruction may be provided under subsection
(14) and the manner in which it may be provided.
(16) (14) As used in this section:
(a) "Instructor" means an individual who is employed by or
contracted through a community college.
(b) "Mentor" means a professional employee of the primary
district who monitors the pupil's progress, ensures the pupil has
access to needed technology, is available for assistance, and
ensures access to the teacher of record. A mentor may also serve as
the teacher of record if the primary district is the provider for
the virtual course and the mentor meets the requirements under
subdivision (e).
(c) "Primary district" means the district that enrolls the
pupil and reports the pupil for pupil membership purposes.
(d) "Provider" means the district, intermediate district,
community college, or other third-party vendor that the primary
district pays to provide the virtual course or the Michigan Virtual
University if it is providing the virtual course.
(e) "Teacher of record" means a teacher who meets all of the
following:
(i) Is appropriately placed under a valid Michigan teaching
certificate or a teaching permit, authorization, or approval issued
by the department. As used in this subparagraph, "appropriately
placed" means holding a valid Michigan educator credential with the
required grade range and discipline or subject area for the
assignment, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction.
(ii) Is responsible for providing instruction, determining
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


instructional methods for each pupil, diagnosing learning needs,
assessing pupil learning, prescribing intervention strategies and
modifying lessons, reporting outcomes, and evaluating the effects
of instruction and support strategies.
(iii) Has a personnel identification code provided by the
center.
(iv) If the provider is a community college, is an instructor
employed by or contracted through the providing community college.
(f) "Virtual course" means a course of study that is capable
of generating a credit or a grade and that is provided in an
interactive learning environment where any portion of the
curriculum is delivered using the internet and in which pupils may
be separated from their instructor or teacher of record by time or
location, or both.
(g) "Virtual course syllabus" means a document that includes
all of the following:
(i) An alignment document detailing how the course meets
applicable state standards or, if the state does not have state
standards, nationally recognized standards.
(ii) The virtual course content outline.
(iii) The virtual course required assessments.
(iv) The virtual course prerequisites.
(v) Expectations for actual instructor or teacher of record
contact time with the virtual learning pupil and other
communications between a pupil and the instructor or teacher of
record.
(vi) Academic support available to the virtual learning pupil.
(vii) The virtual course learning outcomes and objectives.
(viii) The name of the institution or organization providing the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


virtual content.
(ix) The name of the institution or organization providing the
instructor or teacher of record.
(x) The course titles assigned by the provider and the course
titles and course codes from the National Center for Education
Statistics (NCES) school codes for the exchange of data (SCED).
(xi) The number of eligible pupils that will be accepted by the
provider in the virtual course. A primary district that is also the
provider may limit the enrollment to those pupils enrolled in the
primary district.
(xii) The results of the virtual course quality review using
the guidelines and model review process published by the Michigan
Virtual University.
(h) "Virtual learning pupil" means a pupil enrolled in 1 or
more virtual courses.
Sec. 21h. (1) From the state school aid pupil support reserve
fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated
$6,137,400.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for assisting districts
assigned by the superintendent to participate in a partnership
district agreement to improve student achievement and district
financial stability. It is the intent of the legislature that the
appropriation in this section will be funded with state school aid
pupil support reserve fund money through 2027-2028. The
superintendent shall identify any conditions that may be
contributing to low academic performance within a district being
considered for assignment to a partnership district agreement. The
purpose of the partnership district agreement is to identify
district needs, develop intervention plans, and partner with
public, private, and nonprofit organizations to coordinate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


resources and improve student achievement. Assignment of a district
to a partnership district agreement is made by the superintendent.
(2) A district described in subsection (1) is eligible for
funding under this section if the district includes at least 1
school that has been identified as low performing under the
approved federal accountability system. A district described in
this subsection must do all of the following to be eligible for
funding under this section:
(a) Within 90 days of assignment to the partnership district
agreement described in this section, complete a comprehensive needs
assessment or evaluation in collaboration with an intermediate
district, community members, education organizations, and
postsecondary institutions, as applicable, that is approved by the
superintendent. The comprehensive needs assessment or evaluation
must include at least all of the following:
(i) A review of the district's implementation and utilization
of a multi-tiered system of supports to ensure that it is used to
appropriately inform instruction.
(ii) A review of the district and school building leadership
and educator capacity to substantially improve student outcomes.
(iii) A review of classroom, instructional, and operational
practices and curriculum to ensure alignment with research-based
instructional practices and state curriculum standards.
(b) Develop a district continuous improvement plan that has
been approved by the superintendent and that addresses the needs
identified in the comprehensive needs assessment or evaluation
completed under subdivision (a). The district continuous
improvement plan must include at least all of the following:
(i) Specific actions that will be taken by the district and
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


each of its partners to improve student achievement.
(ii) Specific measurable benchmarks that will be met within 18
months to improve student achievement and identification of
expected student achievement outcomes to be attained within 3 years
after assignment to the partnership.
(iii) Measurable benchmarks that put pupils on track to meet or
exceed grade level proficiency, increase high school graduation
rates, reduce class sizes in grades K to 3, and improve attendance
rates.
(c) Provide access to training for district leadership,
including, but not limited to, the superintendent or chief
administrator and school board or board of directors members, on
areas of education fiscal and policy matters. The department may
require training for district leadership and all board members
under this subdivision at a rate and frequency needed to support
measurable academic outcomes for the district.
(3) Upon approval of the district continuous improvement plan
developed under subsection (2), the department shall assign a team
of individuals with expertise in comprehensive school and district
reform to partner with the district, the intermediate district,
community organizations, education organizations, and postsecondary
institutions identified in the academic and financial operating or
intervention district continuous improvement plan to review the
district's use of existing financial resources to ensure that those
resources are being used as efficiently and effectively as possible
to improve student academic achievement and to ensure district
financial stability. The superintendent of public instruction may
waive burdensome administrative rules for a partnership district
for the duration of the partnership district agreement.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


(4) Funds allocated under this section, excluding funds
allocated under subsection (5), may be used to pay for district
expenditures approved by the superintendent to improve student
achievement. Funds may be used for professional development for
teachers or district or school leadership, increased instructional
time, teacher mentors, literacy, numeracy, reducing K-3 class
sizes, reducing chronic absenteeism, or other expenditures that
directly impact student achievement and cannot be paid from
existing district financial resources. Notwithstanding section 17b,
the department shall make payments to districts under this section
on a schedule determined by the department.
(5) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is
allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed
$137,400.00 for the purchase of a data analytics tool to be used by
districts described in subsection (1). The superintendent of public
instruction shall require districts described in subsection (1) to
purchase a data analytics tool funded under this subsection as part
of the agreements described in this section.
(6) The department shall annually report to the legislature on
the activities funded under this section and how those activities
impacted student achievement in districts that received funds under
this section. To the extent possible, participating districts
receiving funding under this section shall participate in the
report.
(7) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from
the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there
is allocated an amount not to exceed $36,000,000.00 to districts
described in subsection (1) for 2023-2024 only for supplemental
funding to be used by districts for the purposes of this section in
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma


equal installments of $12,000,000.00 in each of the fiscal years
2023-2024, 2024-2025, and 2025-2026. The funds allocated under this
subsection for 2023-2024 are a work project appropriation, and any
unexpended funds for 2023-2024 are carried forward into 2024-2025.
The purpose of the work project is to provide assistance to
districts eligible for funding under this section. The estimated
completion date of the work project described in this subsection is
September 30, 2026.
Sec. 22a. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $3,927,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 and there is allocated an
amount not to exceed $3,785,000,000.00 $3,711,000,000.00 for 2025-
2026 and there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$3,564,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 for payments to districts and
qualifying public school academies to guarantee each district and
qualifying public school academy an amount equal to its 1994-95
total state and local per-pupil revenue for school operating
purposes under section 11 of article IX of the state constitution
of 1963. Pursuant to section 11 of article IX of the state
constitution of 1963, this guarantee does not apply to a district
in a year in which the district levies a millage rate for school
district operating purposes less than it levied in 1994. However,
subsection (2) applies to calculating the payments under this
section. Funds allocated under this section that are not expended
in the fiscal year for which they were allocated, as determined by
the department, may be used to supplement the allocations under
sections 22b and 51c to fully fund those allocations for the same
fiscal year.
(2) To ensure that a district receives an amount equal to the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

100
district's 1994-95 total state and local per-pupil revenue for
school operating purposes, there is allocated to each district a
state portion of the district's 1994-95 foundation allowance in an
amount calculated as follows:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the state
portion of a district's 1994-95 foundation allowance is an amount
equal to the district's 1994-95 foundation allowance or $6,500.00,
whichever is less, minus the difference between the sum of the
product of the taxable value per membership pupil of all property
in the district that is nonexempt property times the district's
certified mills and, for a district with certified mills exceeding
12, the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of
property in the district that is commercial personal property times
the certified mills minus 12 mills and the quotient of the ad
valorem property tax revenue of the district captured under tax
increment financing acts divided by the district's membership. For
a district that has a millage reduction required under section 31
of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, the department
shall calculate the state portion of the district's foundation
allowance as if that reduction did not occur. For a receiving
district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a
dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to
the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved
district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12,
taxable value per membership pupil of all property in the receiving
district that is nonexempt property and taxable value per
membership pupil of property in the receiving district that is
commercial personal property do not include property within the
geographic area of the dissolved district; ad valorem property tax
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

101
revenue of the receiving district captured under tax increment
financing acts does not include ad valorem property tax revenue
captured within the geographic boundaries of the dissolved district
under tax increment financing acts; and certified mills do not
include the certified mills of the dissolved district. For Except
as otherwise provided in this subdivision, for a community
district, the department shall reduce the allocation as otherwise
calculated under this section by an amount equal to the amount of
local school operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to
the community district if not for the operation of section 386 of
the revised school code, MCL 380.386, and the amount of this
reduction is offset by the increase in funding under section
22b(2). Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027,
it is the intent of the legislature that the previous sentence no
longer applies and the allocation for a community district under
this section shall not be reduced by the amount of local school
operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to the community
district if not for the operation of section 386 of the revised
school code, MCL 380.386, and no offset is provided by increased
funding under section 22b(2).
(b) For a district that had a 1994-95 foundation allowance
greater than $6,500.00, the state payment under this subsection is
the sum of the amount calculated under subdivision (a) plus the
amount calculated under this subdivision. The amount calculated
under this subdivision must be equal to the difference between the
district's 1994-95 foundation allowance minus $6,500.00 and the
current year hold harmless school operating taxes per pupil. If the
result of the calculation under subdivision (a) is negative, the
negative amount is an offset against any state payment calculated
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

102
under this subdivision. If the result of a calculation under this
subdivision is negative, there is not a state payment or a
deduction under this subdivision. The taxable values per membership
pupil used in the calculations under this subdivision are as
adjusted by ad valorem property tax revenue captured under tax
increment financing acts divided by the district's membership. For
a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on
behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or
in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of
the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code,
MCL 380.12, ad valorem property tax revenue captured under tax
increment financing acts do not include ad valorem property tax
revenue captured within the geographic boundaries of the dissolved
district under tax increment financing acts.
(3) For pupils in membership in a qualifying public school
academy, there is allocated under this section to the authorizing
body that is the fiscal agent for the qualifying public school
academy for forwarding to the qualifying public school academy an
amount equal to the 1994-95 per-pupil payment to the qualifying
public school academy under section 20.
(4) A district or qualifying public school academy may use
funds allocated under this section in conjunction with any federal
funds for which the district or qualifying public school academy
otherwise would be eligible.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for a
district that is formed or reconfigured after June 1, 2000 by
consolidation of 2 or more districts or by annexation, the
resulting district's 1994-95 foundation allowance under this
section beginning after the effective date of the consolidation or
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

103
annexation is the average of the 1994-95 foundation allowances of
each of the original or affected districts, calculated as provided
in this section, weighted as to the percentage of pupils in total
membership in the resulting district in the fiscal year in which
the consolidation takes place who reside in the geographic area of
each of the original districts. If an affected district's 1994-95
foundation allowance is less than the 1994-95 basic foundation
allowance, the amount of that district's 1994-95 foundation
allowance is considered for the purpose of calculations under this
subsection to be equal to the amount of the 1994-95 basic
foundation allowance. This subsection does not apply to a receiving
district unless there is a subsequent consolidation or annexation
that affects the district.
(6) Payments under this section are subject to section 25g.
(6) (7) As used in this section:
(a) "1994-95 foundation allowance" means a district's 1994-95
foundation allowance calculated and certified by the department of
treasury or the superintendent under former section 20a as enacted
in 1993 PA 336 and as amended by 1994 PA 283.
(b) "Certified mills" means the lesser of 18 mills or the
number of mills of school operating taxes levied by the district in
1993-94.
(c) "Current fiscal year" means the fiscal year for which a
particular calculation is made.
(d) "Current year hold harmless school operating taxes per
pupil" means the per-pupil revenue generated by multiplying a
district's 1994-95 hold harmless millage by the district's current
year taxable value per membership pupil. For a receiving district,
if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

104
district that has been attached in whole or in part to the
receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved
district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12,
taxable value per membership pupil does not include the taxable
value of property within the geographic area of the dissolved
district.
(e) "Dissolved district" means a district that loses its
organization, has its territory attached to 1 or more other
districts, and is dissolved as provided under section 12 of the
revised school code, MCL 380.12.
(f) "Hold harmless millage" means, for a district with a 1994-
95 foundation allowance greater than $6,500.00, the number of mills
by which the exemption from the levy of school operating taxes on a
principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified
forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal
property, commercial personal property, and property occupied by a
public school academy could be reduced as provided in section 1211
of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, and the number of mills
of school operating taxes that could be levied on all property as
provided in section 1211(2) of the revised school code, MCL
380.1211, as certified by the department of treasury for the 1994
tax year. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are
to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been
attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy
debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the
revised school code, MCL 380.12, school operating taxes do not
include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of
the dissolved district.
(g) "Membership" means the definition of that term under
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

105
section 6 as in effect for the particular fiscal year for which a
particular calculation is made.
(h) "Nonexempt property" means property that is not a
principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified
forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal
property, commercial personal property, or property occupied by a
public school academy.
(i) "Principal residence", "qualified agricultural property",
"qualified forest property", "supportive housing property",
"industrial personal property", and "commercial personal property"
mean those terms as defined in section 1211 of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1211.
(j) "Qualifying public school academy" means a public school
academy that was in operation in the 1994-95 school year and is in
operation in the current fiscal year.
(k) "Receiving district" means a district to which all or part
of the territory of a dissolved district is attached under section
12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12.
(l) "School operating taxes" means local ad valorem property
taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL
380.1211, and retained for school operating purposes as defined in
section 20.
(m) "Tax increment financing acts" means parts 2, 3, 4, and 6
of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL
125.4201 to 125.4420 and 125.4602 to 125.4629, or the brownfield
redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670.
(n) "Taxable value per membership pupil" means each of the
following divided by the district's membership:
(i) For the number of mills by which the exemption from the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

106
levy of school operating taxes on a principal residence, qualified
agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive
housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal
property, and property occupied by a public school academy may be
reduced as provided in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL
380.1211, the taxable value of principal residence, qualified
agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive
housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal
property, and property occupied by a public school academy for the
calendar year ending in the current fiscal year. For a receiving
district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a
dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to
the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved
district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12,
mills do not include mills within the geographic area of the
dissolved district.
(ii) For the number of mills of school operating taxes that may
be levied on all property as provided in section 1211(2) of the
revised school code, MCL 380.1211, the taxable value of all
property for the calendar year ending in the current fiscal year.
For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be
levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in
whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt
obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the
revised school code, MCL 380.12, school operating taxes do not
include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of
the dissolved district.
Sec. 22b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
for discretionary nonmandated payments to districts under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

107
section, there is allocated for 2024-2025 an amount not to exceed
$6,220,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund and general fund
appropriations in section 11 and an amount not to exceed
$41,000,000.00 from the community district education trust fund
appropriation in section 11, and there is allocated for 2025-2026
an amount not to exceed $6,696,500,000.00 $6,657,000,000.00 from
the state school aid fund and general fund appropriations in
section 11, and there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to
exceed $6,925,850,000.00 from the state school aid fund and general
fund appropriations in section 11. In addition, there is allocated
for 2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $124,000,000.00 from the
state school aid fund appropriation in section 11, . For 2024-2025,
the amount necessary, estimated at $77,700,000.00, must be
deposited from the general fund into the state school aid fund to
reimburse the state school aid fund for community district
education trust fund costs in excess of $41,000,000.00, as required
under section 12 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL
12.262. For 2024-2025 only, if the amount allocated under this
subsection from the community district education trust fund
appropriation under section 11 is insufficient to pay for an
increase under this section, any amount exceeding that allocation
may be paid from other allocations under this subsection. and there
is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed
$130,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund
appropriation in section 11. Except for money allocated under this
section from the community district education trust fund
appropriation in section 11, funds allocated under this section
that are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were
allocated, as determined by the department, may be used to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

108
supplement the allocations under sections 22a and 51c to fully fund
those allocations for the same fiscal year.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) (4) and section 296, the
allocation to a district under this section subsection (1) is an
amount equal to the sum of the amounts calculated under sections
20, 20m, 51a(2), 51a(3), 51a(11), and 51e, minus the sum of the
allocations to the district under sections 22a and 51c. For Except
as otherwise provided in this subsection, for a community district,
the allocation as otherwise calculated under this section is
increased by an amount equal to the amount of local school
operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to the community
district if not for the operation of section 386 of the revised
school code, MCL 380.386, to offset the absence of local school
operating revenue in a community district in the funding of the
state portion of the foundation allowance under section 20(4). ,
and, for 2024-2025 only, this increase must be paid from the
community district education trust fund allocation in subsection
(1).Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, it is
the intent of the legislature that the previous sentence no longer
applies.
(3) To receive an allocation under subsection (1), this
section, each district must do all of the following:
(a) Comply with section 1280b of the revised school code, MCL
380.1280b.
(b) Comply with sections 1278a and 1278b of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1278a and 380.1278b.
(c) Furnish data and other information required by state and
federal law to the center and the department in the form and manner
specified by the center or the department, as applicable.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

109
(d) Comply with section 1230g of the revised school code, MCL
380.1230g.
(e) Comply with section 21f.
(f) For a district that has entered into a partnership
district agreement with the department, comply with section 22p.
(g) Comply with section 1280h of the revised school code, MCL
380.1280h.
(h) Comply with section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL
380.1280f. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30,
2026, if a district is not using a curriculum from the department's
evidence-based curriculum list required under section 1280f of the
revised school code, MCL 380.1280f, the district must provide a
notification to all parents or legal guardians of students in
grades K to 5 receiving instruction with that curriculum that
includes all of the following:
(i) A statement informing parents or legal guardians that the
curriculum used by the district is not evidence-based or not
aligned to state standards, which could negatively impact student
academic outcomes.
(ii) A statement explaining why the district is not using a
curriculum that is evidence-based or aligned to state standards.
(iii) A plan, including a projected timeline, for when a new
curriculum will be adopted that is evidence-based and aligned to
state standards.
(4) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), and
subject to subsection (3) and section 296, from the state school
aid fund money appropriated in section 11 there is allocated an
amount not to exceed $1,696,087,600.00 to each district for a
weighted foundation payment. As used in this subsection, "weighted
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

110
foundation payment" is an amount equal to the target foundation
allowance multiplied by the weighted pupil membership for the
district.
(5) (4) Districts are encouraged to use funds allocated under
this section for the purchase and support of payroll, human
resources, and other business function software that is compatible
with that of the intermediate district in which the district is
located and with other districts located within that intermediate
district.
(6) (5) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department
shall pay up to $1,000,000.00 in litigation costs incurred by this
state related to commercial or industrial property tax appeals,
including, but not limited to, appeals of classification, that
impact revenues dedicated to the state school aid fund.
(7) (6) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department
shall pay up to $1,000,000.00 in litigation costs incurred by this
state associated with lawsuits filed by 1 or more districts or
intermediate districts against this state. If the allocation under
this section is insufficient to fully fund all payments required
under this section, the payments under this subsection must be made
in full before any proration of remaining payments under this
section.
(8) (7) It is the intent of the legislature that all
constitutional obligations of this state have been fully funded
under sections 22a, 31d, 51a, 51c, 51e, and 152a. If a claim is
made by an entity receiving funds under this article that
challenges the legislative determination of the adequacy of this
funding or alleges that there exists an unfunded constitutional
requirement, the state budget director may escrow or allocate from
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

111
the discretionary funds for nonmandated payments under this section
the amount as may be necessary to satisfy the claim before making
any payments to districts under subsection (2). If funds are
escrowed, the escrowed funds are a work project appropriation and
the funds are carried forward into the following fiscal year. The
purpose of the work project is to provide for any payments that may
be awarded to districts as a result of litigation. The work project
is completed upon resolution of the litigation.
(9) (8) If the local claims review board or a court of
competent jurisdiction makes a final determination that this state
is in violation of section 29 of article IX of the state
constitution of 1963 regarding state payments to districts, the
state budget director shall use work project funds under subsection
(7) (8) or allocate from the discretionary funds for nonmandated
payments under this section the amount as may be necessary to
satisfy the amount owed to districts before making any payments to
districts under subsection (2).
(10) (9) If a claim is made in court that challenges the
legislative determination of the adequacy of funding for this
state's constitutional obligations or alleges that there exists an
unfunded constitutional requirement, any interested party may seek
an expedited review of the claim by the local claims review board.
If the claim exceeds $10,000,000.00, this state may remove the
action to the court of appeals, and the court of appeals has and
shall exercise jurisdiction over the claim.
(11) (10) If payments resulting from a final determination by
the local claims review board or a court of competent jurisdiction
that there has been a violation of section 29 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963 exceed the amount allocated for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

112
discretionary nonmandated payments under this section, the
legislature shall provide for adequate funding for this state's
constitutional obligations at its next legislative session.
(12) (11) If a lawsuit challenging payments made to districts
related to costs reimbursed by federal title XIX Medicaid funds is
filed against this state, then, for the purpose of addressing
potential liability under such a lawsuit, the state budget director
may place funds allocated under this section in escrow or allocate
money from the funds otherwise allocated under this section, up to
a maximum of 50% of the amount allocated in subsection (1). If
funds are placed in escrow under this subsection, those funds are a
work project appropriation and the funds are carried forward into
the following fiscal year. The purpose of the work project is to
provide for any payments that may be awarded to districts as a
result of the litigation. The work project is completed upon
resolution of the litigation. In addition, this state reserves the
right to terminate future federal title XIX Medicaid reimbursement
payments to districts if the amount or allocation of reimbursed
funds is challenged in the lawsuit. As used in this subsection,
"title XIX" means title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396
to 1396w-6.
(13) (12) As used in this section:
(a) "Dissolved district" means that term as defined in section
20.
(b) "Local school operating revenue" means school operating
taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL
380.1211. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are
to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been
attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

113
debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the
revised school code, MCL 380.12, local school operating revenue
does not include school operating taxes levied within the
geographic area of the dissolved district.
(c) "Receiving district" and "school operating taxes" mean
those terms as defined in section 20.
(d) "Weighted pupil membership" means that term as defined in
section 6.
Sec. 22d. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated under section 11, an amount not to exceed
$12,873,100.00 $13,772,300.00 is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027
for supplemental payments to rural districts under this section.
(2) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is
allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed
$3,906,200.00 $4,179,100.00 for payments under this subsection to
eligible districts. A district that meets all of the following is
an eligible district under this subsection:
(a) Operates grades K to 12.
(b) Has fewer than 250 pupils in membership.
(c) Each school building operated by the district meets at
least 1 of the following:
(i) Is located in the Upper Peninsula at least 30 miles from
any other public school building.
(ii) Is located on an island that is not accessible by bridge.
(3) The amount of the additional funding to each eligible
district under subsection (2) is determined under a spending plan
developed as provided in this subsection and approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The spending plan must be
developed cooperatively by the intermediate superintendents of each
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

114
intermediate district in which an eligible district is located. The
intermediate superintendents shall review the financial situation
of each eligible district, determine the minimum essential
financial needs of each eligible district, and develop and agree on
a spending plan that distributes the available funding under
subsection (2) to the eligible districts based on those financial
needs. The intermediate superintendents shall submit the spending
plan to the superintendent of public instruction for approval. Upon
approval by the superintendent of public instruction, the amounts
specified for each eligible district under the spending plan are
allocated under subsection (2) and must be paid to the eligible
districts in the same manner as payments under section 22b.
(4) Subject to subsection (7), from the allocation in
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an
amount not to exceed $8,412,100.00 $8,999,700.00 for payments under
this subsection to districts that have fewer than 10.0 pupils per
square mile, as determined by the department, or that have greater
than 250 square miles.
(5) The funds allocated under subsection (4) are allocated as
follows:
(a) An amount equal to $6,373,700.00 $6,818,900.00 is
allocated to districts with fewer than 8.0 pupils per square mile,
as determined by the department, on an equal per-pupil basis.
(b) The balance of the funding under subsection (4) is
allocated as follows:
(i) For districts with at least 8.0 but fewer than 9.0 pupils
per square mile, as determined by the department, the allocation is
an amount per pupil equal to 75% of the per-pupil amount allocated
to districts under subdivision (a).
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

115
(ii) For districts with at least 9.0 but fewer than 10.0 pupils
per square mile, as determined by the department, the allocation is
an amount per pupil equal to 50% of the per-pupil amount allocated
to districts under subdivision (a).
(iii) For districts that have greater than 250 square miles,
have at least 10.0 pupils per square mile, and do not receive
funding under subsection (2), as determined by the department, the
allocation is an amount per pupil equal to 100% of the per-pupil
amount allocated to districts under subdivision (a).
(c) If the total funding allocated under subdivision (b) is
insufficient to fully fund payments as calculated under that
subdivision, the department shall prorate payments to districts
under subdivision (b) on an equal per-pupil basis. If funding
allocated under subdivision (b) remains unallocated after making
calculations under that subdivision, the department may provide the
remaining unallocated funding on an equal per-pupil basis to
districts receiving funding under subdivision (b)(i) and (ii).
(6) Subject to subsection (7), from the allocation under
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an
amount not to exceed $554,800.00 $593,500.00 for payments under
this subsection to districts where each school building operated by
the district is located on an island that is accessible by bridge.
(7) A district receiving funds allocated under subsection (2)
is not eligible for funding allocated under subsection (4) or (6).
A district receiving funds allocated under subsection (6) is not
eligible for funding under subsection (2) or (4).
Sec. 22k. (1) The school transportation fund is created as a
separate account within the state school aid fund for the purpose
of supporting district transportation costs.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

116
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the school transportation fund. The
state treasurer shall direct the investment of the school
transportation fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the school
transportation fund interest and earnings from school
transportation fund investments.
(3) Money in the school transportation fund at the close of
the fiscal year remains in the school transportation fund and does
not lapse to the state school aid fund or the general fund.
(4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the
school transportation fund for auditing purposes.
(5) Money available in the school transportation fund must not
be expended without a specific appropriation.
(6) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 2027 only,
$130,000,000.00 $150,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund must
be deposited into the school transportation fund.
Sec. 22l. (1) From the school transportation fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026
2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00, and from
the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11,
there is allocated for 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed
$25,000,000.00 to districts and intermediate districts for
transportation costs. Funding for each district or intermediate
district is as follows:
(a) The department must assign each district and intermediate
district to an octile based on the number of riders per square mile
and calculate the median cost per rider for each octile.
(b) Funds must be distributed to each district and
intermediate district as follows:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

117
(i) An initial amount at the lesser of the octile's median cost
per rider or the actual transportation cost per general education
rider at the district or intermediate district.
(ii) An additional amount for districts and intermediate
districts that have outlier costs per rider that are deemed
reasonable, as determined by the department.
(c) If funds are insufficient to fully fund payments under
this section, payments may be prorated on an equal percentage
basis.
(2) In addition to the funds allocated under subsection (1),
from the school transportation fund money appropriated under
section 11, there is allocated for 2022-2023 only an amount not to
exceed $200,000.00 to an intermediate district for a study on
district transportation costs. The intermediate district receiving
funds under this subsection must submit a report to the department,
the state budget director, the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid, and the house and senate fiscal
agencies by February 29, 2024 on the outcomes of the study under
this subsection. Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated under
this subsection may be available for expenditure until September
30, 2026. A recipient of funding under this subsection must return
any unexpended funds to the department in a manner prescribed by
the department by not later than October 30, 2026.
(2) (3) To remain eligible for funding under subsection (1),
by not later than December 1 of the current fiscal year, a school
district must submit, in a form and manner determined by the
department, to their intermediate district, and a public school
academy must submit, in a form and manner determined by the
department, to the intermediate district in which the public school
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

118
academy is located, the number of nonpublic school students the
district expects to transport as required under section 1321 of the
revised school code, MCL 380.1321. Intermediate districts shall
submit this information to the department by not later than
February 1.
(3) (4) The department shall compile the reports provided by
intermediate districts under subsection (3) (2) into 1 legislative
report. The department shall provide this report not later than
March 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under
this section to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for
school aid, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state
budget director.
(4) (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 22m. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 an amount not to exceed $3,500,000.00 for supporting the
integration of local data systems into the Michigan data hub
network based on common standards and applications that are in
compliance with section 19(6). In addition, from the state school
aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for
2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for the
purposes of this section.
(2) An entity that is the fiscal agent for no more than 5
consortia of intermediate districts that previously received
funding from the technology readiness infrastructure grant under
former section 22i for the purpose of establishing regional data
hubs that are part of the Michigan data hub network is eligible for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

119
funding under this section.
(3) The center shall work with an advisory committee composed
of representatives from intermediate districts within each of the
data hub regions to coordinate the activities of the Michigan data
hub network.
(4) The center, in collaboration with the Michigan data hub
network, shall determine the amount of funds distributed under this
section to each participating regional data hub within the network,
based upon a competitive grant process. The center shall ensure
that the entities receiving funding under this section represent
geographically diverse areas in this state.
(5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the center.
(6) To receive funding under this section, a regional data hub
must have a governance model that ensures local control of data,
data security, and student privacy issues. The integration of data
within each of the regional data hubs must provide for the
actionable use of data by districts and intermediate districts
through common reports and dashboards and for efficiently providing
information to meet state and federal reporting purposes.
(7) Participation in a data hub region in the Michigan data
hub network under this section is voluntary and is not required.
(8) Entities receiving funding under this section shall use
the funds for all of the following:
(a) Creating an infrastructure that effectively manages the
movement of data between data systems used by intermediate
districts, districts, and other educational organizations in
Michigan based on common data standards to improve student
achievement.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

120
(b) Utilizing the infrastructure to put in place commonly
needed integrations, reducing cost and effort to do that work while
increasing data accuracy and usability.
(c) Promoting the use of a more common set of applications by
promoting systems that integrate with the Michigan data hub
network.
(d) Promoting 100% district adoption of the Michigan data hub
network.
(e) Ensuring local control of data, data security, and student
data privacy.
(f) Utilizing the infrastructure to promote the actionable use
of data through common reports and dashboards that are consistent
statewide.
(g) Creating a governance model to facilitate sustainable
operations of the infrastructure in the future, including
administration, legal agreements, documentation, staffing, hosting,
and funding.
(h) Evaluating future data initiatives at all levels to
determine whether the initiatives can be enhanced by using the
standardized environment in the Michigan data hub network.
(9) By not later than January 1 of each fiscal year, the
center shall prepare a summary report of information provided by
each entity that received funds under this section that includes
measurable outcomes based on the objectives described under this
section and a summary of compiled data from each entity to provide
a means to evaluate the effectiveness of the project. The center
shall submit the report to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid and to the house and senate fiscal
agencies.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

121
Sec. 23h. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $12,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only to an intermediate
district in which the combined total number of pupils in membership
of all of its constituent districts is the fewest among all
intermediate districts in this state for the purpose of this
section. Funding must be used by the intermediate district, in
partnership with an association that represents intermediate
district administrators in this state, for the purposes described
in this section.
(2) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$3,000,000.00 for professional learning opportunities for
mathematics educators, including instructional and leadership
coaching, designed to strengthen early mathematics content
knowledge and instructional practices among pre-K to 5 teachers.
Funds allocated under this subsection must be used for the
following:
(a) Development of local district professional learning
systems that incorporate job-embedded educator learning structures,
resources to support local district leadership teams, and the
intentional integration of the Michigan integrated continuous
improvement process, and the MiStrategy Bank.
(b) Professional learning for early mathematics specialists,
coaches, administrators, and teachers.
(c) Implementation of statewide and regional professional
learning networks in early mathematics instruction.
(d) Development and support of tools to support the
implementation at the intermediate district and district levels.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

122
(3) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$9,000,000.00 to fund early mathematics specialists within
intermediate districts to assist teachers, school leaders, and
intermediate district leaders in implementing research-based
instructional strategies for grade pre-K to 5 students. All of the
following apply to funds allocated under this subsection:
(a) To be eligible to receive funds under this subsection, an
intermediate district must apply to the intermediate district
described in subsection (1) in a form and manner determined by the
intermediate district. The application for funds under this
subdivision must provide assurances that the early mathematics
specialists funded under this subsection demonstrate the following:
(i) A deep and broad understanding of mathematics content,
including the specialized knowledge needed for teaching.
(ii) Expertise in effective instructional and assessment
practices informed by research-based mathematical learning
trajectories.
(iii) Knowledge and skills for working with adult learners.
(iv) Leadership skills necessary to influence and support
educational efforts to improve mathematics teaching and learning.
(b) Funds allocated under this subsection must be awarded as
follows:
(i) An equal amount per eligible intermediate district
necessary to support the cost of 1 early mathematics specialist, as
determined by the intermediate district and association described
in subsection (1).
(ii) After initial distributions under subparagraph (i), any
remaining funds may be allocated by the intermediate district
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

123
described in subsection (1) to eligible intermediate districts for
early mathematics specialists based on regional need, using a
rubric developed by the department and the Michigan Association of
Intermediate School Administrators Early Mathematics Task Force.
(4) By not later than September 1 of each year, the
intermediate district and the association described in subsection
(1), in consultation with grant recipients, shall submit a report
to the chairs of the senate and house appropriations subcommittees
on school aid, the chairs of the senate and house standing
committees responsible for education legislation, the house and
senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director. The report
must include, at a minimum, an assessment of the impact of funds
allocated in this section on mathematics instruction and learning
at the intermediate district, district, and student level.
(5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
(6) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated under this
section may be available for expenditure until September 30, 2029.
A recipient of funding under this section must return any
unexpended funds to the department in the manner prescribed by the
department by not later than October 30, 2030.
Sec. 24. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated
in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount
not to exceed $7,650,000.00 for payments to the educating district
or intermediate district for educating pupils assigned by a court
or the department of health and human services to reside in or to
attend a juvenile detention facility or child caring institution
licensed by the department of health and human services and
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

124
approved by the department to provide an on-grounds education
program. The amount of the payment under this section to a district
or intermediate district is calculated as prescribed under
subsection (2).
(2) The department shall allocate the total amount allocated
under this section by paying to the educating district or
intermediate district an amount equal to the lesser of the
district's or intermediate district's added cost or the
department's approved per-pupil allocation for the district or
intermediate district. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Added cost" means 100% of the added cost each fiscal year
for educating all pupils assigned by a court or the department of
health and human services to reside in or to attend a juvenile
detention facility or child caring institution licensed by the
department of health and human services or the department of
licensing and regulatory affairs and approved by the department to
provide an on-grounds education program. Added cost is computed by
deducting all other revenue received under this article for pupils
described in this section from total costs, as approved by the
department, in whole or in part, for educating those pupils in the
on-grounds education program or in a program approved by the
department that is located on property adjacent to a juvenile
detention facility or child caring institution. Costs reimbursed by
federal funds are not included.
(b) "Department's approved per-pupil allocation" for a
district or intermediate district is determined by dividing the
total amount allocated under this section for a fiscal year by the
full-time equated membership total for all pupils approved by the
department to be funded under this section for that fiscal year for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

125
the district or intermediate district.
(3) A district or intermediate district educating pupils
described in this section at a residential child caring institution
may operate, and receive funding under this section for, a
department-approved on-grounds educational program for those pupils
that is longer than 181 days, but not longer than 233 days, if the
child caring institution was licensed as a child caring institution
and offered in 1991-92 an on-grounds educational program that was
longer than 181 days but not longer than 233 days and that was
operated by a district or intermediate district.
(4) Special education pupils funded under section 53a are not
funded under this section.
Sec. 24a. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$1,355,700.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for payments to intermediate
districts for pupils who are placed in juvenile justice service
facilities operated by the department of health and human services.
The amount of the payment to each intermediate district is an
amount equal to the state share of those costs that are clearly and
directly attributable to the educational programs for pupils placed
in facilities described in this section that are located within the
intermediate district's boundaries. The intermediate districts
receiving payments under this section shall cooperate with the
department of health and human services to ensure that all funding
allocated under this section is utilized by the intermediate
district and department of health and human services for
educational programs for pupils described in this section. Pupils
described in this section are not eligible to be funded under
section 24. However, a program responsibility or other fiscal
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

126
responsibility associated with these pupils must not be transferred
from the department of health and human services to a district or
intermediate district unless the district or intermediate district
consents to the transfer.
Sec. 25f. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $1,600,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for payments to strict
discipline academies and qualified districts, as provided under
this section.
(2) To receive funding under this section, a strict discipline
academy or qualified district must first comply with section 25e
and use the pupil transfer process described in that section for
changes in enrollment as prescribed under that section and apply
annually for funding under section 24.
(3) The total amount allocated to a strict discipline academy
or qualified district under this section is equal to the strict
discipline academy's or qualified district's pupil membership in
the immediately preceding year multiplied by an amount calculated
by dividing the total allocation under this section by the total
pupil membership for eligible strict discipline academies and
qualified districts in the immediately preceding year. However, the
sum of the amounts received by a strict discipline academy or
qualified district under this section and under section 24 must not
exceed the product of the strict discipline academy's or qualified
district's per-pupil allocation calculated under section 20
multiplied by the strict discipline academy's or qualified
district's full-time equated membership. The department shall
allocate funds to strict discipline academies and qualified
districts under this section on a monthly basis.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

127
(4) Special education pupils funded under section 53a are not
funded under this section.
(5) The department shall make payments to strict discipline
academies and qualified districts under this section according to
the payment schedule under section 17b.
(6) For purposes of this section, the pupil membership for the
current fiscal year for a qualified district is the actual number
of pupils that are in the custody of a county juvenile agency as
described in subsection (7)(a).
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Qualified district" means a public school academy that is
not a strict discipline academy that enrolls individuals who are in
the custody of a county juvenile agency to which both of the
following are applicable:
(i) The agency had custody of individuals who were enrolled in
a strict discipline academy in the 2020-2021 school year.
(ii) The strict discipline academy that the individuals
described in subparagraph (i) were enrolled in subsequently closed.
(b) "Strict discipline academy" means a public school academy
established under sections 1311b to 1311m of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1311b to 380.1311m.
Sec. 26a. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$14,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 to reimburse districts and
intermediate districts under section 12 of the Michigan renaissance
zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692, for taxes levied in 2024.
2025. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section
11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $14,000,000.00 for
2026-2027 to reimburse districts and intermediate districts under
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

128
section 12 of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL
125.2692, for taxes levied in 2026. The department shall pay the
allocations by not later than 60 days after the department of
treasury certifies to the department and to the state budget
director that the department of treasury has received all necessary
information to properly determine the amounts due to each eligible
recipient.
Sec. 26b. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $5,549,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for payments to
districts, intermediate districts, and community college districts
for the portion of the payment in lieu of taxes obligation that is
attributable to districts, intermediate districts, and community
college districts under section 2154 of the natural resources and
environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.2154.
(2) If the amount appropriated under this section is
insufficient to fully pay obligations under this section, payments
are prorated on an equal basis among all eligible districts,
intermediate districts, and community college districts.
Sec. 26c. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $37,700,000.00 for 2024-2025 and there is allocated an
amount not to exceed $43,300,000.00 for 2025-2026 there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $48,300,000.00 for 2026-2027 to
the promise zone fund created in subsection (3). The funds
allocated under this section reflect the amount of revenue from the
collection of the state education tax captured under section 17 of
the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1677.
(2) Funds allocated to the promise zone fund under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

129
section must be used solely for payments to eligible districts and
intermediate districts, in accordance with section 17 of the
Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1677,
that have a promise zone development plan approved by the
department of treasury under section 7 of the Michigan promise zone
authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1667. Eligible districts and
intermediate districts shall use payments made under this section
for reimbursement for qualified educational expenses as that term
is defined in section 3 of the Michigan promise zone authority act,
2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1663.
(3) The promise zone fund is created as a separate account
within the state school aid fund to be used solely for the purposes
of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL
390.1661 to 390.1679. All of the following apply to the promise
zone fund:
(a) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the
promise zone fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the promise
zone fund interest and earnings from fund investments.
(b) Money in the promise zone fund at the close of a fiscal
year remains in the promise zone fund and does not lapse to the
general fund.
(4) Subject to subsection (2), the state treasurer may make
payments from the promise zone fund to eligible districts and
intermediate districts under the Michigan promise zone authority
act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1661 to 390.1679, to be used for the
purposes of a promise zone authority created under that act.
(5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

130
Sec. 26d. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $14,400,000.00 $19,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 and an amount
not to exceed $21,800,000.00 for reimbursements to intermediate
districts as required under section 15b of the brownfield
redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2665b.
(2) The amounts reimbursed under subsection (1) must be used
by the intermediate district only for the purposes for which the
property taxes were originally levied.
(3) The Michigan strategic fund and the Michigan economic
development corporation shall work with the department of treasury
in identifying the amount of tax revenues that are to be reimbursed
under subsection (1).
(4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of treasury
shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by
the department of treasury.
Sec. 27a. (1) From the educator fellowship public provider
fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-
2026 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00, from the
state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is
allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed
$10,000,000.00, and from the general fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 only an
amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for the MI future educator
fellowship program. The funds allocated under this section must be
used to offset tuition costs for individuals who are working toward
earning their initial teacher certification. At the close of the
fiscal year, money allocated under this section that is unspent
must be deposited as follows:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

131
(a) For state school aid fund money, into the educator
fellowship public provider fund in section 27d.
(b) For general fund money, into the educator fellowship
private provider fund in section 27e.
(2) To establish initial eligibility for an award from funding
under this section, an individual must meet all of the following
conditions by the date of enrollment described in subdivision
(b):(a):
(a) Have graduated from high school with a diploma or
certificate of completion or achieved a high school equivalency
certificate.
(a) (b) Be admitted to an eligible educator preparation
program; be working toward a teacher certification; be enrolled in
enough coursework to be considered enrolled full-time during the
academic year, as determined by the student's educator preparation
program, or the equivalent of full-time participation for
individuals enrolled in an alternative certification program, as
defined by the department; and, for students at institutions of
higher education, be considered at least a junior-level student, as
determined by the institution of higher education.
(b) (c) Not have previously earned a teacher certification.
(c) (d) Timely complete a grant application in a form and
manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
(d) (e) Timely file the Free Application for Federal Student
Aid for the enrollment period described in subdivision (b).(a).
(e) (f) Timely apply for all available gift aid for the
enrollment period described in subdivision (b).(a).
(f) (g) Agree to repay any funds received from funding under
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

132
this section if the individual does not maintain enrollment in
their educator preparation program, the individual does not
successfully complete their educator program, or the individual
does not complete the work requirement described in subsection (7).
(g) (h) Have a high school or college grade point average of
at least 3.0.
(h) (i) Be a resident of this state, as determined for
purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid.
(3) To establish continuing eligibility for an award under
this section at an eligible educator preparation program, an
individual must meet all of the following conditions:
(a) Maintain full-time continuous enrollment in an eligible
educator preparation program, as determined by the educator
preparation program, or the equivalent of full-time participation
for individuals enrolled in an alternative certification program,
as defined by the department, excluding any period of time missed
due to a medical or other emergency, as determined by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(b) Maintain satisfactory academic progress, including a grade
point average of at least 3.0, in courses provided by the eligible
educator preparation program and meet requirements established by
the eligible educator preparation program.
(c) Participate in relevant academic and career advising
programs offered by the eligible educator preparation program.
(d) Timely file the Free Application for Federal Student Aid
for each academic year in which the individual receives an award
from funding under this section.
(e) Timely apply for all available gift aid for each academic
year in which the individual applies for funding under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

133
section.
(f) Maintain residency in this state, as determined for
purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid.
(4) An award under this section must not exceed $10,000.00 per
academic year or the cost of tuition at the eligible educator
preparation program attended, whichever is less. As used in this
subsection, the cost of tuition at an educator preparation program
that is an institution of higher education is the in-district
resident rate plus other required fees, as determined by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential; and
the cost of tuition at an educator preparation program that is an
alternative certification provider is the cost of tuition plus
other required fees, as determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential.
(5) Awards under this section must be distributed to eligible
educator preparation programs on behalf of an eligible recipient on
a timeline determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
(6) Pending available funds, applicants may renew their award
for up to 3 years, or until program completion, whichever comes
first.
(7) To be an eligible recipient of fellowship funding under
this section, an individual must pledge to work as a certified
teacher in a public school or a qualifying public preschool program
in this state and must meet 1 of the following work requirements:
(a) For a recipient of funding under this section who received
an award for 1 academic year, 3 years of work as a certified
teacher in a public school or a qualifying public preschool program
in this state.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

134
(b) For a recipient of funding under this section who received
an award for 2 academic years, 4 years of work as a certified
teacher in a public school or a qualifying public preschool program
in this state.
(c) For a recipient of funding under this section who received
an award for 3 academic years, 5 years of work as a certified
teacher in a public school or a qualifying public preschool program
in this state.
(d) For a recipient working in a critical needs district, 3
years of work as a certified teacher. As used in this subdivision,
"critical needs district" means a district with a median household
income in the lowest quartile in each prosperity region, as
determined by the department.
(8) If an award recipient does not maintain enrollment in
their educator preparation program as required under subsection
(3)(a), does not successfully complete their educator preparation
program, or does not meet the work requirement described in
subsection (7), any amount received from funds under this section
converts to a 0% interest loan that must be repaid to this state
within 10 years, plus any deferment period as determined and
approved by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential. The amount of repayment must be reduced proportionate to
the number of years worked in schools or qualifying public
preschool programs in this state as a certificated teacher out of 5
years. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall develop guidance to enforce this subsection.
(9) An individual may not concurrently receive funding through
programs funded under this section and grow your own programs
funded under section 27b.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

135
(10) If the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient
to fully fund awards under this section, there is appropriated from
the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d or the
educator fellowship private provider fund in section 27e, as
applicable, the amount necessary to fully fund these programs. The
state budget director shall provide notification to the house and
senate appropriations subcommittees on K to 12 school aid and the
house and senate fiscal agencies for any additional appropriation
described under this subsection.
(11) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under
this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential.
(12) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall report to the chairpersons of the house
appropriations subcommittee on school aid and education and the
senate appropriations subcommittee on pre-K to 12 by February 15 of
the current fiscal year. The report must include the following:
(a) The number and amount of awards granted in the previous
fiscal year.
(b) The number of recipients in the previous fiscal year that
had their awards converted to loans under subsection (8).
(13) As used in this section, "eligible educator preparation
program" means a public or nonpublic institution of higher
education or an alternative route provider that meets all of the
following, as applicable:
(a) Is approved by the department to offer teacher preparation
programming.
(b) Enrolls 1 or more future educator fellowship recipients.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

136
(c) Has not been deemed as ineligible to receive Michigan
achievement scholarship funding under section 248 as a result of
exceeding tuition restraint requirements described in section 248.
(d) Includes, as part of its required educator preparation
coursework, pedagogical methods grounded in the science of reading.
If an educator preparation program does not include pedagogical
methods grounded in the science of reading, the program may
maintain eligibility by providing to the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential a detailed public plan, in a
form and manner determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, to comply with section 1531e of the
revised school code, MCL 380.1531e, by not later than September 30,
2027.
Sec. 27b. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only
an amount not to exceed $70,000,000.00 to districts, intermediate
districts, and consortia of intermediate districts for grow your
own programs and educator development programs as described in this
section and subject to subsection (5), and there is allocated for
2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $25,000,000.00 to districts,
intermediate districts, and consortia of intermediate districts for
grow your own programs, educator workforce innovation programs, and
educator development and retention programs as described in this
section.
(2) The department shall establish a competitive grant process
to distribute funds under this section. A district, intermediate
district, or consortium of intermediate districts must apply for
funds in a form and manner prescribed by the department. As part of
the application described in this subsection, a district,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

137
intermediate district, or consortium of intermediate districts must
submit the following information and assurances:
(a) Demonstrated need for funding in the district,
intermediate district, or consortium of intermediate districts or
the broader community, including projected workforce needs, and a
proposed spending plan on how the funds will be utilized that
includes, but is not limited to, administrative costs, expected
tuition, fees, and books for the program.
(b) Number of support staff projected to participate in a
program described in this section.
(c) The planned activities for programs described in this
section.
(d) Projected outcomes of programs described in this section,
which must include, but are not limited to, the following:
(i) Teacher and school leader retention and satisfaction.
(ii) Teacher and school leader efficacy.
(iii) Anticipated school or district partners, evidenced by
signed partnership agreements.
(iv) Beginning in 2026-2027, demonstration of addressing
projected workforce needs.
(e) Assurances that the programs described in this section
will be no cost for participants and that participants will be
compensated as an employee for the duration of their training,
including a paid residency, fellowship, or student teaching.
(f) Beginning in 2026-2027, assurances that any educator
preparation program partnering with the district, intermediate
district, or consortium of intermediate districts to support a grow
your own program under this section is approved by the department
for the preparation of teachers in this state.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

138
(3) Recipients of grants under this section must submit
performance reports to the department not less than twice per year.
Each report must include the following information:
(a) (i) The number of program participants served and retention
in the program or district.
(b) (ii) Qualitative and quantitative participant feedback.
(c) (iii) Evidence of efficacy and progress toward projected
outcomes.
(4) The department shall ensure that all performance reports
required under subsection (3) are made publicly available on the
department's website.
(5) Grant awards under this section must be structured into 3
tiers, as described in subsections (6), (8), (9), and (11). (12),
or be used for the purposes described in subsection (17). All
programs funded under this section must address a measurable and
critical problem related to the health and efficacy of this state's
education talent working in Michigan schools and be data- and
research-driven, demonstrating effectiveness against intended and
measurable outcomes.
(6) Funding For 2025-2026 only, funding for tier 1 grant
awards must not exceed $50,000,000.00, unless otherwise directed by
the legislature. The In 2025-2026, the department shall allocate at
least 1 tier 1 grant of not less than $40,000,000.00. Tier Subject
to subsection (7), tier 1 grants must sustain or further scale grow
your own programs or educator development programs that meet all of
the following criteria:
(a) Have For 2025-2026 only, have been in operation in this
state for at least 5 years, and evaluated for at least 2 years by a
rigorous, independent Michigan-based evaluator, and results of the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

139
program have been made publicly available.
(b) Have For 2025-2026 only, have at least 2 consecutive years
of public financial audits of the program with no material
findings.
(c) Demonstrate For 2025-2026 only, demonstrate broad
geographic reach and investment into teachers and school leaders at
every experience level, in partnerships established with not fewer
than 15 local education agencies across both urban and rural
regions, that extend back to the start of the 2023-2024 school
year, bound by written agreements that include data sharing with an
independent evaluator for evaluation purposes.
(d) Generate For 2025-2026 only, generate private matching
funds.
(e) For 2026-2027, have been in operation at least 3 years.
(f) For 2026-2027, demonstrate a proven track record of
success, as evidenced by internal data showing both of the
following:
(i) High rates of educator retention within the profession or
participating districts after program completion.
(ii) Active and ongoing engagement and partnership with school
districts in each of the state's intermediate districts.
(g) For 2026-2027, operate as a statewide program,
demonstrating the ability to serve a geographically diverse
population, including both urban and rural areas.
(h) For 2026-2027, have a demonstrated track record of
receiving private philanthropic or corporate funding.
(7) For 2025-2026 only, tier 1 grants under subsection (6) may
be used to support operating costs associated with teacher
recruitment, retention, development, innovation, and evaluation
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

140
costs.
(8) (7) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated in 2025-
2026 for programs described in subsection (6) may be available for
expenditure until September 30, 2029. A recipient of funding for a
program described in subsection (6) must return any unexpended
funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the department by
not later than October 30, 2029.
(9) (8) Tier 2 grants must scale or sustain grow your own
programs or educator development programs that meet all of the
following criteria:
(a) Have For 2025-2026 only, have been in operation for at
least 3 years.
(b) Demonstrate For 2025-2026 only, demonstrate promising
internal results, but are not yet supported by an independent
evaluation.
(c) Serve For 2025-2026 only, serve a geographically diverse
population, including both urban and rural areas.
(d) Have a demonstrated track record of receiving private
philanthropic or corporate funding.
(e) For 2026-2027, have been in operation for at least 4
years.
(f) For 2026-2027, serve both K to 12 and the early childhood
educator pipelines in a geographically diverse population,
including both urban and rural areas.
(g) For 2026-2027, demonstrate promising internal results and
have contracted with a third-party vendor.
(h) For 2026-2027, have a demonstrated track record of
launching grow your own programs with more than 100 participants in
geographically diverse areas of the state.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

141
(i) For 2026-2027, have partnered with at least 6 school
districts to adopt innovative staffing models, including strategic
staffing.
(j) For 2026-2027, have led at least 1 program that supports
updates and improvements to educator preparation programs.
(10) (9) Grant For 2025-2026 only, grant awards for programs
described in subsection (8) (9) must not exceed $12,500,000.00 per
year.
(11) (10) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated in
2025-2026 for programs described in subsection (8) (9) may be
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027. A recipient of
funding in 2025-2026 for a program described in subsection (8) (9)
must return any unexpended funds to the department in a manner
prescribed by the department by not later than October 30, 2027.
(12) (11) Tier 3 grants must fund pilot-stage or early-stage
grow your own programs or educator development programs that meet
all of the following criteria:
(a) Have For 2025-2026 only, have been in operation for fewer
than 2 years.
(b) Do not yet have independent evaluation data available.
(c) Are limited in scope or geography.
(d) Include a documented path to scale or expand the program
to serve more educators or additional districts.
(13) (12) Grant For 2025-2026 only, grant awards for programs
described in subsection (11) (12) must not exceed $5,000,000.00 per
year.
(14) (13) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated in
2025-2026 for programs described in subsection (11) (12) may be
available for expenditure until September 30, 2027. A recipient of
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

142
funding for a program described in subsection (11) (12) must return
any unexpended funds to the department in a manner prescribed by
the department by not later than October 30, 2027.
(15) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated in 2026-2027
for programs described in this section may be available for
expenditure for up to 3 fiscal years after the fiscal year in which
funds were made available to the program. A recipient of funding
for a program under this section must return any unexpended funds
to the department in a manner and time frame prescribed by the
department.
(16) (14) An individual may not concurrently receive funding
for programs under this section and programs funded under sections
27a and 27c.
(17) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1) for 2026-2027, an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00
may be awarded by the department for school librarian specialist
certification grants. These grants may be awarded to eligible grow
your own programs, educator development programs, or other programs
that provide a pathway for certified teachers to receive a school
librarian specialist (NQ) endorsement from the department. In
awarding grants under this subsection, the department shall
prioritize awards for applicants serving in schools that have
libraries but do not have staff with an NQ endorsement.
(18) (15) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall
make payments under this section by not later than December 15,
2025.2026.
(19) The funds allocated under this section for 2026-2027 are
a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-
2027 are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

143
project is to continue funding supports for grow your own educator
programs. The estimated completion date of the work project is
September 30, 2031.
Sec. 27c. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $30,000,000.00 for
2025-2026 2026-2027 and from the educator fellowship public
provider fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated
$20,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the MI future educator
student teacher stipend program. Except as otherwise provided in
this section, the funds allocated under this section must be paid
to eligible educator preparation programs for payments to eligible
student teachers working in a district. At the close of the fiscal
year, state school aid fund money allocated under this section that
is unspent must be deposited into the educator fellowship public
provider fund in section 27d.
(2) An eligible student teacher under this subsection must
meet all of the following:
(a) The individual must be admitted to an eligible educator
preparation program, be working toward a teacher certification, and
be participating in required student teaching coursework. As used
in this subdivision, "required student teaching coursework" means
credit hours, or the program equivalent, required by an eligible
educator preparation program for successful completion of the
program. This coursework must include regular placement in a
district where the student gains real-world, first-hand experience
working in a classroom, teaching students, engaging in the day-to-
day activities of a certified teacher, and working daily under the
guidance of a certified teacher.
(b) The individual must timely complete an application in a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

144
form and manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential. The application must include the
district in which the individual is working as a student teacher
and must include a certification by the district and the
individual's eligible educator preparation program that the student
is working as a student teacher. If the individual's eligible
educator preparation program is not provided by a public
institution of higher education, the district in which the
individual is working must also provide an assurance that they will
forward any amount received under this section from the department
of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for purposes of
the program described in this section to the individual's eligible
educator preparation program.
(c) The individual must not have received a payment from funds
under this subsection previously, unless the individual is enrolled
in an eligible educator preparation program that requires multiple
semesters of student teaching. An individual may receive not more
than 2 awards under this section.
(d) If an individual is employed by their district as a
teacher of record, they are not eligible for payment under this
section.
(e) An individual that is a current City Year corps member
enrolled in an eligible educator preparation program is eligible
for payment under this section.
(3) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall pay each eligible educator preparation program an
amount not to exceed $9,600.00 per academic semester for each
eligible student teacher working in a district. If the individual's
eligible educator preparation program is not provided by a public
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

145
institution of higher education, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall pay an amount not to
exceed $9,600.00 per academic semester to the district in which the
individual is working as a student teacher, and that district must
forward the amount received to the individual's eligible educator
preparation program. It is intended that payments under this
subsection are made at the beginning of the semester in 1 lump sum
for eligible student teachers.
(4) Eligible educator preparation programs shall pay funds
received under this section, in entirety, to the eligible student
teacher.
(5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under
this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential.
(6) If the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient
to fully fund awards under this section, there is appropriated from
the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d the
amount necessary to fully fund the programs described in this
section. The state budget director shall notify the house and
senate appropriations subcommittees on K to 12 school aid and the
house and senate fiscal agencies of any additional appropriation
described in this subsection.
(7) As used in this section, "eligible educator preparation
program" means an institution of higher education that meets all of
the following:
(a) Is a public or private institution of higher education in
this state.
(b) Has an established school of education with an educator
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

146
preparation program approved by the department.
(c) Has not been deemed as ineligible to receive Michigan
achievement scholarship funding under section 248 as a result of
exceeding tuition restraint requirements described in section 248.
(d) Includes, as part of its required educator preparation
coursework, pedagogical methods grounded in the science of reading.
If an educator preparation program does not meet this standard, the
program may maintain eligibility by providing to the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential a detailed public
plan, in a form and manner determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential, to comply with section 1531e
of the revised school code, MCL 380.1531e, by not later than
September 30, 2027.
Sec. 27j. (1) The student loan repayment assistance reserve
fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid
fund. to provide supplemental funding for the student loan
repayment assistance program in section 27k.
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the student loan repayment assistance
reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of
the student loan repayment assistance reserve fund. The state
treasurer shall credit to the student loan repayment assistance
reserve fund interest and earnings from student loan repayment
assistance reserve fund investments.
(3) Money in the student loan repayment assistance reserve
fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the student loan
repayment assistance reserve fund and does not lapse lapses to the
state school aid fund.
(4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

147
student loan repayment assistance reserve fund for auditing
purposes.
(5) Money available in the student loan repayment assistance
reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation.
(6) At the close of each fiscal year, unspent funds from state
sources allocated in section 27k must be deposited into the student
loan repayment assistance reserve fund created in this section.
Sec. 27l. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated
in section 11, there is allocated $203,000,000.00 $150,000,000.00
for 2024-2025 only, and from the MPSERS obligation reform reserve
fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated the
remaining balance, estimated at $147,300,000.00 for 2024-2025 2026-
2027 only to districts and intermediate districts for the purposes
of this section. The state school aid fund allocation in this
section is conditional on the effective issuance of a directive by
the state budget director, pursuant to section 451a of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.451a, to lapse all
remaining funding from a work project that was established under
section 27k in 2023-2024. The amount allocated from the state
school aid fund under this section may not exceed the amount lapsed
from the work project as described in the immediately preceding
sentence.
(2) The state school aid fund money allocated in subsection
(1) is allocated to districts and intermediate districts in an
equal amount per pupil. Subject to subsection (3), (2), a district
or intermediate district shall use all of the funding allocated
under this subsection to increase compensation for educators in the
district or intermediate district.
(2) (3) If there are 1 or multiple labor unions representing
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

148
educators in the district or intermediate district, the district or
intermediate district shall bargain any increases in compensation
under subsection (2) (1) with those unions. All payments to
educators made by districts or intermediate districts with funds
allocated under subsection (2) (1) shall be in addition to any
existing compensation negotiated in a collective bargaining
agreement.
(4) The MPSERS obligation reform reserve fund money allocated
in subsection (1) is allocated for payments to participating
entities to offset normal costs associated with retiree health
benefits. The amount allocated to each participating entity under
this subsection must be based on the participating entity's
proportion of the total funding distributed in 2024-2025 under
section 147g. Participating entities must use funding distributed
under this subsection as an offset for normal costs associated with
retiree health benefits.
(3) (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
(6) The funds allocated under this section for 2024-2025 are a
work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-2025
are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project
is to increase compensation for educators and offset normal costs
associated with retiree health care benefits. The estimated
completion date of the work project is September 30, 2026.
(4) The funds appropriated under this section for payments to
educators are intended as 1-time bonus payments. Pursuant to
section 3a(3) of the public school employees retirement act of
1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1303a, payments under this section are
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

149
not considered compensation for retirement purposes and are not
subject to member or employer contribution requirements under the
Michigan public school employees' retirement system (MPSERS).
(5) (7) As used in this section, :
(a) "Educator" includes, but is not limited to, teachers,
librarians, speech therapists, language therapists, physical
therapists, occupational therapists, school counselors, school
social workers, school psychologists, school nurses,
paraprofessionals aids, food service workers, custodians, bus
drivers, and literacy coaches. Educator also includes any other
school employee covered under a collective bargaining agreement.
(b) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate
district, district library, or community college that is a
reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement
system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979,
1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to
the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the
applicable fiscal year.
Sec. 27m. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2023-2024
only, $4,000,000.00 Subject to the provisions in this subsection,
and in addition to the funds appropriated in section 11, from the
state school aid fund, there is appropriated and allocated an
amount not to exceed $2,900,000.00 to districts and intermediate
districts to fund financial awards to eligible Michigan teachers
who hold National Board Certification. The appropriation and
allocation under this subsection is contingent on the effective
issuance of a directive by the budget director, pursuant to section
451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

150
to lapse the remaining funding from a work project that was
established under this section in 2023-2024. The amount allocated
under this subsection may not exceed the amount lapsed from the
work project referenced in the immediately preceding sentence.
(2) A district or intermediate district must apply in a form
and manner determined by the department. Awards must be granted as
$4,000.00 to all eligible teachers who hold National Board
Certification, and an additional $6,000.00 for eligible teachers
who hold National Board Certification and serve in Title I schools.
(3) To be eligible to receive an award, eligible teachers must
meet the following, as applicable:
(a) Be employed in classroom teaching at least 50% of the
teacher's full-time hours, as determined by the district or
intermediate district.
(b) To receive an award under subsection (4), hold National
Board Certification by January 1, 2024.
(4) Subject to subsection (6), and notwithstanding section
17b, awards under subsection (2) must be paid to the districts and
intermediate districts by April 30, 2024.
(5) If the amount allocated under subsection (1) is
insufficient to fully make payments to all eligible participants as
required under subsection (1), the department shall prorate the
amount paid to districts and intermediate districts to distribute
to all eligible participants on an equal basis.
(3) (6) If funding remains after the awards under subsection
(4) are granted, the The department shall grant additional awards
under subsection (2) this section on a first-come, first-served
basis. An eligible teacher may receive more than 1 award under
subsection (2), but shall not receive more than 1 award in a single
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

151
fiscal year.
(7) In addition to the funds allocated in subsection (1), an
amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for 2023-2024 only from the
state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 must be used
for eligible teachers to cover National Board for Professional
Teaching Standards Certification fees for first-time candidates in
Title I schools.
(8) A district or intermediate district shall apply for
funding under subsection (7) in a form and manner determined by the
department. The department shall approve applications under
subsection (7) on a first-come, first-served basis. Notwithstanding
section 17b, awards under subsection (7) must be paid on a schedule
determined by the department.
(4) (9) The funds allocated under this section for 2023-2024
2026-2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended
funds for 2023-2024 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2024-2025.
2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to enable and
encourage teachers to get National Board Certification. The
estimated completion date of the work project is September 30,
2026.2031.
(5) The funds appropriated under this section are intended as
1-time bonus payments. Pursuant to section 3a(3) of the public
school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1303a,
these payments are not considered compensation for retirement
purposes and are not subject to member or employer contribution
requirements under the Michigan public school employees' retirement
system (MPSERS).
(6) (10) As used in this section, "eligible teacher" includes
individuals who hold a valid or expired Michigan teaching
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

152
certificate and are employed by the district or intermediate
district as teachers, including those in teacher leadership roles
as a peer assistance and review coach, mentor, or other teacher
support provider if the position does not require a school
administrator certificate.
Sec. 28. (1) To recognize differentiated instructional costs
for different types of pupils as well as additional costs to
provide essential services in 2025-2026, 2026-2027, the following
sections provide a weighted foundation allocation or an additional
payment of some type in the following amounts, as allocated under
those sections:
(a) Section 22b, weighted foundation payment,
$1,696,087,600.00.
(b) (a) Section 22d, isolated and rural districts,
$12,873,100.00.$13,772,300.00.
(c) (b) Section 22l, transportation reimbursement,
$125,000,000.00.$150,000,000.00.
(c) Section 29, declining enrollment, $71,000,000.00.
(d) Section 31a, at risk, $1,293,655,000.00.
(d) (e) Section 32d, great start readiness program,
$656,217,600.00.$794,667,600.00.
(f) Section 41, bilingual education for English language
learners, $62,732,600.00.
(e) (g) Section 51c, special education, mandated percentages,
$1,107,900,000.00.$1,140,700,000.00.
(f) (h) Section 54d, early on, $23,670,700.00.$25,120,700.00.
(g) (i) Section 61a, career and technical education, standard
reimbursement, $41,733,800.00.$44,233,800.00.
(j) Section 61d, career and technical education incentives,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

153
$13,400,000.00.
(h) Section 61b, career and technical education, early middle
college and career and technical education, $8,868,000.00.
(2) The funding described in subsection (1) is not a separate
allocation of any funding but is instead a listing of funding
allocated in the sections listed in subsection (1).
Sec. 30d. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $200,000,000.00 for 2025-2026, 2026-2027, and from the
general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated
an amount not to exceed $1,600,000.00 for 2025-2026 only 2026-2027
for the purpose of making payments to participating entities to
provide free school lunch and breakfast to public school and
nonpublic school pupils in grades pre-K to 12.
(2) To receive funding under this section, a participating
entity must participate in the National School Lunch Program and
School Breakfast Program and must do all of the following:
(a) Provide reimbursable breakfasts and reimbursable lunches
at no cost to all students for any school breakfast program or
school lunch program operated by the participating entity.
(b) Submit information regarding the number of reimbursable
breakfasts and reimbursable lunches served in a manner prescribed
by the department.
(c) Maximize federal reimbursement for reimbursable breakfasts
and reimbursable lunches by operating under the CEP if the
participating entity has an identified student percentage greater
than or equal to the minimum requirement to be eligible to
participate in the CEP. For purposes of this subdivision, all
eligible participating entities must elect CEP on behalf of a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

154
single school, a group or groups of schools, or all schools in the
participating entity, as applicable, in a manner that maximizes
federal reimbursement.
(d) Meet all applicable state and federal standards in its
school breakfast and lunch programs, as determined by the
department.
(e) Take all efforts to maximize and implement policies that
require parents or guardians to fill out relevant family income
information, in a manner prescribed by the department, for the
purposes of determining student eligibility for federal free or
reduced cost meal reimbursement rates and CEP eligibility
determinations.
(f) Forgive all school meal debt related to federally
reimbursable meals, as determined by the department.
(3) Participating entities are encouraged to offer meals that
meet students' dietary restrictions, including the provision of
gluten-free meals, vegetarian meals, vegan meals, and, upon
request, kosher meals, halal meals, and meals meeting any allergy
restrictions as confirmed by a doctor's note. Participating
entities are encouraged to purchase food from Michigan growers when
possible and practical.
(4) For each eligible participating entity, the department
shall pay an amount equal to the following:
(a) The amount equal to the federal rate per student paid per
pupil per free breakfast and lunch under the Child Nutrition Act
child nutrition act of 1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to 1793, and the
Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, national school lunch
act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, multiplied by the number of breakfasts
and lunches provided by the participating entity to students, less
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

155
the federal revenue received by the participating entity under the
school breakfast program and the school lunch program under the
Child Nutrition Act child nutrition act of 1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to
1793, and the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act,
national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, and other state
lunch payments received under section 31d.
(b) The amount equal to the federal rate per student paid per
pupil per free breakfast and lunch under the Child Nutrition Act
child nutrition act of 1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to 1793, and the
Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, national school lunch
act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, multiplied by the number of breakfasts
and lunches provided by the participating entity, as applicable, to
children participating in the Great Start Readiness Program under
section 32d at the participating entity, less all other federal and
state lunch payments made for those children. For purposes of this
subdivision, compliance with 7 CFR 226.9 is required. The
department shall assign rates of reimbursement pursuant to 7 CFR
226.9, at least annually, on the basis of family size and income
information reported by each eligible participating entity.
Assigned rates of reimbursement must be adjusted annually to
reflect changes in the national average payment rates.
(5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department may make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "CEP" means the Community Eligibility Provision under the
Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, national school lunch
act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j.
(b) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

156
district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf
and Blind.
(7) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if the
amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully
reimburse districts for meals as required in this section, there is
appropriated from the school meals reserve fund created in section
30e the amount necessary to fully fund these reimbursements.
Sec. 31a. (1) There is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not
to exceed $1,336,805,000.00 from the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11 and an amount not to exceed
$1,500,000.00 from the general fund money appropriated in section
11 for payments to eligible districts and eligible public school
academies for the purposes of ensuring that pupils are proficient
in English language arts by the end of grade 3, that pupils are
proficient in mathematics by the end of grade 8, that pupils are
attending school regularly, that high school graduates are career
and college ready, and for the purposes under subsections (7), (8),
and (23).
(2) For a district or public school academy to be eligible to
receive funding under this section, other than funding under
subsection (7), (8), or (23), the district or public school
academy, for grades K to 12, must comply with the requirements
under section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f, and
must use resources to address early literacy and numeracy, and for
at least grades K to 12 or, if the district or public school
academy does not operate all of grades K to 12, for all of the
grades it operates, must implement a multi-tiered system of
supports that is an evidence-based framework that uses data driven
problem solving to integrate academic and behavioral instruction
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

157
and that uses intervention delivered to all pupils in varying
intensities based on pupil needs. The multi-tiered system of
supports described in this subsection must provide at least all of
the following essential components:
(a) Team-based leadership.
(b) A tiered delivery system.
(c) Selection and implementation of instruction,
interventions, and supports.
(d) A comprehensive screening and assessment system.
(e) Continuous data-based decision making.
(3) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to
exceed $1,293,655,000.00 to continue a weighted foundation per
pupil payment for districts and public school academies enrolling
economically disadvantaged pupils. The department shall pay under
this subsection to each eligible district or eligible public school
academy an amount per pupil equal to a percentage calculated under
subsection (4) multiplied by the target foundation allowance for
the following, as applicable:
(a) Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (b), (c),
or (d) the greater of the following:
(i) The number of membership pupils in the district or public
school academy who are determined to be economically disadvantaged,
as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the
center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil
membership count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year.
(ii) If the district or public school academy is in the
community eligibility program, the number of pupils determined to
be eligible based on the product of the identified student
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

158
percentage multiplied by the total number of pupils in the district
or public school academy, as reported to the center in the form and
manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday
after the pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding
fiscal year. These calculations must be made at the building level.
This subparagraph only applies to an eligible district or eligible
public school academy for the fiscal year immediately following the
first fiscal year in which it is in the community eligibility
program. As used in this subparagraph, "identified student
percentage" means the quotient of the number of pupils in an
eligible district or eligible public school academy who are
determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the
center in a form and manner prescribed by the center, not later
than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day in
the fiscal year preceding the first fiscal year in which the
eligible district or eligible public school academy is in the
community eligibility program, divided by the total number of
pupils counted in an eligible district or eligible public school
academy on the pupil membership count day in the fiscal year
preceding the first fiscal year in which the eligible district or
eligible public school academy is in the community eligibility
program.
(b) If the district or public school academy began operations
as a district or public school academy after the pupil membership
count day of the immediately preceding school year, the number of
membership pupils in the district or public school academy who are
determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the
center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later
than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

159
the current fiscal year.
(c) If the district or public school academy began operations
as a district or public school academy after the pupil membership
count day of the current fiscal year, the number of membership
pupils in the district or public school academy who are determined
to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the
form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth
Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the current fiscal
year.
(d) If, for a particular fiscal year, the number of membership
pupils in a district or public school academy who are determined
under subdivision (a) to be economically disadvantaged or to be
eligible based on the identified student percentage varies by more
than 20 percentage points from the number of those pupils in the
district or public school academy as calculated under subdivision
(a) for the immediately preceding fiscal year caused by an
egregious reporting error by the district or public school academy,
the department may choose to have the calculations under
subdivision (a) instead be made using the number of membership
pupils in the district or public school academy who are determined
to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the
form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth
Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the immediately
preceding fiscal year.
(4) Each district or public school academy must be assigned an
opportunity index score each fiscal year, the value of which is the
quotient of the number of economically disadvantaged pupils as
determined under subsection (3) for the district or public school
academy and the total number of pupils in the district or public
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

160
school academy in the immediately preceding fiscal year, multiplied
by 100 and rounded up to the nearest whole number. Each district or
public school academy must be assigned an opportunity index band as
follows:
(a) A district or public school academy with an opportunity
index score greater than or equal to 0 but less than 20 must be
assigned to band 1 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection
(3) at a rate of at least 35.0% and less than 36.0%. The
reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal
to the district's opportunity index score minus 1, multiplied by
the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus
35.0%.
(b) A district or public school academy with an opportunity
index score greater than or equal to 20 but less than 44 must be
assigned to band 2 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection
(3) at a rate of at least 36.0% and less than 37.5%. The
reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal
to the district's opportunity index score minus 20, multiplied by
the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus
36.0%.
(c) A district or public school academy with an opportunity
index score greater than or equal to 44 but less than 59 must be
assigned to band 3 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection
(3) at a rate of at least 37.5% and less than 39.0%. The
reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal
to the district's opportunity index score minus 44, multiplied by
the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus
37.5%.
(d) A district or public school academy with an opportunity
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

161
index score greater than or equal to 59 but less than 73 must be
assigned to band 4 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection
(3) at a rate of at least 39.0% and less than 42.0%. The
reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal
to the district's opportunity index score minus 59, multiplied by
the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus
39.0%.
(e) A district or public school academy with an opportunity
index score greater than or equal to 73 but less than 85 must be
assigned to band 5 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection
(3) at a rate of at least 42.0% and less than 47.0%. The
reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal
to the district's opportunity index score minus 73, multiplied by
the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus
42.0%.
(f) A district or public school academy with an opportunity
index score greater than or equal to 85 must be assigned to band 6
and shall receive reimbursement under subsection (3) at a rate of
47.0%.
(g) As used in this subsection, "band adjustment factor" means
an amount equal to the difference between the lowest and highest
reimbursement bounds for each band, divided by the number of
possible opportunity index scores in that band.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a district
or public school academy receiving funding under this section shall
use that money only to provide instructional programs and direct
noninstructional services, including, but not limited to, medical,
mental health, or counseling services, for at-risk pupils; for
school health clinics; and for the purposes of subsection (6), (7),
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

162
(8), or (23). In addition, a district that is a school district of
the first class or a district or public school academy in which at
least 50% of the pupils in membership were determined to be
economically disadvantaged in the immediately preceding state
fiscal year, as determined and reported as described in subsection
(3), may use the funds it receives under this section for school
security or school parent liaison personnel. The uses of the funds
described in the immediately preceding sentence must align to the
needs assessment and the multi-tiered system of supports model and,
for funds spent on parent liaison personnel, must connect parents
to the school community. A district or public school academy shall
not use any of the money received under this section for
administrative costs. The instruction or direct noninstructional
services provided under this section may be conducted before or
after regular school hours or by adding extra school days to the
school year.
(6) A district or public school academy that receives funds
under this section and that operates a school breakfast program
under section 1272a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1272a,
shall use from the funds received under this section an amount, not
to exceed $10.00 per pupil for whom the district or public school
academy receives funds under this section, necessary to pay for
costs associated with the operation of the school breakfast
program.
(7) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for
2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $33,000,000.00, to
support primary health care services provided to children and
adolescents up to age 21. These funds must be expended in a form
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

163
and manner determined jointly by the department and the department
of health and human services. When making funding decisions for new
adolescent health centers under this subsection, the department and
department of health and human services shall prioritize support
for primary health care services in unserved and underserved
counties as determined by the department of health and human
services. An amount equal to 4% of the funds allocated under this
subsection must be made available for technical support and
coordination services from a nonprofit organization exclusively
dedicated to serving adolescent health centers in this state and
that has a membership that includes federally qualified health
centers, local public health departments, hospital systems, and
public school districts. As a requirement of being awarded the
funds under this subsection as prescribed under this subsection, a
nonprofit organization described in this subsection shall make
readily available technical support and coordination services to
all child and adolescent health centers in this state.
(2) (8) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for
2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $10,150,000.00 for the
state portion of the hearing and vision screenings as described in
part 93 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9301 to
333.9329, and, from the general state school aid fund money
allocated under subsection (1), appropriated in section 11, there
is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed
$1,500,000.00 for the state portion of the dental screenings as
described in part 93 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL
333.9301 to 333.9329. A local public health department shall pay at
least 50% of the total cost of the screenings. The frequency of the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

164
vision screenings must be as required under R 325.13091 to R
325.13096 of the Michigan Administrative Code and the frequency of
the hearing screenings must be as required under R 325.3271 to R
325.3276 of the Michigan Administrative Code. Funds must be awarded
in a form and manner approved jointly by the department and the
department of health and human services.
(3) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments to eligible entities under this subsection section on a
schedule determined by the department.
(9) Each district or public school academy receiving funds
under this section shall submit to the department by July 15 of
each fiscal year a report, in the form and manner prescribed by the
department, that includes a brief description of each program
conducted or services performed by the district or public school
academy using funds under this section, the amount of funds under
this section allocated to each of those programs or services, the
total number of at-risk pupils served by each of those programs or
services, and the data necessary for the department and the
department of health and human services to verify matching funds
for the temporary assistance for needy families program. In
prescribing the form and manner of the report, the department shall
ensure that districts are allowed to expend funds received under
this section on any activities that are permissible under this
section. If a district or public school academy does not comply
with this subsection, the department shall withhold an amount equal
to the August payment due under this section until the district or
public school academy complies with this subsection. If the
district or public school academy does not comply with this
subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the withheld funds are
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

165
forfeited to the school aid fund.
(10) To receive funds under this section, a district or public
school academy must allow access for the department or the
department's designee to audit all records related to the program
for which it receives those funds. The district or public school
academy shall reimburse the state for all disallowances found in
the audit.
(11) Subject to subsections (6), (7), (8), and (23), for
schools in which more than 40% of pupils are identified as at-risk,
a district or public school academy may use the funds it receives
under this section to implement tier 1, evidence-based practices in
schoolwide reforms that are guided by the district's comprehensive
needs assessment and are included in the district improvement plan.
Schoolwide reforms must include parent and community supports,
activities, and services, that may include the pathways to
potential program created by the department of health and human
services or the communities in schools program. As used in this
subsection, "tier 1, evidence-based practices" means research based
instruction and classroom interventions that are available to all
learners and effectively meet the needs of most pupils.
(12) A district or public school academy that receives funds
under this section may use those funds to provide research based
professional development and to implement a coaching model that
supports the multi-tiered system of supports framework.
Professional development may be provided to district and school
leadership and teachers and must be aligned to professional
learning standards; integrated into district, school building, and
classroom practices; and solely related to the following:
(a) Implementing the multi-tiered system of supports required
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

166
in subsection (2) with fidelity and utilizing the data from that
system to inform curriculum and instruction.
(b) Implementing section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL
380.1280f, as required under subsection (2), with fidelity.
(13) A district or public school academy that receives funds
under subsection (3) may use funds received under subsection (3)
for support staff providing services to at-risk pupils.
(14) A district or public school academy may use up to 60% of
the funds it receives under this section for the following
purposes:
(a) Up to 30% to reduce the teacher to pupil ratio in grades K
to 3.
(b) Up to 30% to support retention and recruitment efforts
that help reduce staff turnover and vacancies of instructional and
support staff if the district or public school academy is assigned
to opportunity index band 4, 5, or 6.
(15) Funds used as described in subsection (14) must align
with the needs assessment and the multi-tiered system of supports
model. A district or public school academy shall not use any of the
money described in subsection (14) for administrative costs or to
supplant existing funding, including, but not limited to,
maintaining existing salaries or costs. A district or public school
academy shall report its intent to use funds described in
subsection (14) to the department by not later than November 1 of
the current fiscal year.
(16) A district or public school academy determined to be
eligible to use a portion of funds received under subsection (3)
for the purposes described in subsection (14) retains the ability
to use funding for the purposes described in subsection (14) for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

167
the fiscal year in which eligibility was determined plus 2
additional fiscal years beyond that fiscal year.
(17) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026,
and each year thereafter, for a district receiving funding under
this section through the opportunity index formula, the district
must provide a report to parents or legal guardians that details
the amount of funding received under that allocation, how the
district distributed that funding in a way to target buildings with
the highest needs, and what evidence-based interventions were
implemented with those dollars. The report must include a method,
including contact information, for parents or legal guardians to
provide feedback on the use of these dollars as well as to seek
more information about services and interventions available for
their children.
(18) A district or public school academy that receives funds
under this section may use up to 10% of the funds received under
this section to provide evidence-based instruction for pre-
kindergarten instructional and noninstructional services to at-risk
pupils.
(19) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if
necessary, the department shall prorate payments under this
section, except payments under subsection (7), (8), or (23), by
reducing the amount of the allocation as otherwise calculated under
this section by an equal percentage per district. Subject to the
availability of funds, if proration is necessary under this
subsection, the department must ensure that no district receives an
amount less than 11.5% of the target foundation for each
economically disadvantaged pupil enrolled in the district.
(20) If a district is dissolved pursuant to section 12 of the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

168
revised school code, MCL 380.12, the intermediate district to which
the dissolved district was constituent shall determine the
estimated number of pupils that are economically disadvantaged and
that are enrolled in each of the other districts within the
intermediate district and provide that estimate to the department
for the purposes of distributing funds under this section within 60
days after the district is declared dissolved.
(21) A district or public school academy that receives funds
under this section may use funds received under this section to
provide an anti-bullying or crisis intervention program.
(22) The department shall collaborate with the department of
health and human services to prioritize assigning Pathways to
Potential success coaches to elementary schools that have a high
percentage of pupils in grades K to 3 who are not proficient in
English language arts, based upon state assessments for pupils in
those grades.
(23) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under
section 11, there is allocated for 2023-2024 only an amount not to
exceed $10,000,000.00 for an electronic patient data and health
care analytic system to be made available to each child and
adolescent health center program. The department of health and
human services shall collaborate on system implementation with a
nonprofit organization exclusively dedicated to serving child and
adolescent health center programs in this state and that has a
membership that includes federally qualified health centers, local
public health departments, hospital systems, and public school
districts, including, but not limited to, technology assessment,
design, coordination, and system implementation with child and
adolescent health center programs. Funds appropriated under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

169
subsection are a work project appropriation and any unexpended
funds for 2023-2024 are carried forward into 2024-2025. The purpose
of the work project is to continue to implement an electronic
patient data and health care analytic system. The estimated
completion date of the work project is September 30, 2028.
(24) As used in this section:
(a) "At-risk pupil" means a pupil in grades pre-K to 12 for
whom the district has documentation that the pupil meets any of the
following criteria:
(i) The pupil is economically disadvantaged.
(ii) The pupil is an English language learner.
(iii) The pupil is chronically absent as defined by and reported
to the center.
(iv) The pupil is a victim of child abuse or neglect.
(v) The pupil is a pregnant teenager or teenage parent.
(vi) The pupil has a family history of school failure,
incarceration, or substance abuse.
(vii) The pupil is an immigrant who has immigrated within the
immediately preceding 3 years.
(viii) The pupil did not complete high school in 4 years and is
still continuing in school as identified in the Michigan cohort
graduation and dropout report.
(ix) For pupils for whom the results of the state summative
assessment have been received, is a pupil who did not achieve
proficiency on the English language arts, mathematics, science, or
social studies content area assessment.
(x) Is a pupil who is at risk of not meeting the district's or
public school academy's core academic curricular objectives in
English language arts or mathematics, as demonstrated on local
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

170
assessments.
(b) "Economically disadvantaged" means a pupil who has been
determined eligible for free or reduced-price meals as determined
under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751
to 1769j; who is in a household receiving supplemental nutrition
assistance program or temporary assistance for needy families
assistance; or who is homeless, migrant, or in foster care, as
reported to the center.
(c) "English language learner" means limited English
proficient pupils who speak a language other than English as their
primary language and have difficulty speaking, reading, writing, or
understanding English as reported to the center.
Sec. 31c. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 only an amount not to exceed $65,000,000.00 $50,000,000.00 for
grants to eligible districts for pilot programs to maintain or
establish small classes in grades K to 3 in eligible school
buildings in the district.
(2) To be eligible for a grant under subsection (1), a
district must have at least 1 eligible school building and must
apply to the department in the form and manner prescribed by the
department. A district shall include in its application a projected
budget for maintaining or establishing small classes in grades K to
3 and shall demonstrate in the projected budget that at least 30%
10% of the funds received by the district under section 31a 22b(4)
will be used to support small classes under this section.
(3) For a school building to be considered an eligible school
building under subsection (2), the school building must meet all of
the following requirements:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

171
(a) Operate at least 1 of grades K to 3.
(b) Be operated by a district that operates all of grades K to
12 and that receives funds under section 31a.22b.
(c) Be located in a district that is in an opportunity index
band, as described in section 31a, determined under section 6(21),
of 4 or higher.
(4) Not more than 25% of the total allocation under this
section may be paid to any single district. The department shall
make allocations under this section to districts that are
geographically diverse, including urban, suburban, and rural
districts. Grants issued under this section must be awarded to at
least the following districts:
(a) Muskegon Heights Public School Academy System.
(b) Benton Harbor Area Schools.
(c) Flint School District.
(d) Wayne-Westland Community School District.
(5) A district that receives funds under this section shall
use the funds to maintain or establish small classes in grades K to
3 in school buildings of the district for which funds are received
under this section. The average class size must be not more than 17
pupils per class, with not more than 19 pupils in any particular
class. A district that receives funds under this section shall use
at least 30% 10% of the funds the district receives for 2025-2026
2026-2027 under section 31a 22b(4) for the purposes of this
section.
(6) Funding to districts under this section for 2025-2026
2026-2027 is intended to be for the first of 2 years of funding.
(7) The funds allocated in this section for 2026-2027 are a
work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

172
2026-2027 are carried forward into 2026-2027. 2027-2028. The
purpose of the work project is to lower class sizes in grades K to
3. The estimated completion date of the work project is September
30, 2030.2031.
(8) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 31d. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $29,553,400.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the purpose of
making payments to districts and other eligible entities under this
section.
(2) The amounts allocated from state sources under this
section are used to pay the amount necessary to reimburse districts
for 6.0127% of the necessary costs of the state mandated portion of
lunch programs provided by those districts. The department shall
calculate the amount due to each district under this section using
the methods of calculation adopted by the Michigan supreme court in
the consolidated cases known as Durant v State of Michigan, 456
Mich 175 (1997).
(3) The payments made under this section include all state
payments made to districts so that each district receives at least
6.0127% of the necessary costs of operating the state mandated
portion of the lunch program in a fiscal year.
(4) The payments made under this section to districts and
other eligible entities that are not required under section 1272a
of the revised school code, MCL 380.1272a, to provide a lunch
program must be in an amount not to exceed $10.00 per eligible
pupil plus 5 cents for each free lunch and 2 cents for each reduced
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

173
price lunch provided, as determined by the department.
(5) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there
is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 all available federal funding,
estimated at $901,400,000.00 for child nutrition programs and, for
2025-2026, 2026-2027, all available federal funding, estimated at
$22,000,000.00, for food distribution programs.
(6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments to eligible entities other than districts under this
section on a schedule determined by the department.
(7) In purchasing food for a lunch program funded under this
section, a district or other eligible entity shall give preference
to food that is grown or produced by Michigan businesses if it is
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(8) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if the
amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully
reimburse districts for meals as required under this section, there
is appropriated from the school meals reserve fund created under
section 30e the amount necessary to fully fund these
reimbursements.
Sec. 31f. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $16,900,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the purpose of
making payments to districts to reimburse for the cost of providing
breakfast.
(2) The funds allocated under this section for school
breakfast programs are made available to all eligible applicant
districts that meet all of the following criteria:
(a) The district participates in the federal school breakfast
program and meets all standards as prescribed by 7 CFR parts 210,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

174
220, 225, 226, and 245.
(b) Each breakfast eligible for payment meets the federal
standards described in subdivision (a).
(3) The payment for a district under this section is at a per
meal rate equal to the lesser of the district's actual cost or 100%
of the statewide average cost of a meal served, as determined and
approved by the department, less federal reimbursement, participant
payments, and state breakfast reimbursements received under section
30d. The department shall determine the statewide average cost
using costs as reported in a manner approved by the department for
the preceding school year.
(4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department may make
payments under this section pursuant to an agreement with the
department.
(5) In purchasing food for a school breakfast program funded
under this section, a district shall give preference to food that
is grown or produced by Michigan businesses if it is competitively
priced and of comparable quality.
(6) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if the
amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully
reimburse districts for meals as required under this section, there
is appropriated from the school meals reserve fund created under
section 30e the amount necessary to fully fund these
reimbursements.
Sec. 31n. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for the purposes of this section an amount not to exceed
$106,545,000.00 and from the general fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

175
purposes of this section an amount not to exceed $1,300,000.00. The
department and the department of health and human services shall
continue a program to distribute this funding to add licensed
behavioral health providers for general education pupils, and
recipients of the funds under subsection (6) shall continue to seek
federal Medicaid match funding for all eligible mental health and
support services.
(2) The department and the department of health and human
services shall maintain an advisory council for programs funded
under this section and any other funding under this act to improve
or maintain the mental health of students, pupils, except for
programs funded under section 31a(7) and (8). 31a(1) and (2). The
advisory council shall define goals for implementation of programs,
and shall provide feedback on that implementation. At a minimum,
the advisory council shall consist of representatives of state
associations representing school health, school mental health,
school counseling, education, health care, and other organizations,
representatives from the department and the department of health
and human services, and a representative from the school safety and
mental health commission. The department and department of health
and human services, working with the advisory council, shall
determine an approach to increase capacity for mental health and
support services in schools for general education pupils, and shall
determine where that increase in capacity qualifies for federal
Medicaid match funding.
(3) The advisory council shall develop a fiduciary agent
checklist for intermediate districts to facilitate development of a
plan to submit to the department and to the department of health
and human services. The department and department of health and
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

176
human services shall determine the requirements and format for
intermediate districts to submit a plan for possible funding under
subsection (6). The department shall make applications for funding
for this program available to districts and intermediate districts
by not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which funds
are allocated under this section and shall award the funding by not
later than February 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are
allocated under this section.
(4) The department of health and human services shall amend
ensure that the state Medicaid plan continues to be written in a
way sufficient to obtain appropriate Medicaid waivers as necessary
for the purpose of generating to generate additional Medicaid match
funding for school mental health and support services for general
education pupils , and this expansion is called through the Caring
for Students (C4S) expansion.
(5) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an
amount not to exceed $14,300,000.00 to be distributed to the
network of child and adolescent health centers to place a licensed
master's level behavioral health provider in schools that do not
currently have services available to general education students.
pupils. Child and adolescent health centers that are part of the
network described in this subsection shall provide a commitment to
maintain services and implement all available federal Medicaid
match methodologies. The department of health and human services
shall use all existing or additional federal Medicaid match
opportunities to maximize funding allocated under this subsection.
The department shall provide funds under this subsection to child
and adolescent health centers that are part of the network
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

177
described in this subsection in the same proportion that funding
under section 31a(7) 31a(1) is provided to child and adolescent
health centers that are part of the network described in this
subsection and that are located and operating in those districts. A
payment from funding allocated under this subsection must not be
paid to an entity that is not part of the network described in this
subsection.
(6) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an
amount not to exceed $87,245,000.00 to be distributed to
intermediate districts for the provision of mental health and
support services to general education students. pupils. Recipients
of funds under this subsection shall continue to seek federal
Medicaid match funding for all eligible mental health and support
services. If a district or intermediate district is not able to
procure the services of a licensed master's level behavioral health
provider, the district or intermediate district shall notify the
department and the department of health and human services and, if
the department and department of health and human services verify
that the district or intermediate district attempted to procure
services from a master's level behavioral health provider and was
not able to do so, then the district or intermediate district may
instead procure services from a provider with less than a master's
degree in behavioral health. To be able to use the exemption in the
immediately preceding sentence, the district or intermediate
district must submit evidence satisfactory to the department and
department of health and human services demonstrating that the
district or intermediate district took measures to procure the
services of a licensed master's level behavioral health provider
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

178
but was unable to do so, and the department and department of
health and human services must be able to verify this evidence.
From the first $56,173,600.00 of the funds allocated under this
subsection, the department shall distribute up to $1,003,100.00 for
2025-2026 2026-2027 to each intermediate district that submits a
plan approved by the department and the department of health and
human services by February 1 of each fiscal year for which funds
are allocated under this section. The department shall distribute
the remaining $31,071,400.00 of the funds allocated under this
subsection for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to intermediate districts that
submit a plan approved by the department and the department of
health and human services by February 1 of each fiscal year for
which funds are allocated under this section on an equal per-pupil
basis based on the combined total number of pupils in membership in
the intermediate district and its constituent districts, including
public school academies that are considered to be constituent
districts under section 705(7) of the revised school code, MCL
380.705. The department and department of health and human services
shall work cooperatively in providing oversight and assistance to
intermediate districts and shall monitor the program upon
implementation. An intermediate district shall use funds awarded
under this subsection to provide funding to its constituent
districts, including public school academies that are considered to
be constituent districts under section 705(7) of the revised school
code, MCL 380.705, for the provision of mental health and support
services to general education students. pupils. In addition to the
criteria identified under subsection (9), an intermediate district
shall consider geography, cost, or other challenges when awarding
funding to its constituent districts. Districts receiving funding
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

179
under this subsection are encouraged to provide suicide prevention
and awareness education and counseling.
(7) If funding awarded to an intermediate district remains
after funds are provided by the intermediate district to its
constituent districts, the intermediate district shall notify the
department and department of health and human services and submit
evidence satisfactory to the department and department of health
and human services demonstrating how it would like to use funds for
purposes other than hiring licensed behavioral health providers for
general education pupils. With permission from the department and
department of health and human services, the intermediate district
may hire or contract for experts to provide mental health and
support services to general education students pupils residing
within the boundaries of the intermediate district, including, but
not limited to, expanding, hiring, or contracting for staff and
experts to provide those services directly or to increase access to
those services through coordination with outside mental health
agencies; the intermediate district may also contract with 1 or
more other intermediate districts for coordination and the
facilitation of activities related to providing mental health and
support services to general education students pupils residing
within the boundaries of the intermediate district; the
intermediate district may also use the funds under this section to
create or strengthen school-based behavioral health assessment
teams that focus on providing age-appropriate interventions,
identifying behaviors that suggest a pupil may be struggling with
mental health challenges, providing treatment and support of the
pupil, and using disciplinary interventions and the criminal
justice system as methods of last resort; and the intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

180
district may also use the funds under this section to provide
evidence-based trainings that support student pupil mental health.
(8) If funding awarded to an intermediate district under this
section remains unspent, or if the intermediate district submits an
application requesting a lower allocation than the maximum amount
permitted, the department, in conjunction with the intermediate
district, may reallocate the funds to another intermediate district
or other intermediate districts capable of expending the funds
before the funding deadline in accordance with this section as if
those funds were originally allocated to the intermediate district
or intermediate districts to which the funds are being reallocated.
(9) A district requesting funds under this section from the
intermediate district in which it is located shall submit an
application for funding for the provision of mental health and
support services to general education pupils. A district receiving
funding from the application process described in this subsection
shall provide services to nonpublic students pupils upon request.
An intermediate district shall not discriminate against an
application submitted by a public school academy simply on the
basis of the applicant being a public school academy. The
department shall approve grant applications based on the following
criteria:
(a) The district's commitment to maintain mental health and
support services delivered by licensed providers into future fiscal
years.
(b) The district's commitment to work with its intermediate
district to use funding it receives under this section that is
spent by the district for general education pupils toward
participation in federal Medicaid match methodologies. A district
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

181
must provide a local match of at least 20% of the funding allocated
to the district under section 31n.
(c) The district's commitment to adhere to any local funding
requirements determined by the department and the department of
health and human services.
(d) The extent of the district's existing partnerships with
community health care providers or the ability of the district to
establish such partnerships.
(e) The district's documentation of need, including gaps in
current mental health and support services for the general
education population.
(f) The district's submission of a formal plan of action
identifying the number of schools and students pupils to be served.
(g) Whether the district will participate in ongoing
trainings.
(h) Whether the district will submit an annual report to the
state.
(i) Whether the district demonstrates a willingness to work
with the state to establish program and service delivery
benchmarks.
(j) Whether the district has developed a school safety plan or
is in the process of developing a school safety plan.
(k) Any other requirements determined by the department or the
department of health and human services.
(10) Funding under this section, including any federal
Medicaid funds that are generated, must not be used to supplant
existing services.
(11) Both of the following are allocated to the department of
health and human services from the general fund money allocated
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

182
under subsection (1):
(a) For 2025-2026, 2026-2027, an amount not to exceed
$1,000,000.00 for the purpose of upgrading technology and systems
infrastructure and other administrative requirements to support the
programs funded under this section.
(b) For 2025-2026, 2026-2027, an amount not to exceed
$300,000.00 for the purpose of administering the programs under
this section and working on generating additional Medicaid funds as
a result of programs funded under this section.
(12) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an
amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 to intermediate districts on an
equal per intermediate district basis for the purpose of
administering programs funded under this section. Recipients of the
funds under this subsection shall continue to seek federal Medicaid
match funding for all eligible mental health and support services
and participate in all learning collaboratives about C4S required
by the department and department of health and human services.
(13) The department and the department of health and human
services shall work with the advisory council to develop proposed
measurements of outcomes and performance. Those measurements must
include, at a minimum, the number of pupils served, the number of
schools served, and where those pupils and schools were located.
The department and the department of health and human services
shall compile data necessary to measure outcomes and performance,
and districts and intermediate districts receiving funding under
this section shall provide data requested by the department and
department of health and human services for the measurement of
outcomes and performance. The department and department of health
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

183
and human services shall provide an annual report by not later than
December 1 of each year to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid and health and human services, to the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and to the state budget director.
At a minimum, the report must include measurements of outcomes and
performance, proposals to increase efficacy and usefulness,
proposals to increase performance, and proposals to expand
coverage.
(14) A district or intermediate district that receives funding
directly or indirectly under this section may carry over any
unexpended funds received under this section for up to 2 fiscal
years beyond the fiscal year in which the funds were received.
(15) As used in this section, "general education pupil"
includes children served under sections 32d and 32t.
Sec. 31aa. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $300,000,000.00 for
2025-2026 2026-2027 only, and from the general fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $21,000,000.00 for
2025-2026 only, to support school safety and mental health.
(2) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $200,000,000.00, and from
the general fund money allocated in subsection (1), an amount not
to exceed $14,000,000.00 $255,000,000.00 may be used to provide
payments to districts, intermediate districts, nonpublic schools,
and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind that opt in and
agree to receive funding under this subsection, for activities to
improve student mental health and improve student safety. The
allowable expenditures of funds under this subsection are as
follows:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

184
(a) Hiring or contracting for support staff for student mental
health needs, including, but not limited to, school psychologists,
social workers, counselors, and school nurses.
(b) Purchasing and implementing mental health screening tools.
(c) Purchasing a statewide, integrated technology platform
that streamlines behavioral health documentation and care
coordination.
(d) Providing school-based mental health personnel access to
consultation with behavioral health clinicians to respond to
complex student mental health needs.
(e) Purchasing and implementing an online behavioral health
tool moderated and led by licensed behavioral health professionals.
(f) Hiring or contracting a behavioral health coordinator.
(g) Evidence-based trainings to support mental health.
(h) Costs associated with collaboration between school
employees, families, and community partners to address the
academic, behavioral, and social needs of all students through
collaborative partnerships, resource coordination, data collection,
and data sharing.
(i) Costs associated with conducting a systematic school
mental health needs assessment and resource mapping that identifies
programmatic and systemic needs and helps staff determine
priorities and create action plans.
(j) Coordination with local law enforcement.
(k) Training for school staff on threat assessment.
(l) Training for school staff and students on threat response.
(m) Training for school staff on crisis communication.
(n) Safety infrastructure, including, but not limited to,
cameras, door blocks, hardened vestibules, window screening, and
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

185
technology necessary to operate buzzer systems. This may also
include firearm detection software that integrates to existing
security cameras to detect and alert school personnel and first
responders to visible firearms on school property.
(o) Age-appropriate training for students and families on
responsible firearm ownership, including safe handling and safe
storage of firearms.
(p) School resource officers and safety dogs. School resource
officers hired under this subsection must be properly licensed and
in good standing with the Michigan commission on law enforcement
standards, and must be in compliance with all applicable laws.
(q) Student Safety Management System, the information
technology platform and related services to improve student safety
by mitigating cyberbullying, school violence, human trafficking,
and self-harm that supports students from grades K to 12.
(r) A secure platform, administered by the department of state
police, for school officials, emergency responders, and emergency
management coordinators to house all school safety-related items,
including, but not limited to, EOP templates, EOP guidance,
reference documents, and security assessments. The platform should
use existing password-protected access control methods schools
currently utilize and, to the extent possible, be capable of
integrating with existing platforms or technologies used by
districts for school safety. Through permissions-based access
control, the platform should be able to relay information clearly
and in real time to each person or entity necessary to provide a
unified response to a safety incident, or to take appropriate
action in response to an anticipated disruption to the normal
functions of the surrounding community.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

186
(s) Emergency infrastructure needs to respond to an immediate
threat to the health or safety of students and staff in the
district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan
Schools for the Deaf and Blind. A district, intermediate district,
nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind
shall not expend funds for this purpose without first obtaining
approval from the department. In making a determination of
approval, the department shall, at a minimum, assess whether the
district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan
Schools for the Deaf and Blind is responding to an immediate threat
to the health or safety of students and staff, and whether the
district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan
Schools for the Deaf and Blind has other sources of funding that
should be utilized first.
(t) A contract with a vendor for a comprehensive safety and
security assessment or a comprehensive safety and security event
assessment in schools operated by the district, intermediate
district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf
and Blind.
(u) An emergency response system.
(v) Implementing cell phone free school policies. As used in
this subdivision, "cell phone free school policy" means a policy
that prohibits students from accessing or using a personal
communication device capable of telecommunication or digital
communication during instructional time, as determined by the
school.
(3) By not later than December 31 of each fiscal year, from
the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), the
department shall make payments to districts, intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

187
districts, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind that opt
in and agree to receive funding in an equal amount per pupil based
on the total number of pupils in membership in each district,
intermediate district, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and
Blind that opts in and agrees to receive funding. By December 31 of
each fiscal year, from the general fund money allocated in
subsection (2), the department shall make payments to nonpublic
schools that opt in and agree to receive funding in an equal amount
per pupil based on the total number of pupils in membership in each
nonpublic school that opts in and agrees to receive funding, using
pupil counts determined by the department. The department shall
ensure that the amount per pupil paid to nonpublic schools does not
exceed the amount per pupil paid to districts and intermediate
districts. Districts, intermediate districts, and the Michigan
Schools for the Deaf and Blind , and nonpublic schools may opt in
and agree to receive funding in a form and manner determined by the
department.
(4) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$50,000,000.00, and from the general fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$3,500,000.00 for competitive grants to districts, intermediate
districts, and nonpublic schools for school resource officers and
safety dogs. To receive funding under this subsection, a district,
intermediate district, or nonpublic school must apply for funding
to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The department shall prioritize applicants who include
a spending plan to sustain salaries after grant funding has
concluded. Recipients of funding under this subsection shall ensure
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

188
that any school resource officer hired with these funds has
completed training by the Michigan commission on law enforcement
standards.$20,000,000.00 for grants to districts to support the
efforts of community violence intervention plans to reduce or
prevent youth violence. Both of the following apply to grants
described in this subsection:
(a) Districts must apply on a competitive basis for funding
under this subsection in a form and manner determined by the
department. The department shall coordinate with the office of
community violence intervention in the department of health and
human services to evaluate applications submitted under this
subsection. Awards must be granted based on competitive criteria
determined by the department and the department of health and human
services but must prioritize grants for local district plans that
include comprehensive strategies with demonstrated external
partnerships to support successful implementation.
(b) Districts may use funding received under this subsection
to contract with nonprofits, community-based organizations, subject
matter experts, or other governmental entities to implement a plan
to reduce or prevent youth violence. A plan to reduce or prevent
youth violence implemented under this subsection must use evidence-
based practices, include mentorship and community engagement
strategies, and may include, but is not limited to, increased
academic, counseling, health, and wrap-around services to youth.
(5) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$50,000,000.00 and from the general fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$3,500,000.00 for competitive grants to districts, intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

189
districts, and nonpublic schools to hire or contract for support
staff for student mental health needs, including, but not limited
to, school psychologists, social workers, and counselors. To
receive funding under this subsection, a district, intermediate
district, or nonpublic school must apply for funding to the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
department shall prioritize applicants that include a spending plan
to sustain salaries after grant funding has concluded.
$25,000,000.00 to districts and intermediate districts that opt in
and agree to receive funding on an equal per-pupil basis. All of
the following apply to funds received under this subsection:
(a) Districts and intermediate districts that receive funds
under this subsection must implement a behavior warning system
described in this subdivision. The department shall select a vendor
to provide districts and intermediate districts with a computer-
based behavior warning system that meets all of the following
requirements:
(i) Provides a common way of identifying and collecting early
behaviors that could require intervention to prevent abuse, self-
harm, or violence in schools. As used in this subparagraph, "early
behaviors that require intervention to prevent abuse, self-harm, or
violence in schools" includes, but is not limited to, any of the
following behaviors:
(A) Changes in attendance.
(B) Changes in academic performance.
(C) Changes in emotional response.
(D) Withdrawal.
(E) The beginning signs of self-harm.
(F) Problematic peer interaction.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

190
(G) Discipline concerns that could result in any of the
following outcomes:
(I) Specific interventions, including mental health or
behavioral supports.
(II) Academic support.
(III) Parent or legal guardian conferences.
(IV) Discipline referrals.
(V) Other restorative practices.
(ii) Utilizes tools to inform any behavioral threat assessment
and assessment teams.
(iii) Ensures that all information recorded in the computer-
based system remains confidential, in accordance with 20 USC 1232g,
commonly referred to as the family educational rights and privacy
act of 1974, and state law.
(b) The vendor selected under subdivision (a) must provide
school personnel with training to identify warning signs and how to
use the computer-based system described in subdivision (a).
(c) Using funds allocated under this subsection, districts
shall implement a technology tool capable of screening visitors
against national sex offender registries in all states. The
technology tool described in this subdivision must provide a badge
to the visitor, and must store a picture of the visitor and a
record of the visitor's campus destinations. A district shall
request that a visitor provide identification before receiving a
badge described in this subdivision. However, a district may
accommodate a visitor without any form of identification in a way
that aligns with district policy and prioritizes the protection of
students, teachers, and staff. As used in this subdivision,
"visitor" includes any contractor hired by the district.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

191
(d) Using funds allocated under this subsection, districts
must implement a mobile panic alert system capable of connecting
disparate emergency services technologies to ensure real-time
coordination between local and state law enforcement and first
responder agencies. The system described in this subdivision must
integrate with local public safety answering point infrastructure
to transmit 9-1-1 calls and mobile activations.
(e) Districts and intermediate districts may use funds
allocated under this subsection for activities and equipment that
further promote cardiac emergency response plan preparedness,
including, but not limited to, the purchase and maintenance of
automated external defibrillators (AEDs), the purchase of CPR
training kits or CPR training for faculty and staff, or the
purchase of basic first aid training and educational material.
(6) Recipients of funding under this section must provide a
final expense report to the department by July 1 of each fiscal
year. If the department determines that the eligible recipient has
misused the funds allocated under this section, the eligible
recipient shall reimburse the department for the amount of state
funding misused.
(7) The department shall use the information received under
subsection (6) to compile a report that includes the number of
recipients that have hired school resource officers using funds
received under this section and any supporting information provided
by the recipients. By not later than August 1 of each year, the
department shall provide the report compiled under this subsection
to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid,
the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy
offices, the state budget office, and the Michigan commission on
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

192
law enforcement standards.
(8) Districts receiving funds under this section must
coordinate with intermediate districts to avoid duplication of
services and to streamline delivery of services to students.
(9) To receive funding under this section, a district, an
intermediate district, a nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools
for the Deaf and Blind must agree to be subject to a comprehensive
investigation , must affirmatively agree to waive any privilege
that may otherwise protect information from disclosure in the event
of a mass casualty event, and must agree to comply with a
comprehensive investigation. after a mass casualty event, as
defined in subsection (11). All of the following apply to a
comprehensive investigation described in this subsection:
(a) The comprehensive investigation will assess the
circumstances surrounding the mass casualty event, including, but
not limited to:
(i) Emergency response effectiveness.
(ii) Compliance with safety protocols.
(iii) Communication procedures.
(iv) Any factors contributing to the incident.
(b) The governor shall designate an appropriate person or
investigative entity to conduct the comprehensive investigation.
This person or investigative entity may include, but is not limited
to, state law enforcement agencies, independent review boards, or
specially appointed task forces. The person or designated
investigative entity has the authority to do all of the following:
(i) Access relevant records and data from the district.
(ii) Interview witnesses and district personnel involved.
(iii) Issue findings and recommendations based on the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

193
investigation.
(c) The person or investigative entity designated in
subdivision (b) shall prepare a detailed report of its findings and
submit the report to the governor and relevant legislative
committees within 90 days following the conclusion of the
investigation. The report must include recommendations for
preventing future incidents and improving school safety protocols.
(10) Funds allocated under subsection (4) for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for
2025-2026 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2026-2027. 2027-2028.
The purpose of the work project is to continue providing funding to
support districts, intermediate districts, and nonpublic schools in
having school resource officers. support the work of community
violence intervention programs in districts and intermediate
districts. The estimated completion date of the work project is
September 30, 2029.2031.
(11) Funds allocated under subsection (5) for 2025-2026 are a
work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026
are carried forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project
is to continue providing funding to support districts, intermediate
districts, and nonpublic schools in hiring staff to support student
mental health. The estimated completion date of the work project is
September 30, 2029.
(12) As used in this section:
(a) "Mass casualty event" means any of the following that
occur an incident of targeted violence that occurs on school
grounds or at a school-sponsored event and that meets all of the
following criteria:
(i) An incident resulting in significant injuries to not fewer
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

194
than 3 individuals.The incident involves the use of a lethal
weapon. As used in this subparagraph, "lethal weapon" means a
firearm as defined in 18 USC 921, an explosive or incendiary
device, or a weapon defined in section 222 of the Michigan penal
code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.222.
(ii) An The incident resulting in fatalities.results in at
least 1 fatality, or significant bodily injuries to not fewer than
2 individuals, excluding the perpetrator.
(iii) An The incident that exceeds the normal resources for
emergency response available in the jurisdiction where the incident
takes place.
(iv) An incident that results in a sudden and timely surge of
injured individuals necessitating emergency services.
(b) "Safety dog" means a dog that is contracted by a law
enforcement agency of this state, a local unit of government of
this state, or a district or an intermediate district and that is
trained for detection of firearms, explosives, narcotics, or vape
substances.is the result of a deliberate and malicious act and is
not a motor vehicle accident.
(b) "Motor vehicle accident" means that term as defined in
section 503 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.503.
(c) "School grounds" means all properties owned or operated by
the district, including transportation vehicles owned or operated
by the district.
(d) "School-sponsored event" means any activity organized or
sanctioned by the district.
(12) (13) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall
make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

195
Sec. 32d. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated to eligible
intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts for
great start readiness programs and other purposes described in this
section an amount not to exceed $609,720,000.00 for 2024-2025 and
$638,217,600.00 for 2025-2026. From the general fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated $600,000.00 for
2024-2025 and $350,000.00 for 2025-2026, $801,667,600.00 for 2026-
2027, and from the great start readiness reserve fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $18,000,000.00 for
2024-2025 and 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the purposes of this section.
For 2024-2025, an intermediate district or consortium shall use
funds allocated under this section for great start readiness
programs to provide part-day programs, school-day programs, GSRP
extended programs, GSRP/Head Start school-day blended programs, or
GSRP/Head Start extended blended programs that are comprehensive,
free, compensatory classroom programs designed to improve the
readiness and subsequent achievement of children who meet the
participant eligibility and prioritization guidelines as defined by
the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
For 2025-2026, an An intermediate district or consortium shall use
funds allocated under this section for eligible great start
readiness program options. For a child to be eligible to
participate in a program under this section, the child must be at
least 4, but less than 5, years of age as of September 1 of the
school year in which the program is offered and must meet those
eligibility and prioritization guidelines. After eligible children
who will be 4 years of age as of September 1 are enrolled, a child
who is not 4 years of age as of September 1, but who will be 4
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

196
years of age by not later than December 1, is eligible to
participate if both of the following are met:
(a) The child's parent or legal guardian seeks a waiver from
the September 1 eligibility date by submitting a request for
enrollment in a program to the responsible intermediate district.
(b) The child meets eligibility and prioritization guidelines.
(2) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $597,720,000.00 for 2024-
2025 and $626,217,600.00 $764,667,600.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 is
allocated to intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate
districts based on the formula in section 39. An intermediate
district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving funding
under this section shall act as the fiduciary for the great start
readiness programs. An intermediate district or consortium of
intermediate districts receiving funding under this section may
collaborate with local governments to identify children eligible
for programs funded under this section and may contract with local
governments to provide services. To be eligible to receive funds
allocated under this subsection from an intermediate district or
consortium of intermediate districts, a district, a consortium of
districts, a local government, or a public or private for-profit or
nonprofit legal entity or agency must comply with this section and
section 39. For 2024-2025, if, due to the number of GSRP extended
program or GSRP/Head Start extended blended program slots awarded,
the amount allocated in this subsection is insufficient to award at
least the same number of part-day program and school-day program
slots as awarded in the immediately preceding fiscal year, there is
appropriated from the great start readiness program reserve fund
the amount necessary to fully award the same number of part-day
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

197
program and full-day program slots as awarded in the immediately
preceding fiscal year. For 2025-2026, if If the amount allocated in
this subsection is insufficient to fully fund allocations
calculated under section 39, there is appropriated from the great
start readiness program reserve fund the amount necessary and
available to fully fund those allocations.
(3) From the general state school aid fund money allocated
under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$600,000.00 for 2024-2025 and an amount not to exceed $350,000.00
for 2025-2026 for (2), the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential shall award a competitive grant to a
state public university to continue a longitudinal evaluation of
children who have participated in great start readiness programs.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), to be
eligible for funding under this section, a program must prepare
children for success in school through comprehensive part-day
programs, school-day programs, GSRP extended programs, GSRP/Head
Start school-day blended programs, GSRP/Head Start extended blended
programs, or other eligible great start readiness program options
that contain all of the following program components, as determined
by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential:
(a) Participation in a collaborative recruitment and
enrollment process to ensure that each child is enrolled in the
program most appropriate to the child's needs and to maximize the
use of federal, state, and local funds. For 2025-2026, as part of
this requirement, programs Programs receiving funding under this
section must provide current enrollment data, including slots open
for enrollment and slots filled, to the intermediate district or
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

198
consortium of intermediate districts from which funding is received
for that program. The enrollment process must ensure that children
in families with lower income and children with other risk factors,
as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential, are enrolled before children with lesser needs.
(b) An age-appropriate educational curriculum that is in
compliance with the early childhood standards of quality for birth
to kindergarten children adopted by the state board, including, at
least, the Connect4Learning curriculum.
(c) Nutritional services for all program participants
supported by federal, state, and local resources as applicable.
(d) Physical and dental health and developmental screening
services for all program participants.
(e) Referral services for families of program participants to
community social service agencies, including mental health
services, as appropriate.
(f) Active and continuous involvement of the parents or
guardians of the program participants.
(g) A plan to conduct and report annual great start readiness
program evaluations and continuous improvement plans using criteria
approved by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential.
(h) Participation in a school readiness advisory committee
convened as a workgroup of the great start collaborative that
provides for the involvement of classroom teachers, parents or
guardians of program participants, and community, volunteer, and
social service agencies and organizations, as appropriate. The
advisory committee shall annually review and make recommendations
regarding the program components listed in this subsection. The
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

199
advisory committee also shall make recommendations to the great
start collaborative regarding other community services designed to
improve all children's school readiness.
(i) The ongoing articulation of the kindergarten and first
grade programs offered by the program provider.
(j) Participation in this state's great start to quality
process with a level of at least enhancing quality level.
(5) To help expand access to great start readiness programs,
the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential
may waive the requirements under subsections (4) and (8)(c)
subsection (4) and a program may be eligible for funding under this
section for new or expanding programs if the program demonstrates
to the satisfaction of the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential that the program meets all of the
following:
(a) Is a licensed group or child care center or is a licensed
program.
(b) Provides the minimum instructional time as required by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(c) Participates in this state's quality improvement system at
a level determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
(d) Implements a professional educator preparation plan, as
defined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, for educators not meeting teacher credentialing
standards described in subsection (8). or (9).
(e) Uses a developmentally appropriate curriculum, as
determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

200
(f) Conducts a developmental screening and referral process,
as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential.
(g) Commits to participating in program financial review and
monitoring, as determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
(h) Provides a plan to implement an approved great start
readiness program curriculum and meet additional great start
readiness program standards, as determined by the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(6) A waiver under subsection (5) may be granted for up to 3
years for requirements related to program credentialing and may be
granted for up to 2 years for all other requirements, as determined
by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential.
(7) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall provide a report to the house and senate
appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget
director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies that summarizes
the number and types of exemptions granted under subsection (5) and
progress made by programs granted waivers under subsection (5) by
September 30 of each fiscal year. It is the intent of the
legislature to review the waiver allowability under subsection (5)
before the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027.
(8) For applications submitted before September 30, 2025, an
application for funding under this section must provide for the
following, in a form and manner determined by the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential:
(a) Ensure either of the following:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

201
(i) That the applicant complies with all program components
described in subsection (4).
(ii) That the applicant meets the requirements of a waiver
under subsection (5).
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, ensure
that children participating in an eligible great start readiness
program for whom the intermediate district is receiving funds under
this section are children who live with families with a household
income that is equal to or less than 400% of the federal poverty
guidelines. If the intermediate district determines that all
eligible children are being served and that there are no children
on the waiting list who live with families with a household income
that is equal to or less than 400% of the federal poverty
guidelines, the intermediate district may then enroll children who
live with families with a household income that is greater than
400% of the federal poverty guidelines. The enrollment process must
consider income and risk factors, such that children determined
with higher need are enrolled before children with lesser need. For
purposes of this subdivision, all age-eligible children served in
foster care or who are experiencing homelessness or who have
individualized education programs recommending placement in an
inclusive preschool setting are considered to live with families
with household income equal to or less than 400% of the federal
poverty guidelines regardless of actual family income and are
prioritized for enrollment within the lowest quintile. The
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall
publish the household income thresholds under this subdivision in a
clear manner on its website and the great start to quality website.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (5), ensure that the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

202
applicant only uses qualified personnel for this program, as
follows:
(i) Teachers possessing proper training. A lead teacher must
have a valid Michigan teaching certificate with an early childhood
or lower elementary endorsement or a bachelor's or higher degree in
child development or early childhood education with specialization
in preschool teaching. However, except as otherwise provided in
this subparagraph, if an applicant demonstrates to the department
of lifelong education, advancement, and potential that it is unable
to fully comply with this subparagraph after making reasonable
efforts to comply, teachers or paraprofessionals with at least 5
years of experience as a paraprofessional in a great start
readiness program, Head Start, or licensed child care center
classroom who have significant but incomplete training in early
childhood education or child development may be used if the
applicant provides to the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, and the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential approves, a plan for each
teacher to come into compliance with the standards in this
subparagraph. Individuals may qualify with at least 3 years of
experience and significant training in early childhood education or
child development, based on the recommendation of the intermediate
district after a classroom observation. A teacher's compliance plan
must be completed within 3 years of the date of employment.
Progress toward completion of the compliance plan consists of at
least 2 courses per calendar year.
(ii) Paraprofessionals possessing proper training in early
childhood education, including an associate degree in early
childhood education or child development or the equivalent, or a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

203
child development associate (CDA) credential. However, if an
applicant demonstrates to the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential that it is unable to fully comply with
this subparagraph after making reasonable efforts to comply, the
applicant may use paraprofessionals who have completed at least 1
course that earns college credit in early childhood education or
child development or enroll in a child development associate
credential with at least 6 months of verified experience in early
education and care, if the applicant provides to the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the department
of lifelong education, advancement, and potential approves, a plan
for each paraprofessional to come into compliance with the
standards in this subparagraph. A paraprofessional's compliance
plan must be completed within 3 years of the date of employment.
Progress toward completion of the compliance plan consists of at
least 2 courses, 60 clock hours, or an equivalent of training per
calendar year.
(d) Include a program budget that contains only those costs
that are not reimbursed or reimbursable by federal funding, that
are clearly and directly attributable to the great start readiness
program, and that would not be incurred if the program were not
being offered. Eligible costs include transportation costs. The
program budget must indicate the extent to which these funds will
supplement other federal, state, local, or private funds. An
applicant shall not use funds received under this section to
supplant any federal funds received by the applicant to serve
children eligible for a federally funded preschool program that has
the capacity to serve those children.
(8) (9) Beginning in 2025-2026, applications Applications for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

204
funding under this section must be submitted to the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential in a form and manner
determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential. The application must demonstrate, at a minimum,
compliance with program requirements described in subsection (4) or
(5) and must ensure that recipients will only utilize qualified
personnel, as determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, for eligible great start readiness
program options.
(10) For a grant recipient that enrolls pupils in a school-day
program or GSRP extended program funded under this section, each
child enrolled in the school-day program or GSRP extended program
is counted as described in section 39 for purposes of determining
the amount of the grant award. This subsection does not apply after
September 30, 2025.
(9) (11) For a grant recipient that enrolls pupils in an
eligible great start readiness program option that blends GSRP and
Head Start programming, the grant recipient shall ensure that all
Head Start and GSRP policies and regulations are applied to the
blended slots, with adherence to the highest standard from either
program, to the extent allowable under federal law. A grant
recipient may request a waiver from the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential to align GSRP policies and
regulations with Head Start national standards for quality,
including ratios, and the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential may approve the waiver. Not later than
March 1 of each year, the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential will report to the legislature and post
on a publicly available website a list by intermediate district or
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

205
consortium with the number and type of each waiver requested and
approved.
(10) (12) To help expand access to great start readiness
programs, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential may allow great start readiness programs to implement
Head Start national performance standards for quality as an
alternative to great start readiness program policies and
regulations if the great start readiness program demonstrates to
the satisfaction of the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential that the great start readiness program
is meeting the requirements of the Head Start national performance
standards.
(11) (13) Beginning in 2025-2026, an An intermediate district
or consortia of intermediate districts receiving funding under this
section must publish, on an easily accessible website, a data
dashboard containing the number of allocations requested from the
state, a list of programs offering great start readiness programs
in their boundaries, and current enrollment data for each
subrecipient, including total slots open for enrollment, slots
filled, and waitlist information, if applicable. A link to this
website must be provided to families on waitlists for any great
start readiness program in their boundaries.
(12) (14) An intermediate district or consortium of
intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall
designate an early childhood coordinator, and may provide services
directly or may contract with 1 or more districts or public or
private for-profit or nonprofit providers that meet all
requirements of subsection (4) , (8), or (9), or (8), as
applicable.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

206
(13) (15) An intermediate district or consortium of
intermediate districts may retain for administrative services
provided by the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate
districts an amount not to exceed 4% of the grant amount. Expenses
incurred by subrecipients engaged by the intermediate district or
consortium of intermediate districts for directly running portions
of the program are considered program costs or a contracted program
fee for service. Subrecipients operating early childhood programs
may include indirect costs, not to exceed the federal de minimis.
(14) (16) An intermediate district or consortium of
intermediate districts may expend not more than 2% of the total
grant amount for outreach, recruiting, and public awareness of the
program, if the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate
districts also participates in related statewide marketing and
outreach efforts.
(17) Each grant recipient shall enroll children identified
under subsection (8)(b) according to how far the child's household
income is below 400% of the federal poverty guidelines by ranking
each applicant child's household income from lowest to highest and
dividing the applicant children into quintiles based on how far the
child's household income is below 400% of the federal poverty
guidelines, and then enrolling children in the quintile with the
lowest household income before enrolling children in the quintile
with the next lowest household income until slots are completely
filled. If the grant recipient determines that all eligible
children are being served and that there are no children on the
waiting list who live with families with a household income that is
equal to or less than 400% of the federal poverty guidelines, the
grant recipient may then enroll children who live with families
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

207
with a household income that is greater than 400% of the federal
poverty guidelines. The enrollment process must consider income and
risk factors, such that children determined with higher need are
enrolled before children with lesser need. For purposes of this
subsection, all age-eligible children served in foster care or who
are experiencing homelessness or who have individualized education
programs recommending placement in an inclusive preschool setting
are considered to live with families with household income equal to
or less than 400% of the federal poverty guidelines regardless of
actual family income and are prioritized for enrollment within the
lowest quintile. This subsection does not apply after September 30,
2025.
(15) (18) An intermediate district or consortium of
intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall
allow parents of eligible children who are residents of the
intermediate district or within the consortium to choose a program
operated by or contracted with another intermediate district or
consortium of intermediate districts and shall enter into a written
agreement regarding payment, in a manner prescribed by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(16) (19) An intermediate district or consortium of
intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall
conduct a local process to contract with interested and eligible
public and private for-profit and nonprofit community-based
providers that meet all requirements of subsection (4) for at least
30% of its total allocation. For 2024-2025, for the purposes of
this 30% allocation, an intermediate district or consortium of
intermediate districts may count children served by a Head Start
grantee or delegate in a GSRP/Head Start school-day blended
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

208
program, GSRP/Head Start extended blended program, GSRP extended
program, and great start readiness school-day program. Children
served in a program funded only through only Head Start are not
counted toward this 30% allocation. Beginning in 2025-2026, the The
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall
provide guidance to intermediate districts and consortia of
intermediate districts on counting children served by Head Start
programming for the purposes of this 30% allocation. For 2024-2025,
an intermediate district or consortium shall report to the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, in a
manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, a detailed list of community-based
providers by provider type, including private for-profit, private
nonprofit, community college or university, Head Start grantee or
delegate, and district or intermediate district, and the number and
proportion of its total allocation allocated to each provider as
subrecipient. Beginning in 2025-2026, an An intermediate district
or consortium shall report to the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, in a manner prescribed by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential,
information necessary for the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential to determine the intermediate district's
or consortium of intermediate districts' compliance with this
subsection. If the intermediate district or consortium is not able
to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation, the
intermediate district or consortium shall notify the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential and, if the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential
verifies that the intermediate district or consortium attempted to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

209
contract for at least 30% of its total allocation and was not able
to do so, the intermediate district or consortium may retain and
use all of its allocation as provided under this section. To be
able to use this exemption, the intermediate district or consortium
shall demonstrate to the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential that the intermediate district or
consortium increased the percentage of its total allocation for
which it contracts with a community-based provider and the
intermediate district or consortium shall submit evidence
satisfactory to the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential, and the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential must be able to verify this evidence,
demonstrating that the intermediate district or consortium took
measures to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation as
required under this subsection, including, but not limited to, at
least all of the following measures:
(a) The intermediate district or consortium notified each
nonparticipating licensed child care center located in the service
area of the intermediate district or consortium regarding the
center's eligibility to participate, in a manner prescribed by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(b) The intermediate district or consortium provided to each
nonparticipating licensed child care center located in the service
area of the intermediate district or consortium information
regarding great start readiness program requirements and a
description of the application and selection process for community-
based providers.
(c) The intermediate district or consortium provided to the
public and to participating families a list of community-based
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

210
great start readiness program subrecipients with a great start to
quality level of at least enhancing quality level.
(17) (20) If an intermediate district or consortium of
intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section fails
to submit satisfactory evidence to demonstrate its effort to
contract for at least 30% of its total allocation, as required
under subsection (19), (16), the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential may reduce the allocation to the
intermediate district or consortium by a percentage equal to the
difference between the percentage of an intermediate district's or
consortium's total allocation awarded to community-based providers
and 30% of its total allocation.
(18) (21) To assist intermediate districts and consortia in
complying with the requirement to contract with community-based
providers, for at least 30% of their total allocation, the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall
do all of the following:
(a) Ensure that a great start resource center or the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential
provides each intermediate district or consortium receiving a grant
under this section with the contact information for each licensed
child care center located in the service area of the intermediate
district or consortium by March 1 of each year.
(b) Provide, or ensure that an organization with which the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential
contracts provides, a community-based provider with a validated
great start to quality rating within 90 days of the provider's
having submitted a request and self-assessment. This subdivision
does not apply after September 30, 2025.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

211
(b) (c) Ensure that all intermediate district, district,
community college or university, Head Start grantee or delegate,
private for-profit, and private nonprofit providers are subject to
a single great start to quality continuous quality improvement
system. The continuous quality improvement system must ensure that
regulators process all prospective providers at the same pace on a
first-come, first-served basis and must not allow 1 type of
provider to receive a great start to quality level ahead of any
other type of provider.
(c) (d) By not later than March 1 of each year, compile the
results of the information reported by each intermediate district
or consortium under subsection (19) (16) and report to the
legislature and post on a publicly available website a list by
intermediate district or consortium with the number and percentage
of each intermediate district's or consortium's total allocation
allocated to community-based providers by provider type, including
private for-profit, private nonprofit, community college or
university, Head Start grantee or delegate, and district or
intermediate district.
(d) (e) Allow intermediate districts and consortia and
eligible community-based providers to utilize materials and
supplies purchased for great start readiness programs within their
facilities for other early care and education activities, in the
following order of priority:
(i) Early care and education activities under a federal award.
(ii) Early care and education activities under other state
awards.
(iii) Early care and education activities under local or
regional awards.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

212
(19) (22) A recipient of funds under this section shall report
to the center in a form and manner prescribed by the center the
information necessary to derive the number of children
participating in the program, the number of eligible children not
participating in the program and on a waitlist, and the total
number of children participating in the program by various
demographic groups and eligibility factors necessary to analyze
equitable and priority access to services for the purposes of
subsection (3).
(20) (23) As used in this section:
(a) "Child care center" means that term as defined in section
1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111.
(b) "Eligible great start readiness program options" means a
program option that operates on a school-day, part-day, or extended
schedule length, as determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential. The department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential must maintain and publish on
its website requirements for each eligible schedule length,
including the minimum day length, the minimum number of days per
week, and the minimum number of weeks per year. These programs may
be blended with Head Start programs, if allowable by federal rules
and regulations.
(c) "Federal poverty guidelines" means the guidelines
published annually in the Federal Register by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services under its authority to
revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902.
(d) "GSRP extended program" means a program that operates for
at least the same length of day as a district's first grade program
for a minimum of 5 days per week, 36 weeks per year.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

213
(e) "GSRP/Head Start extended blended program" means a program
funded under this section and a Head Start program that are
combined for an extended program.
(f) "GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program" means a part-
day program funded under this section and a Head Start program,
which are combined for a school-day program.
(g) "Licensed child care center" means a child care center
that has been issued a license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to
722.128, to operate a child care center.
(h) "Part-day program" means a program that operates at least
4 days per week, 30 weeks per year, for at least 3 hours of
teacher-child contact time per day but for fewer hours of teacher-
child contact time per day than a school-day program.
(i) "School-day program" means a program that operates for at
least the same length of day as a district's first grade program
for a minimum of 4 days per week, 30 weeks per year. A classroom
that offers a school-day program must enroll all children for the
school day to be considered a school-day program.
(21) (24) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026
2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 and, from the
great start readiness program reserve fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026
2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 for reimbursement
of transportation costs for children attending great start
readiness programs funded under this section. To receive
reimbursement under this subsection, by not later than November 1
of each year, a program funded under this section that provides
transportation shall submit to the intermediate district that is
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

214
the fiscal agent for the program a projected transportation budget.
The amount of the reimbursement for transportation under this
subsection is no more than the projected transportation budget or
$500.00 multiplied by the number of children funded for the program
under this section. If the amount allocated under this subsection
is insufficient to fully reimburse the transportation costs for all
programs that provide transportation and submit the required
information, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall prorate the reimbursement in an equal amount per
child funded. The department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential shall make payments to the intermediate district that
is the fiscal agent for each program, and the intermediate district
shall then reimburse the program provider for transportation costs
as prescribed under this subsection.
(22) (25) For 2024-2025, subject to, and from the funds
allocated under, subsection (24), the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall reimburse a program for
transportation costs related to parent- or guardian-accompanied
transportation provided by transportation service companies, buses,
or other public transportation services. Beginning in 2025-2026,
subject Subject to, and from the funds allocated under, subsection
(24), (21), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall allow programs to utilize those funds for costs
related to parent- or guardian-provided transportation and for
costs related to parent- or guardian-accompanied transportation
provided by transportation service companies, buses, or other
public transportation services. For payments related to parent- or
guardian-provided transportation, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall develop parameters to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

215
ensure dollars are utilized in a way that improves access to
eligible great start readiness program options for low-income and
geographically isolated families. To be eligible for reimbursement
under this subsection in 2024-2025, and to utilize funding under
this subsection, in 2025-2026, a program must submit to the
intermediate district or consortia of intermediate districts all of
the following:
(a) The names of families provided with transportation support
along with a documented reason for the need for transportation
support and the type of transportation provided.
(b) Financial documentation of actual transportation costs
incurred by the program, including, but not limited to, receipts
and mileage reports, as determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential.
(c) Any other documentation or information determined
necessary by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential.
(23) (26) The department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential shall implement a process to review and approve age-
appropriate comprehensive classroom level quality assessments for
GSRP grantees that support the early childhood standards of quality
for birth to kindergarten children adopted by the state board. The
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall
make available to intermediate districts at least 2 classroom level
quality assessments that have been approved by the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(24) (27) An intermediate district that is a GSRP grantee may
approve the use of a supplemental curriculum that aligns with and
enhances the age-appropriate educational curriculum in the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

216
classroom. If the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential objects to the use of a supplemental curriculum
approved by an intermediate district, the director of the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall
establish a review committee independent of the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The review
committee shall meet within 60 days of the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential registering its objection in
writing and provide a final determination on the validity of the
objection within 60 days of the review committee's first meeting.
(25) (28) The department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential shall implement a process to evaluate and approve
age-appropriate educational curricula that are in compliance with
the early childhood standards of quality for birth to kindergarten
children adopted by the state board.
(26) (29) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026
2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for payments to
intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate districts for
professional development and training materials for educators in
programs implementing new curricula or child assessment tools
approved for use in the great start readiness program. Curricula
and child assessment tools purchased with funds received under this
subsection must be in compliance with early childhood standards of
quality for birth to kindergarten children.
(27) (30) A great start readiness program, a GSRP extended
program, a GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program, a GSRP/Head
Start extended blended program, or other eligible great start
readiness programs funded under this section are permitted to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

217
utilize AmeriCorps Pre-K Reading Corps members in classrooms
implementing research-based early literacy intervention strategies.
(28) (31) In addition to the allocation From the state school
aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), from the state
school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $25,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 and
an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 only
for classroom start up grants to intermediate districts and
consortia of intermediate districts for new or expanding great
start readiness classrooms. All of the following apply to funding
allocated under this subsection:
(a) To receive funding under this subsection, intermediate
districts and consortia of intermediate districts must apply for
the funding in a form and manner prescribed by the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(b) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall pay an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for each new
or expanded classroom. If funding is insufficient to fully fund all
eligible applicants, the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential must prorate the per-classroom amount on
an equal basis. If the allocation is not fully paid in the current
fiscal year, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential may award any remaining funding from fiscal year 2024-
2025 during fiscal year 2025-2026, and may award any remaining
funding from fiscal year 2025-2026 during fiscal year 2026-2027 for
each new or expanded classroom at an equal amount per classroom,
based on remaining available funds, not to exceed $50,000.00 per
classroom.
(c) Funds received under this subsection by intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

218
districts and consortia of intermediate districts must be paid in
full to the entity operating the classroom and may be used for 1 or
more of the following purposes:
(i) Costs associated with attracting, recruiting, retaining,
and licensing required classroom education personnel to staff new
or expanded classrooms.
(ii) Supporting facility improvements or purchasing facility
space or modular classroom units necessary to provide a safe, high-
quality learning environment for children in each new or expanded
classroom, and for costs to become a licensed facility such as
architectural drawings, permits, and other prelicensure inspection
fees.
(iii) Outreach material necessary for public awareness that the
great start readiness program has openings in the area and for
costs associated with enrolling eligible children in new or
expanded classrooms.
(iv) Supporting costs in each new or expanded classroom
associated with improving a provider's great start to quality
level.
(d) Recipients of funds under this subsection must demonstrate
that instructional staff have completed, or are in the process of
completing, professional learning in the science of reading. Grant
funds may be used to support this professional learning and are
intended to ensure new classrooms are well equipped to implement
evidence-based early literacy strategies.
(e) The funds allocated under this subsection for 2024-2025
are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for
2024-2025 do not lapse to the state school aid fund and are carried
forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project is to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

219
continue support for new or expanded great start readiness
classrooms. The estimated completion date of the work project is
September 30, 2026.
(f) The funds allocated under this subsection for 2025-2026
are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for
2025-2026 do not lapse to the state school aid fund and are carried
forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to
continue support for new or expanded great start readiness
classrooms. The estimated completion date of the work project is
September 30, 2027.
(e) (g) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments
under this subsection on a schedule determined by the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(32) In addition to the funds allocated in subsection (1),
there is allocated from the general fund money appropriated under
section 11 for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed $1,950,000.00
for an intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate
districts to partner with the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential and community-based organizations to
continue implementing statewide outreach and enrollment campaign
activities to raise awareness about the availability of services
through the great start readiness program, and to promote
enrollment.
(33) The funds allocated under subsection (32) for 2024-2025
are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for
2024-2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the
work project is to raise awareness of and participation in great
start readiness programming. The estimated completion date of the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

220
work project is September 30, 2027.
(34) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under
subsection (32) on a schedule determined by the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
Sec. 32n. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2026-
2027 only an amount not to exceed $79,000,000.00, $50,000,000.00,
and from the state school aid pupil support reserve fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only
an amount not to exceed $75,000,000.00 and for 2026-2027 only an
amount not to exceed $85,000,000.00 to Clinton County RESA to
collaborate with the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential, for the purposes of this section. It is the intent
of the legislature that, for 2026-2027, the allocation from the
state school aid pupil support reserve fund money appropriated in
section 11 for the purposes described in this section will be
$85,000,000.00. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2027-
2028, the allocation from the state school aid pupil support
reserve fund money appropriated in section 11 for the purposes
described in this section will be $100,000,000.00.
(2) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2026-2027 only an
amount not to exceed $57,000,000.00, $50,000,000.00, and from the
state school aid pupil support reserve fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 only an
amount not to exceed $75,000,000.00 $85,000,000.00 for a grant
program for eligible applicants to expand access to quality,
affordable programming before and after the school day or during
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

221
the summer for young people. The department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential shall establish competitive grant
criteria for the program described in this subsection. To be
eligible for a grant under this subsection, section, the applicant
must meet, at a minimum, all of the following criteria:
(a) Serve children in any of grades K to 12.
(b) Be a community-based organization that is exempt from
federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue
code, 26 USC 501, an institution of higher education, a public
library, a local government, or an intermediate district.
(c) Provide before-school, after-school, before-and-after-
school, or summer school programming to children described in
subdivision (a). These programs must be used to support expanded
learning opportunities, including, but not limited to, mentoring,
leadership, community engagement, agriculture, visual and
performing arts, literacy, science, technology, engineering,
mathematics, health and wellness, recreation, financial literacy,
physical fitness, career and college exploration, youth voice, 21st
century skills, conflict resolution, and social engagement
programming.
(d) Address not fewer than 3 measurable goals, including, but
not limited to, improved school attendance, academic outcomes,
improved attitudes toward school, improved positive behaviors,
skill development and retention, higher education aspirations, and
improved family engagement and include activities linked to
research or quality practices.
(e) Be 1 of the following:
(i) A licensed child care organization.
(ii) An entity that has an active application to be a licensed
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

222
child care organization.
(iii) An exempt entity.
(f) For entities meeting eligibility requirements under
subdivision (e)(ii) and (iii), demonstrate in a form and manner
determined by the department that all of the following are in place
for staff working with youth:
(i) Background checks through the Central Registry Clearance
and the Internet Criminal History Access Tool.
(ii) First aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR)
training.
(iii) Health and Safety Training Courses for Child Care
Providers, Modules A, B, and C.
(3) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall establish a competitive grant process for awarding
funding under subsection (2). The department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential shall develop the form and manner for
applying for the grants. The application must include a request for
information on the applicant's outreach to children, youth, and
families who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals under the
Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j.
The application must be open for not less than 30 calendar days.
Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, at At least 30
days before the application is opened, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential must publish on its public
website the criteria that will be used in evaluating the
application that must include, but are not limited to, priorities
under subsection (5). For 2025-2026 only, the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential, is not required to
publish the evaluation criteria at least 30 days before the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

223
application is opened.
(4) Subject to subsection (9), (8), in determining award
amounts under subsection (2), the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential shall, to the extent practicable, ensure
that eligible entities in all geographic regions of this state are
represented in the distribution of grant funding under subsection
(2).
(5) Subject to subsection (9), (8), the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall prioritize the
distribution of grant funding under subsection (2) based on, at a
minimum, the following:
(a) An applicant's demonstrated need.
(b) The percentage of low-income families in the geographic
area being served. Prioritization must be determined by the average
percentage of pupils in the district who are eligible for free and
reduced-priced meals as determined under the Richard B. Russell
national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, where eligible
entities will provide before-and-after-school or summer school
programs.
(c) Whether the application provides services for the full
school year.
(d) The applicant's track record for providing quality,
affordable before-and-after-school or summer school services.
(e) Whether an applicant serving children in any of grades K
to 8 is a licensed child care organization, is an entity that has
an active application to be a licensed child care organization, or
has implemented the Michigan Out-of-School Time Standards of
Quality if the applicant is an exempt entity and, beginning in
2025-2026, serves at least 15 school-age youth at a single location
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

224
in grades K to 12.
(6) Subject to subsection (7), an An eligible entity that
receives grant funding under subsection (2) shall use the funding
only to provide before-school, after-school, before-and-after-
school, or summer school programming to children described in
subsection (2)(a). The programming offered under subsection (2)
must meet all of the following:
(a) For programming that is offered by a licensed child care
organization, be provided to children and youth in a manner in
which the children are physically present at the building or
location for which the licensed child care organization received
its license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, or, for
programming that is offered by an exempt entity serving grades K to
12, be provided to children and youth in a manner in which the
children and youth are physically present at a building or location
designated by the exempt entity.
(b) Provide educational programming in core subject areas,
including, but not limited to, mathematics, reading, and science.
(c) Provide data to evaluate the program in a form and manner
as prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential.
(7) For 2024-2025 only, and subject to subsections (4) and
(5), up to 2% of funding allocated under subsection (2) must be
allocated to a nonprofit entity with experience serving youth-
serving organizations to provide start-up grants and capacity
building, professional development, and technical assistance for
implementation of high-quality, evidence-based out-of-school time
learning opportunities.
(7) (8) Beginning in 2025-2026, all All of the following apply
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

225
to funding allocated under this section:
(a) An amount not to exceed 0.25% of the funding allocated
under subsection (2) or $250,000.00, whichever is greater, may be
retained by Clinton County RESA for administrative costs.
(b) An amount not to exceed $500,000.00 of the funding
allocated under subsection (2) must be allocated by Clinton County
RESA, as directed by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, and in collaboration with the center
and the Michigan afterschool partnership as needed, to provide
statewide evaluation activities of eligible youth served, their
families, and programs funded under this section. This evaluation
must allow for a comparative analysis between program youth and
their peers in grades K to 12.
(c) An amount not to exceed 1.5% of the funding allocated
under subsection (2) must be allocated by Clinton County RESA, as
directed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, and in collaboration with the Michigan afterschool
partnership, to provide statewide out-of-school time activities and
supports including, but not limited to, capacity building
initiatives, professional development, and technical assistance to
increase the likelihood for implementation of high quality,
evidence-based, out-of-school time learning opportunities by
eligible entities under subsections (4) and (5).
(8) (9) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall award not less than 60% of the funding under
subsection (2) to community-based organizations.
(9) (10) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments
under this section in full upon grant award. Grantees that do not
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

226
comply with reporting requirements, fail to provide the services
proposed in their grant application, or close during the grant
period may be required to repay the funding they received under
this section to the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential.
(10) (11) The department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential, in collaboration with the Michigan Afterschool
Partnership, shall convene an advisory committee to review the
program components listed within this section and make
recommendations to the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential for changes on the program described in
this section. The advisory committee shall meet at a schedule set
by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, or at least quarterly. The advisory committee shall
provide for the involvement of, but not limited to, community-based
organizations, regional intermediaries, district administrators,
youth, parents, and representatives from the business and
philanthropic communities, as appropriate.
(12) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), Clinton County RESA shall allocate $22,000,000.00
in 2024-2025 only to recipients under this subsection as follows:
(a) $4,000,000.00 to support the efforts of FFA.
(b) $4,000,000.00 to the Boys and Girls Club of Southeastern
Michigan in Detroit to expand programming. Programming expansion
includes, but is not limited to, construction or remodeling of
facilities to allow for new or extended programs.
(c) $4,000,000.00 to the HYPE Athletics Center in Dearborn
Heights to provide programming that may include, but is not limited
to, science, technology, engineering, arts, and mathematics (STEAM)
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

227
programs; literacy and reading programs; after-school programs;
youth fitness and athletic programs; and mental health and
behavioral health services.
(d) $1,500,000.00 to Brilliant Detroit to support delivery of
high-dosage neighborhood-based tutoring and direct noninstructional
services for at-risk pupils who are 3 to 12 years of age. Funding
under this subdivision is intended to ensure that pupils are
proficient in English language arts by the end of grade 3 and
proficient in mathematics by the end of grade 8, that all
participants are kindergarten ready, and that pupils are prepared
to attend school regularly. As used in this subdivision, "at-risk
pupil" means that term as defined in section 31a.
(e) $1,200,000.00 to the State Alliance of Michigan YMCAs to
provide students in grades 6 to 12 with hands-on civics and model-
government programs that offer statewide engagement with peers
across this state for the purpose of expanding those students'
opportunities to improve their social studies knowledge, thinking
skills, and intellectual processes and dispositions required for
active engagement in fulfilling responsibilities of civic
participation.
(f) $1,000,000.00 to the Downtown Boxing Gym in Detroit to
expand programming. Programming expansion includes, but is not
limited to, construction or remodeling of facilities to allow for
new or extended programs.
(g) $1,000,000.00 to support the operations of the Flint
Center for Educational Excellence.
(h) $800,000.00 to the Detroit Opera for educational
programming for grades pre-K to 12, including field trips, summer
camps, and other learning opportunities. The funds allocated under
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

228
this subdivision are a work project appropriation, and any
unexpended funds for 2024-2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026.
The purpose of the work project is to support the Detroit Opera
educational programming as described in this subdivision. The
estimated completion date of the work project is September 30,
2028.
(i) $500,000.00 to Special Olympics Michigan, a nonprofit
organization organized under the laws of this state that is exempt
from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, that has a mission statement to
provide year-round sports training and athletic competition for
children and adults with intellectual disabilities. Funding under
this subdivision must be used by the organization to expand the
organization's programming.
(j) $500,000.00 to the Horatio Williams Foundation to support
efforts to provide college preparation services, math leagues,
sports programming, and literacy services in Detroit.
(k) $500,000.00 to Friends of the Children, a nonprofit
organization that employs salaried professional mentors who support
youth and their families from grades K to 12. The salaried
professional mentorship program in this subdivision must employ a
2-generational approach to supporting youth in and outside of the
classroom, particularly in reading and math comprehension; support
students and their families by connecting them to concrete supports
like education and employment pathways, housing, utility
assistance, and food security; and be located in a city with a
population greater than 600,000 in a county with a population
greater than 1,500,000 according to the most recent federal
decennial census.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

229
(l) $500,000.00 to the Detroit Police Athletic League to
support operations and programming including, but not limited to,
athletic programs and youth enrichment programs.
(m) $500,000.00 to the Detroit Science Center, a nonprofit
organization that is tax-exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, and located in a city
with a population greater than 600,000 in a county with a
population greater than 1,700,000 according to the most recent
federal decennial census. Funds under this subdivision must be used
by the nonprofit organization to expand the nonprofit
organization's mission of providing opportunities for students to
discover, explore, and appreciate science, technology, engineering,
and mathematics in a creative, dynamic learning environment.
(n) $2,000,000.00 to buildOn Detroit to expand the Service
Learning Program for high school students.
(13) For 2024-2025 only, recipients of grants under subsection
(12) may not apply for funding under subsection (2).
(14) Funds allocated under subsection (12) for 2024-2025 are a
work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-2025
are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project
is to provide additional support to out-of-school time programs.
The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30,
2026.
(11) Subject to subsection (2), the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall establish and implement
a multi-tiered grant funding structure within its competitive grant
process to account for statewide or regional grant applications, as
well as midsize grants serving 6 to 14 program sites and smaller
grants serving 1 to 5 program sites.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

230
(12) (15) As used in this section:
(a) "An entity that has an active application to be a licensed
child care organization" means an entity that has an active
application to be a licensed child care organization under 1973 PA
116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, and will be a licensed child care
organization before the entity provides services for which a child
care organization is required to be licensed under 1973 PA 116, MCL
722.111 to 722.128.
(b) "Child care organization" means that term as defined in
section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111.
(c) "Exempt entity" means an entity described in section
1(1)(i)(i) to (v) of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111.
(d) "Licensed child care organization" means a child care
organization that has been issued a license under 1973 PA 116, MCL
722.111 to 722.128, to operate a child care organization.
(e) "School-age" means a child who is eligible to attend a
grade of kindergarten or higher, but is less than 13 years of age.
A child is considered to be school age on the first day of the
school year in which the child is eligible under section 1 of 1973
PA 116, MCL 722.111.
(f) "Statewide or regional grant" means a grant to 2 or more
entities, community-based organizations, statewide network
affiliations, or any combination of those entities working together
with the objective of serving more than 2,000 children across at
least 15 program sites statewide, or to serve more than 2,000
children across at least 15 program sites within a publicly defined
boundary region, and that have a demonstrated track record of
success in providing or organizing a statewide or regional system
of out-of-school time programs. If an applicant applies for a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

231
statewide or regional grant, the applicant and the program sites
included on their application may not appear on any other grant
application submitted for funding under subsection (2).
Sec. 32p. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $30,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 to intermediate districts or
consortia of intermediate districts to support evidence-based early
childhood system building as described in this section.
(2) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$15,900,000.00 to intermediate districts for the purpose of
coordinating early childhood services to support the goals and
outcomes under subsections (3), (5), (7), and (8) and to provide
supports for early childhood programs for children prenatal through
age 5. The funding provided to each intermediate district under
this section is determined by the distribution formula established
by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential
for the former Great Start collaboratives. To receive funding under
this section, each intermediate district must provide an
application to the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential, by a date determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential, indicating the strategies
planned to be provided and how the strategies align with the Help
Me Grow National Fidelity Assessment.
(3) Each intermediate district or consortium of intermediate
districts that receives funding under this section shall convene a
Help Me Grow collaborative that includes an active partnership with
families and multiple community-based organizations. Each
intermediate district is required to employ at least a 0.8 FTE Help
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

232
Me Grow lead responsible for local system building activities and
at least a 0.5 FTE care coordinator for each intermediate district
region. The goal of each Help Me Grow collaborative is to ensure
the coordination and expansion of local early childhood systems and
programs that achieve the following outcomes:
(a) Improve family access, leadership, and engagement.
(b) Enhance child development, learning, and well-being.
(c) Create strong, efficient community systems.
(4) The responsibilities of the intermediate district Help Me
Grow lead described in subsection (3) include at least the
following:
(a) Facilitating local Help Me Grow collaboratives and
demonstrating growth toward fidelity to the Help Me Grow model by
implementing the following 4 core components of the model and its
key activities as indicated by the Help Me Grow National Fidelity
Assessment:
(i) Centralized access point.
(ii) Family and community outreach.
(iii) Child health provider outreach.
(iv) Data collection and analysis.
(b) Ensuring that local early childhood initiatives are data
driven and reflect the needs of the community, including literacy,
home visiting, and other early childhood programs.
(c) Completing the annual Help Me Grow National Fidelity
Assessment and tracking relevant data, including referrals,
systems-building activities, outreach efforts, developmental
screenings, and barriers, to demonstrate progress and inform
continuous improvement.
(d) Providing universal access to developmental screening for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

233
children birth through age 5.
(e) Ensuring the local intermediate district has a dedicated
care coordinator to support families in the community, either by
hiring locally, collaborating amongst intermediate districts, or
contracting with Help Me Grow Michigan. The care coordinator shall
have sufficient time dedicated to provide all of the following:
(i) Regular support of a public telephone line during work
hours to answer family questions.
(ii) Follow-up on universal developmental screenings and
referrals to appropriate early childhood programs and services.
(iii) Data tracking to ensure referrals from Help Me Grow
successfully connect to early childhood services.
(iv) Coordinated cross-sector supports to ensure that families
are seamlessly connected to the full scope of services within the
intermediate district region.
(5) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$7,200,000.00 for the purpose of providing family support services,
including, but not limited to, home visiting, to at-risk children
and their families. From the funds allocated in this subsection,
$3,500,000.00 must be distributed to intermediate districts that
were awarded funds under former section 32p(4) in 2024-2025 to
provide home visits. Any remaining funds must be distributed
equally to all other intermediate districts. The family support
services described in this subsection must be conducted as part of
a locally coordinated, family-centered, evidence-based, data-driven
strategic plan that is approved by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential and aligned with the Help Me
Grow National Fidelity Assessment. The goals of the family support
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

234
services funded under this subsection are to improve school
readiness using evidence-based methods, including a focus on
developmentally appropriate outcomes for early literacy, to improve
positive parenting practices, and to improve family economic self-
sufficiency while reducing the impact of high-risk factors through
community resources and referrals. The department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall coordinate the goals of
the strategic plans approved under this subsection with other state
agency home visit programs in a way that strengthens Michigan's
home visiting infrastructure and maximizes federal funds available
for the purposes of at-risk family support services. The
coordination among departments and agencies is intended to avoid
duplication of state services and spending, and should emphasize
efficient delivery of family support services.
(6) At a date determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential each year, each intermediate
district shall provide a report to Help Me Grow Michigan detailing
the strategies implemented during the immediately preceding year,
data on families served, and progress toward model fidelity based
upon the Help Me Grow National Fidelity Assessment. Help Me Grow
Michigan shall provide a completed copy of the statewide report to
the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential,
who will submit a summary, including progress made toward the goals
and outcomes described in subsections (3), (5), (7), and (8), to
the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid and
to the house and senate fiscal agencies by not later than March 31
of each year.
(7) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

235
$4,000,000.00 to improve literacy outcomes and advance school
readiness for children prenatal through age 5 by implementing
evidence-based practices through Help Me Grow collaboratives that
engage families in education on reading aloud with their children,
reading frequency, and other developmentally appropriate and
evidence-based reading improvement techniques on a recurring basis.
A Help Me Grow collaborative may only use the funding to implement
family engagement practices that have an evidence base showing
improvement in early literacy outcomes with children prenatal
through age 5. Family engagements may occur through Early On
visits, evidence-based home visits, and Reach Out and Read well-
child visits. Early childhood and medical professionals who engage
with the child's family must have participated in evidence-based
training or coaching on the literacy strategies implemented. A Help
Me Grow collaborative that receives funds under this subsection
must report to the state data collected during these family
engagements, including at least the type of engagement, frequency
of engagement, coaching or training model, and outcome data. The
formula described in subsection (1) must be used to allocate funds
to intermediate districts under this subsection. If funding under
this subsection is insufficient to enroll all interested families
in the service, each intermediate district must prioritize
enrollment to those families with the highest levels of economic
need. If an intermediate district will not fully use funding
received under this subsection, those funds must be returned to the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for
redistribution for the purposes under this subsection.
(8) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 to intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

236
districts in a manner determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential, to support MiFamily
Engagement Regional Centers. To be eligible for funds awarded under
this subsection, intermediate districts must partner with an entity
with expertise in family leadership, as determined by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(9) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate
districts that receives funding under this section may carry over
any unexpended funds received under this section into the next
fiscal year and may expend those unused funds through June 30 of
the next fiscal year.
(10) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$50,000.00 to Oakland Schools to provide strategic leadership to
the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential
and Help Me Grow Michigan. Oakland Schools may retain not more than
5% of the funding received under this section for administrative
purposes and shall use remaining funding to support expansion and
enhancement of Help Me Grow.
(11) From the state school aid fund money allocated in
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$1,350,000.00 to Clinton County RESA as fiscal agent and partner
for Help Me Grow Michigan to provide statewide leadership, a
central access point, technical assistance, community outreach, and
administrative support. Statewide strategic leadership will be
supported as described in subsection (10). Clinton County RESA may
retain not more than 5% of the funding received under this section
for administrative purposes and shall use remaining funding to
support expansion and enhancement of Help Me Grow.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

237
(12) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under
this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential.
Sec. 32t. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 only an amount not to exceed $25,000,000.00 $11,000,000.00 to
Clinton County RESA (CCRESA) for to continue phase 2 of a preschool
pilot program to provide services to 3-year-old children. Eligible
children are those whose age is less than 4 years on September 1
and greater than or equal to 3 years on December 1 of the current
school year and whose family income is at or below 250% of the
federal poverty level, with priority given to families with lower
incomes. Additional factors such as developmental delay, language
barriers, or challenging behaviors may also be considered for
eligibility. These services must be designed for children who are
age 3 and must be similar to the services provided through the
great start readiness program. The program described in this
section must be administered by CCRESA Strong Beginnings
Implementation Team under the direction of the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential, with assessment,
data, and collection analysis for the program being provided by
Michigan State University.
(2) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential must pay the funding under this section to Clinton County
RESA in installments over 2 years. The department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall determine the amount to
be used in each year.
(2) (3) This section is intended to provide planning for and
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

238
implement continue phase 2 of the pilot preschool program for 3-
year-old children. The second phase of the pilot will examine
variations of the current program, such as part-day, 5-day-per-
week, multiage grouping with the great start readiness program, and
inclusion.
(3) (4) In order to evaluate the outcomes and impact of strong
beginnings, Clinton County RESA and Michigan State University shall
compare outcomes for children who attend strong beginnings and the
great start readiness program with:
(a) Outcomes for children who attend the great start readiness
program only.
(b) Outcomes for children who did not attend either program.
(4) (5) Data used for the purpose of comparisons under
subsection (4) (3) must include, at a minimum, strong beginnings
waitlist data, strong beginnings child assessment data, the great
start readiness program child assessment data, kindergarten
attendance data, and elementary standardized testing data.
(5) (6) At the end of phase 2, Clinton County RESA shall
provide a report to the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential detailing all of the following:
(a) How the phase 2 pilot was conducted.
(b) Demographics of the children served.
(c) Outcomes achieved.
(d) Scope of expansion, including successes and challenges the
pilot faced and how the implementation team responded.
(e) An updated model, including phase 2 variations, this state
could use to scale the program statewide, if funding were
available.
(6) (7) The funds allocated under this section for 2025-2026
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

239
2026-2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended
funds for 2025-2026 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2026-2027.
2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to expand phase 1 of
the pilot to additional classrooms and initiate phase 2 of the
pilot. The estimated completion date of the work project is
September 30, 2029.2030.
(7) (8) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments
under this section on a schedule determined by the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
Sec. 35a. (1) From the appropriations in section 11, there is
allocated for 2024-2025 an amount not to exceed $82,900,000.00 and
for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $52,000,000.00 for 2026-2027
an amount not to exceed $102,500,000.00 from the state school aid
fund for the purposes of this section. It is the intent of the
legislature that, for 2026-2027, 2027-2028, the allocation from the
state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for the
purposes described in this section will be $42,000,000.00.
Excluding staff or contracted employees funded under subsection
(8), the $52,500,000.00. The superintendent shall designate staff
or contracted employees funded under this section as critical
shortage. By not later than December 31 of each fiscal year in
which funding is allocated under this section, the superintendent
of public instruction shall do both of the following:
(a) Report in person to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid regarding progress on early literacy
and be available for questioning as prescribed through a process
developed by the chairs of the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

240
(b) Submit a written report to the house and senate
appropriations subcommittees on school aid regarding progress on
early literacy. Beginning in 2025-2026, the The report described in
this subdivision must include the number of literacy coaches
supported by funding provided under subsection (4), (2), including
the number of coaches supported in each intermediate district, and
the percentage of supported coaches that have received, or are in
the process of receiving, professional learning by the approved
provider described in subsection (11).(5).
(2) A district that receives funds under subsection (5) may
spend up to 5% of those funds for professional development for
educators in a department-approved research-based training program
related to current state literacy standards for pupils in grades
pre-K to 5. The professional development must also include training
in the use of screening and diagnostic tools, progress monitoring,
and intervention methods used to address barriers to learning and
delays in learning that are diagnosed through the use of these
tools.
(3) A district that receives funds under subsection (5) may
use up to 5% of those funds to administer department-approved
screening and diagnostic tools to monitor the development of early
literacy and early reading skills, and risk factors for word-level
reading difficulties of pupils in grades pre-K to 5 and to support
evidence-based professional learning described in subsection (11)
for educators in administering and using screening, progress
monitoring, and diagnostic assessment data to inform instruction
through prevention and intervention in a multi-tiered system of
supports framework. A department-approved screening and diagnostic
tool administered by a district using funding under this section
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

241
must include all of the following components: phonemic awareness,
phonics, fluency, rapid automatized naming (RAN), and
comprehension. Further, all of the following sub-skills must be
assessed within each of these components:
(a) Phonemic awareness - segmentation, blending, and sound
manipulation (deletion and substitution).
(b) Phonics - decoding (reading) and encoding (spelling).
(c) Fluency.
(d) Comprehension - making meaning of text.
(2) (4) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $42,000,000.00 $52,500,000.00 for
2024-2025 and 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the purpose of providing
early literacy coaches at intermediate districts to assist teachers
in developing and implementing instructional strategies for pupils
in grades pre-K to 5 so that pupils are reading at grade level by
the end of grade 3. All of the following apply to funding under
this subsection:
(a) The department shall develop an application process
consistent with the provisions of this subsection. An application
must provide assurances that literacy coaches funded under this
subsection are knowledgeable about at least the following:
(i) Current state literacy standards for pupils in grades pre-K
to 3.
(ii) Implementing an instructional delivery model based on
frequent use of formative, screening, and diagnostic tools, known
as a multi-tiered system of supports, to determine individual
progress for pupils in grades pre-K to 5 so that pupils are reading
at grade level by the end of grade 3.
(iii) The use of data from diagnostic tools to determine the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

242
necessary additional supports and interventions needed by
individual pupils in grades pre-K to 5 to read at grade level.
(b) From the allocation under this subsection, the department
shall award grants to intermediate districts for the support of
early literacy coaches. The department shall provide this funding
in the following manner:
(i) The department shall award each intermediate district grant
funding to support the cost of 2 4 early literacy coaches in an
equal amount per early literacy coach, not to exceed $125,000.00.
(ii) After distribution of the grant funding under subparagraph
(i), the department shall distribute the remainder of grant funding
for additional early literacy coaches in an amount not to exceed
$125,000.00 per early literacy coach. The number of funded early
literacy coaches for each intermediate district is The department
shall ensure that each intermediate district receives funding for
at least 1 additional literacy coach compared to the number of
coaches funded under this section in 2025-2026.
(iii) If funding under this subsection remains available after
the distributions in subparagraphs (i) and (ii), the department shall
distribute the remaining funds based on the percentage of the total
statewide number of pupils in grades K to 3 who meet the income
eligibility standards for the federal free and reduced-price lunch
programs who are enrolled in districts in the intermediate
district. Funds may be distributed under this section only after
the department ensures that no intermediate district receives
funding for fewer literacy coaches in 2026-2027 compared to the
number of coaches for which the intermediate district received
funding in 2025-2026.
(c) If an intermediate district that receives funding under
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

243
this subsection uses an assessment tool that screens for
characteristics of dyslexia, the intermediate district shall use
the assessment results from that assessment tool to identify pupils
who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia.
(d) All literacy coaches funded under this subsection must
have already received, or be making progress toward receiving,
professional learning by the approved provider described in
subsection (11).(5).
(e) To be eligible to receive funding under this subsection,
an intermediate district must provide the department with a list by
September 1 of the immediately preceding fiscal year containing
contact information for all literacy coaches funded under this
subsection, in a form and manner determined by the department. An
intermediate district shall communicate any personnel changes and
changes to contact information for literacy coaches funded under
this subsection to the department within 30 days of the personnel
change or change in contact information.
(5) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $19,900,000.00 for 2024-2025 to
districts that provide additional instructional time to those
pupils in grades pre-K to 5 who have been identified by using
department-approved screening and diagnostic tools as needing
additional supports and interventions to read at grade level by the
end of grade 3. Additional instructional time may be provided
before, during, and after regular school hours or as part of a
year-round balanced school calendar. All of the following apply to
funding under this subsection:
(a) To be eligible to receive funding, a district must
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the district
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

244
has done all of the following:
(i) Implemented a multi-tiered system of supports instructional
delivery model that is an evidence-based model that uses data-
driven problem solving to integrate academic and behavioral
instruction and that uses intervention delivered to all pupils in
varying intensities based on pupil needs. The multi-tiered system
of supports must provide at least all of the following essential
components:
(A) Team-based leadership.
(B) A tiered delivery system.
(C) Selection and implementation of instruction,
interventions, and supports.
(D) A comprehensive screening and assessment system.
(E) Continuous data-based decision making.
(ii) Used department-approved research-based diagnostic tools
to identify individual pupils in need of additional instructional
time.
(iii) Used a reading instruction method that focuses on the 5
fundamental building blocks of reading: phonics, phonemic
awareness, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension and content
knowledge.
(iv) Provided teachers of pupils in grades pre-K to 5 with
research-based professional development in diagnostic data
interpretation.
(v) Complied with the requirements under section 1280f of the
revised school code, MCL 380.1280f.
(b) The department shall distribute funding allocated under
this subsection to eligible districts on an equal per-first-grade-
pupil basis.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

245
(c) If the funds allocated under this subsection are
insufficient to fully fund the payments under this subsection,
payments under this subsection are prorated on an equal per-pupil
basis based on grade 1 pupils.
(6) By not later than September 1 of each year, a district
that receives funding under subsection (5) in conjunction with the
Michigan student data system, if possible, shall provide to the
department a report that includes at least both of the following,
in a form and manner prescribed by the department:
(a) For pupils in grades pre-K to 5, the teachers, pupils,
schools, and grades served with funds under this section and the
categories of services provided.
(b) For pupils in grades pre-K to 5, pupil proficiency and
growth data that allows analysis both in the aggregate and by each
of the following subgroups, as applicable:
(i) School.
(ii) Grade level.
(iii) Gender.
(iv) Race.
(v) Ethnicity.
(vi) Economically disadvantaged status.
(vii) Disability.
(viii) Pupils identified as having reading deficiencies.
(7) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $6,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 to an
intermediate district in which the combined total number of pupils
in membership of all of its constituent districts is the fewest
among all intermediate districts. All of the following apply to the
funding under this subsection:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

246
(a) Funding under this subsection must be used by the
intermediate district, in partnership with an association that
represents intermediate district administrators in this state, to
implement all of the following:
(i) Literacy essentials teacher and principal training modules.
(ii) Face-to-face and online professional learning of literacy
essentials teacher and principal training modules for literacy
coaches, principals, and teachers.
(iii) The placement of regional lead literacy coaches to
facilitate professional learning for early literacy coaches. These
regional lead literacy coaches shall provide support for new
literacy coaches, building teachers, and administrators and shall
facilitate regional data collection to evaluate the effectiveness
of statewide literacy coaches funded under this section.
(iv) Provide $500,000.00 from this subsection for literacy
training, modeling, coaching, and feedback for district principals
or chief administrators, as applicable. The training described in
this subparagraph must use the pre-K and K to 3 essential
instructional practices in literacy created by the general
education leadership network as the framework for all training
provided under this subparagraph.
(v) Job-embedded professional learning opportunities for
mathematics teachers through mathematics instructional coaching.
Funding must be used for professional learning for coaches,
professional developers, administrators, and teachers; coaching for
early mathematics educators; the development of statewide and
regional professional learning networks in mathematics
instructions; and the development and support of digital
professional learning modules.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

247
(b) By not later than September 1 of each year, the
intermediate district described in this subsection, in consultation
with grant recipients, shall submit a report to the chairs of the
senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the
chairs of the senate and house standing committees responsible for
education legislation, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and
the state budget director. The report described under this
subdivision must include student achievement results in English
language arts and mathematics and survey results with feedback from
parents and teachers regarding the initiatives implemented under
this subsection.
(c) Up to 2% of funds allocated under this subsection may be
used by the association representing intermediate district
administrators that is in partnership with the intermediate
district specified in this subsection to administer this
subsection.
(8) From the allocation under subsection (1), the department
shall allocate the amount of $5,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 only to an
intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts to
partner with the Michigan Education Corps for the PreK Reading
Corps, the K3 Reading Corps, and the Math Corps. An intermediate
district or a consortium of intermediate districts receiving
funding under this subsection must forward the amount received
under this subsection to the Michigan Education Corps for statewide
services. As conditions of receiving funding from an intermediate
district or a consortium of intermediate districts, all of the
following apply to funding received by the Michigan Education Corps
under this subsection:
(a) By September 1 of the current fiscal year, the Michigan
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

248
Education Corps shall provide a report concerning its use of the
funding to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on
school aid, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the senate
and house caucus policy offices on outcomes and performance
measures of the Michigan Education Corps, including, but not
limited to, the degree to which the Michigan Education Corps'
replication of the PreK Reading Corps, the K3 Reading Corps, and
the Math Corps programs is demonstrating sufficient efficacy and
impact. The report must include data pertaining to at least all of
the following:
(i) The current impact of the programs on this state in terms
of numbers of children and schools receiving support. This portion
of the report must specify the number of children tutored,
including dosage and completion, and the demographics of those
children.
(ii) Whether the assessments and interventions are implemented
with fidelity. This portion of the report must include details on
the total number of assessments and interventions completed and the
range, mean, and standard deviation.
(iii) Whether the literacy or math improvement of children
participating in the programs is consistent with expectations. This
portion of the report must detail at least all of the following:
(A) Growth rate by grade or age level, in comparison to
targeted growth rate.
(B) Average linear growth rates.
(C) Exit rates.
(D) Percentage of children who exit who also meet or exceed
spring benchmarks.
(iv) The impact of the programs on organizations and
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

249
stakeholders, including, but not limited to, school administrators,
internal coaches, and AmeriCorps members.
(b) If the department determines that the Michigan Education
Corps has misused the funds allocated under this subsection, the
Michigan Education Corps shall reimburse this state for the amount
of state funding misused.
(c) An intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate
districts may not reserve any portion of the allocation provided
under this subsection for an evaluation of the Michigan Education
Corps, the Michigan Education Corps' funding, or the Michigan
Education Corps' programming unless agreed to in writing by the
Michigan Education Corps. An intermediate district or a consortium
of intermediate districts shall award the entire amount allocated
under this subsection to the Michigan Education Corps and shall not
condition the forwarding of this funding on the implementation of
an independent evaluation.
(f) The department shall develop a coaching evaluation
framework to be implemented in alignment to the literacy coaching
model described in section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL
388.1280f.
(g) All literacy coaches funded under this subsection must
comply with the requirements described in section 35o.
(3) (9) If a district or intermediate district expends any
funding received under subsection (4) or (5) (2) for professional
development in research-based effective reading instruction, the
district or intermediate district shall select a professional
development program from the list described in subdivision (a). All
of the following apply to the requirement under this subsection:
(a) The department shall issue a request for proposals for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

250
professional development programs in research-based effective
reading instruction to develop an initial approved list of
professional development programs in research-based effective
reading instruction. The department shall make the initial approved
list public and shall determine if it will, on a rolling basis,
approve any new proposals submitted for addition to its initial
approved list.
(b) To be included as an approved professional development
program in research-based effective reading instruction under
subdivision (a), an applicant must demonstrate to the department in
writing the program's competency in all of the following topics:
(i) Understanding of phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency,
vocabulary, and comprehension.
(ii) Appropriate use of assessments and differentiated
instruction.
(iii) Selection of appropriate instructional materials.
(iv) Application of research-based instructional practices.
(c) As used in this subsection, "effective reading
instruction" means reading instruction scientifically proven to
result in improvement in pupil reading skills.
(4) (10) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 $50,000,000.00 for
2024-2025 and 2025-2026 2026-2027 only to an intermediate district
identified by the department for the provision of professional
learning by the approved provider described in subsection (11),
first to educators in pre-K, kindergarten, and grade 1 next to
educators in grade 2 and grade 3; and then to additional elementary
school educators and pre-K to grade 12 certificated special
education personnel with endorsements in learning disabilities,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

251
emotional impairments, or speech and language impairments. (5) to
pre-K to grade 5 educators, special education educators, and
administrators overseeing these individuals. Funding allocated
under this subsection must be distributed over a 5-year period. The
funds allocated under this subsection are a work project
appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027 are carried
forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to
continue the provision of professional learning as described in
this subsection and subsection (5). The estimated completion date
of the work project is September 30, 2031. For purposes of this
subsection, the approved provider described in subsection (5) must
establish and manage professional learning opportunities that are
open to all school personnel described in this subsection. as
follows:
(a) The approved provider must first open voluntary enrollment
for any pre-K through grade 3 teacher on a first-come, first-served
basis, with voluntary enrollment prioritized for pre-K,
kindergarten, and grade 1 teachers. The approved provider shall
then open voluntary enrollment for the remaining school personnel
described in this subsection.
(b) The approved provider must maintain open enrollment until
all funds are expended.
(5) (11) For the provision of professional learning to the
school personnel described in subsection (10), (4), LETRS is the
approved provider of professional learning as long as LETRS
continues to meet all of the following:
(a) Be offered through a system of training that provides
educators with the knowledge base to effectively implement any
class-wide, supplemental, or intervention reading approach and to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

252
determine why some students struggle with reading, writing,
spelling, and language.
(b) Provide training activities that direct educators to
implement effective reading and spelling instruction supported by
scientifically based research and foster a direct explicit
instructional sequence that uses techniques to support teachers'
independence in using their newly-learned skills with students in
the classroom.
(c) Include integrated components for educators and
administrators in pre-K to grade 3 with embedded evaluation or
assessment of knowledge. Evaluation or assessment of knowledge
under this subdivision must incorporate evaluations of learning
throughout each unit and include a summative assessment that must
be completed to demonstrate successful course completion.
(d) Build teacher content knowledge and pedagogical knowledge
of the critical components of literacy including how the brain
learns to read, phonological and phonemic awareness; letter
knowledge; phonics; advanced phonics; vocabulary and oral language;
fluency; comprehension; spelling and writing; and the organization
of language.
(e) Support educators in understanding how to effectively use
screening, progress monitoring, and diagnostic assessment data to
improve literacy outcomes through prevention and intervention for
reading difficulties in a multi-tiered system of supports. The
multi-tiered system of supports must include at least all of the
following essential components:
(i) Team-based leadership.
(ii) A tiered delivery system.
(iii) Selection and implementation of instruction,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

253
interventions, and supports.
(iv) A comprehensive screening and assessment system.
(v) Continuous data-based decision making.
(12) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments made under subsections (7) and (8) on a schedule
determined by the department.
(f) On a quarterly basis, report all of the following
information to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by
the department:
(i) The total number of individuals who have completed the
required professional learning, organized by role group.
(ii) The total number of individuals who are enrolled in the
professional learning, organized by role group.
(iii) The total number of individuals who enrolled but withdrew
from the professional learning prior to completion, organized by
role group.
(iv) The total number of individuals who enrolled but
transferred to a different cohort prior to completion, organized by
role group.
(v) The cost per individual to enroll in the professional
learning.
(vi) The total grant funds expended for all individuals who
completed or enrolled in the professional learning during the
quarter reported.
(vii) The total unused grant funds for the quarter reported.
(viii) The strategies and technical assistance provided to
support participant completion.
(6) (13) As used in this section:
(a) "Dyslexia" means both of the following:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

254
(i) A specific learning disorder that is neurobiological in
origin and characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent
word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities that
typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of
language that is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive
abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction.
(ii) A specific learning disorder that may include secondary
consequences, such as problems in reading comprehension and a
reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of vocabulary
and background knowledge and lead to social, emotional, and
behavioral difficulties.
(b) "Evidence-based" means an activity, program, process,
service, strategy, or intervention that demonstrates statistically
significant effects on improving pupil outcomes or other relevant
outcomes and that meets at least both of the following:
(i) At least 1 of the following:
(A) Is based on strong evidence from at least 1 well-designed
and well-implemented experimental study.
(B) Is based on moderate evidence from at least 1 well-
designed and well-implemented quasi-experimental study.
(C) Is based on promising evidence from at least 1 well-
designed and well-implemented correlational study with statistical
controls for selection bias.
(D) Demonstrates a rationale based on high-quality research
findings or positive evaluation that the activity, program,
process, service, strategy, or intervention is likely to improve
pupil outcomes or other relevant outcomes.
(ii) Includes ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the
activity, program, process, service, strategy, or intervention.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

255
(c) "Explicit" means direct and deliberate instruction through
continuous pupil-teacher interaction that includes teacher
modeling, guided practice, and independent practice.
(d) "Fluency" means the ability to read with speed, accuracy,
and proper expression.
(e) "Multi-tiered system of supports" means a comprehensive
framework that includes 3 distinct tiers of instructional support
and is composed of a collection of evidence-based strategies
designed to meet the individual needs and assets of a whole pupil
at all achievement levels.
(f) "Phonemic awareness" means the conscious awareness of all
of the following:
(i) Individual speech sounds, including, but not limited to,
consonants and vowels, in spoken syllables.
(ii) The ability to consciously manipulate through, including,
but not limited to, matching, blending, segmenting, deleting, or
substituting, individual speech sounds described in subparagraph
(i).
(iii) All levels of the speech sound system, including, but not
limited to, word boundaries, rhyme recognition, stress patterns,
syllables, onset-rime units, and phonemes.
(g) "Phonological" means relating to the system of contrastive
relationships among the speech sounds that constitute the
fundamental components of a language.
(h) "Progress monitoring" means the assessing of students'
academic performance, quantifying students' rates of improvement or
progress toward goals, and determining how students are responding
to instruction.
(i) "Rapid automatized naming (RAN)" means a task that
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

256
measures how quickly individuals can name objects; pictures;
colors; or symbols, including letters and digits, aloud, which can
predict later reading abilities for preliterate children.
Sec. 35e. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only
an amount not to exceed $250,000.00 to Wayne State University to
study this state's public school library programs.
(2) Wayne State University shall convene a committee to
conduct the study described in this section. The committee must
consist of 1 member from each of the following organizations:
(a) The department.
(b) The Library of Michigan.
(c) The Michigan Association of School Librarians.
(d) The Michigan senate.
(e) The Michigan house of representatives.
(f) The Michigan Education Association.
(g) The Michigan chapter of the American Federation of
Teachers.
(h) The Michigan Association of Superintendents and
Administrators.
(i) A Michigan research university.
(3) The committee described in subsection (2) shall conduct a
study to investigate at least all of the following issues:
(a) How many schools in each district have a school library.
(b) What hours school libraries are open each week for
students and faculty to use.
(c) What full-time equivalency of certified school librarians
are employed at each building.
(d) The ratio of students per certified school librarian.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

257
(e) What full-time equivalency of paraprofessional or other
staff are employed in the school library and the credentialing of
these staff, if any.
(f) How school libraries are scheduled.
(g) How many hours each week school librarians provide direct
library-related instruction to students.
(h) The technology available for students to access library
resources and lessons.
(i) The size and age of the collection in each school library,
and the extent of digital materials available for students to
access.
(j) Current funding per student for school library materials.
(k) Any other matters that the committee considers relevant to
the fulfillment of its mission to determine the status of school
library programs in this state.
(4) The department shall provide staff and other resources as
the committee described in subsection (2) considers appropriate,
including contracting with a researcher. Appropriate costs must be
determined by the department, and the committee described in
subsection (2) shall reimburse the department for costs related to
this subsection.
(5) The committee described in subsection (2) may conduct
public hearings to gather information, and may sponsor statewide or
regional conferences involving educators, students, or the public
at large.
(6) The committee described in subsection (2) shall provide a
report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on
school aid, the state budget director, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the department by not later than December 31, 2026.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

258
The report must create a long-term plan for this state's school
library programs that may include the adoption of guidelines for
school library facilities, budget, staffing, collection
development, and curriculum standards for school library programs.
The final report and recommendations must include drafts of
legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect.
(7) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
(1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 $21,000,000.00 to
districts in an equal amount per pupil to support school libraries.
(2) A recipient of funding under this section shall use the
funds only for the salaries and benefits of certified school
librarians, electronic or material resources for school libraries,
or furniture, equipment, or supplies for school libraries.
Sec. 35m. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 only an amount not to exceed $64,400,000.00 $100,000,000.00
for the purposes described in this section, including payments to
improve educational outcomes in literacy. The department shall
award funding allocated for 2026-2027 under this section in a
quantity and magnitude such that the allocation in this subsection
is distributed over 2 fiscal years.
(2) The department shall continue the committee for literacy
achievement that includes representatives of higher education and
early childhood literacy educators who have expertise in literacy
instruction and research. The committee shall exist until at least
September 2029. The department shall appoint the members of the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

259
committee for literacy achievement. The department shall develop a
process to identify and assemble experts for the committee. The
primary focus of the committee is to recommend tools and strategies
with the goal of increasing student academic outcomes in the area
of literacy. The committee is encouraged to collaborate with the
Michigan Education Research Institute or other entities with
similar expertise on the subject of literacy. The department shall
determine the size and benchmarks of the committee. The committee
shall do all of the following:
(a) Critically evaluate early literacy series and materials.
The committee shall evaluate with research-based outcomes, using
the committee's expertise in the field of literacy. The committee
shall assign grade tiers to the series based on the series'
likelihood to increase student literacy outcomes. Priority must be
given to series that already have a demonstrated history of
increasing student outcomes. The committee may perform an
evaluation under this subdivision based on submissions from a
vendor, but must independently verify the validity of information
provided by the vendor. The committee is also strongly encouraged
to evaluate available materials not submitted to the department by
a vendor.
(b) Critically evaluate literacy professional development. The
committee shall evaluate with research-based outcomes, using the
committee's expertise in the field of literacy. The committee shall
assign grade tiers to the professional development based on the
professional development's likelihood to increase student literacy
outcomes. Priority must be given to professional development that
already has a demonstrated history of increasing student outcomes.
The committee may perform an evaluation under this subdivision
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

260
based on submissions from a vendor, but must independently verify
the validity of information provided by the vendor. The committee
is also strongly encouraged to evaluate available materials not
submitted to the department by a vendor.
(c) Critically evaluate other applicable literacy tools or
services the committee determines to have a high likelihood or
demonstrated history of increasing student literacy outcomes. The
committee may perform an evaluation under this subdivision based on
submissions from a vendor, but must independently verify the
validity of information provided by the vendor. The committee is
also strongly encouraged to evaluate available materials not
submitted to the department by a vendor.
(d) Create, maintain, and post annually on a publicly
available website a rankings list of all early literacy series and
other items the committee has evaluated. This includes items from
each part of the rankings list, items evaluated in the 2024-2025
school year, and any subsequent items evaluated going forward. The
committee shall denote on the list whether major changes have been
made to an early literacy series or other item on the list since
the early literacy series or other item was evaluated by the
committee and if the early literacy series or other item has not
been evaluated since the last ranking. The rankings list created in
this subdivision must align with the list of evidence-based tier 1,
classwide elementary reading curricula and materials that are
aligned with science of reading methods that research has shown to
improve literacy outcomes and help pupils achieve reading
proficiency as required under section 1280f of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1280f.
(3) An individual on the committee shall recuse themselves
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

261
from evaluating early literacy series and other items that the
individual has helped create, that the individual would benefit
from financially, or for which the individual has any other
conflict of interest.
(4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), the department
shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts in an
amount determined by the department. The department shall not make
payments under this subsection until it has critically evaluated as
many early literacy series and other items from subsection (2) as
possible. Payments under this subsection must begin to be made
during the current fiscal year to support district implementation
in 2026-2027. 2027-2028. The department shall use the rankings list
described in subsection (2) as the basis for how funding is
allocated in subsection (1) to districts and intermediate
districts. Districts and intermediate districts using higher-ranked
literacy tools that are proven to increase student outcomes shall
receive more funding than districts and intermediate districts
utilizing lower-ranked literacy tools in both the base award and
the per-pupil awards described in this subsection. The department
may determine that some districts and intermediate districts will
not receive funding under this section based on the effectiveness
of the early literacy series or other items being utilized by the
district or intermediate district. The department shall award
funding under this section using the following methodology:
(a) A base award equal to the amount necessary for the
district or intermediate district to implement the chosen early
literacy series or other item. The department may place a cap on
the total award per district, intermediate district, or early
literacy series or other item and may choose not to award funding
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

262
if the early literacy series or other item is determined to be
ineffective or is determined to be less effective than other
choices.
(b) A tiered per-pupil award based on the number of pupils in
membership at the district and intermediate district. The tiered
per-pupil award must provide a higher per-pupil payment to
districts and intermediate districts using higher-ranked early
literacy series or other items as determined under subsection (2).
The department may choose not to award funding if the early
literacy series or other item is determined to be ineffective or is
determined to be less effective than other choices.
(5) From the funding allocated in subsection (1), the
department may pay an annual stipend of up to $8,000.00 for each
member of the committee for literacy achievement who is employed by
or at a public institution of higher education, a district, or an
intermediate district. A stipend must be commensurate with the
committee member's contribution to the committee. Funding must be
paid to the public institution of higher education, the district,
or the intermediate district where the committee member is
employed, and the public institution of higher education, the
district, or the intermediate district must then use funding
received to award the stipend directly to the individual committee
member. A committee member who is not employed by or at a public
institution of higher education, a district, or an intermediate
district is not eligible to receive a stipend under this
subsection.
(6) To be eligible for funding under this section, a district
or intermediate district must apply in a form and manner determined
by the department. As a condition of receiving the funding, the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

263
district or intermediate district must agree to provide to the
department information twice a year, on or before May 1 and October
1, on the early literacy series and other items used for the
previous and current school years, and the early literacy series
and other items to be used for the next school year. The early
literacy series and other items used by districts and intermediate
districts must be added to the annual rankings required under
subsection (2).
(7) Except as otherwise provided in this section and
notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments
under this section on a schedule determined by the department.
(8) Funds allocated under subsection (1) for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for
2025-2026 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2026-2027. 2027-2028.
The purpose of the work project is to improve literacy
instructional practices. The estimated completion date of the work
project is September 30, 2029.
(9) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from
the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there
is allocated an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 for 2025-2026
only to an intermediate district in which the combined total number
of pupils in membership of all of its constituent districts is the
fewest among all intermediate districts in this state. All of the
following apply to the funding under this subsection:
(a) Funding under this subsection must be used by the
intermediate district, in partnership with an association that
represents intermediate district administrators in this state, to
implement all of the following:
(i) Literacy essentials teacher and principal training modules.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

264
(ii) Face-to-face and online professional learning on literacy
essentials teacher and principal training modules for literacy
coaches, principals, and teachers.
(iii) The placement of regional lead literacy coaches to
facilitate professional learning for early literacy coaches.
Regional lead literacy coaches described in this subparagraph shall
provide support for new literacy coaches, building teachers, and
administrators, and shall facilitate regional data collection to
evaluate the effectiveness of statewide literacy coaches funded
under this section.
(iv) A provision of $500,000.00 under this subsection for
literacy training, modeling, coaching, and feedback for district
principals or chief administrators, as applicable. The training
described in this subparagraph must use the pre-K and K to 3
essential instructional practices in literacy created by the
general education leadership network as the framework for all
training provided under this subparagraph.
(b) By not later than September 1 of each year, the
intermediate district described in this subsection, in consultation
with grant recipients, shall submit a report to the chairs of the
senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the
chairs of the senate and house standing committees responsible for
education legislation, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and
the state budget director. The report described in this subdivision
must include student achievement results in English language arts
and survey results with feedback from parents and teachers
regarding the initiatives implemented under this subsection.
(c) Up to 2% of funds allocated under this subsection may be
used by the association representing intermediate district
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

265
administrators that is in partnership with the intermediate
district specified in this subsection to administer this
subsection.
(10) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from
the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there
is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,600,000.00 for 2025-2026 to
expand the implementation of the literacy and social, emotional,
and behavioral components of a multi-tiered system of supports,
including positive behavioral interventions and supports, using the
Michigan Multi-Tiered System of Supports Technical Assistance
Center. Both of the following apply to funds allocated under this
subsection:
(a) The department shall use funds allocated under this
subsection, through an intermediate district, for the purpose of
expanding the statewide expertise, technical assistance, and
implementation of the multi-tiered system of supports, dyslexia
expertise, and evidence-based instructional practices grounded in
the science of reading using the Michigan Multi-Tiered System of
Supports Technical Assistance Center, a nationally recognized
program. In addition, the department shall identify an intermediate
district to act as a fiscal agent for these funds.
(b) Up to 2% of funds allocated under this subsection may be
used by the intermediate district serving as the fiscal agent for
these funds to administer this subsection.
Sec. 35o. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $6,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 to an intermediate district in
which the combined total number of pupils in membership of all of
its constituent districts is the fewest among all intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

266
districts in this state to improve literacy instruction in
alignment with the science of reading and section 1280f of the
revised school code, MCL 380.1280f.
(2) Funding under this subsection must be used by the
intermediate district described in subsection (1), in partnership
with an association that represents intermediate district
administrators in this state, to do all of the following:
(a) Maintain, and update as necessary based on research, the
state's literacy essentials and disciplinary literacy essentials
for grades pre-K to 12, including teacher and principal training
modules and materials.
(b) Lead face-to-face and online professional learning on the
state's literacy essentials and disciplinary literacy essentials
for grades preK-12 for literacy coaches, principals, and teachers.
(c) Lead face-to-face and online professional learning for
school and district administrators and leadership teams about
leading systems that support effective literacy instruction in all
classrooms.
(d) Facilitate a statewide network of literacy coaches that
ensures consistent use of evidence-based literacy practices
including monthly communities of practice, regular coaching
intensives, and an annual institute. In addition to completing
training from the approved provider of professional learning
described in section 35a(5), all literacy coaches funded under
section 35a(2) must do all of the following, as applicable:
(i) Participate in the statewide coaching network described in
this subdivision.
(ii) Participate in at least 1 coaching intensive.
(iii) Attend the annual institute.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

267
(iv) Complete the literacy essentials and coaching modules.
(v) For literacy coaches who are new to the network, attend a
new coach kickoff.
(e) Place regional lead literacy coaches to facilitate
professional learning for literacy coaches. Regional lead literacy
coaches described in this subdivision shall provide support for
literacy coaches, teachers, and administrators, and shall
facilitate regional data collection to evaluate the effectiveness
of statewide literacy coaches funded under this section.
(f) Meet monthly with the department and the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential to align efforts and
achieve statewide goals to train every educator in the science of
reading.
(3) By not later than September 1 of each year, the
intermediate district described in subsection (1), in consultation
with grant recipients, shall submit a report to the chairs of the
senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the
chairs of the senate and house standing committees responsible for
education legislation, the house and senate fiscal agencies, the
state budget director, and the directors of the departments of
education and lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The
report described in this subdivision must include coaching cycle
data by intermediate district, statewide student achievement
results in English language arts, and survey results with feedback
from teachers and administrators regarding the initiatives
implemented under this section.
(4) Up to 2% of funds allocated under this section may be used
by the association representing intermediate district
administrators that is in partnership with the intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

268
district as described in subsection (1) to administer this section.
Sec. 35p. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only
an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 to implement high-impact
tutoring programs through eligible tutoring partners in eligible
districts.
(2) Eligible tutoring partners shall apply for funding in a
form and manner determined by the department. An application for
funding described in this subsection must include at least all of
the following:
(a) An identification of a district or intermediate district
that will serve as a fiscal agent for awarded funds.
(b) A list of district partners that will be recipients of
high-impact tutoring from the eligible tutoring partner, including
a letter of support from each district that affirms their
commitment to ensure alignment with tier 1 instruction,
implementation fidelity, including, but not limited to, student
usage and frequency, and participation in data sharing and training
necessary to maximize outcomes.
(c) Projections for the number of students who will be served,
broken down by partner district.
(d) A description of the efficacious nature of the eligible
tutoring partner's program, including the ability of the eligible
tutoring partner to hit certain benchmarks and goals, based on
evidence.
(e) A plan for how the eligible tutoring partner will target
high-impact tutoring for the highest need student populations based
on some or all of the following criteria:
(i) Statewide assessment data.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

269
(ii) Screeners or formative assessment scores.
(iii) Economically disadvantaged status.
(iv) Special education status.
(v) English language learner status.
(f) A planned budget for the high-impact tutoring program
provided, including the total dollars necessary to serve the
identified student population and an estimate of the percentage of
awarded dollars that would be directly deployed for high-impact
tutoring.
(g) A commitment to provide periodic reporting to each
district served and to the department, in a form and manner
determined by the department, to ensure funds are being spent in
accordance with this section.
(h) A commitment to return any or all funds awarded if the
department determines dollars are used in a way that violates this
section.
(i) Any additional information required by the department to
make informed decisions on awarding competitive grants under this
section and to ensure financial stewardship awarded dollars.
(3) The department shall award grants to applicants on a
competitive basis, using at least all of the following in making
award determinations:
(a) The cost effectiveness of the application based on the
number of students projected to be served, the total requested
budget, and the demonstrated outcome capacity of the high-impact
tutoring program.
(b) The reasonability that the eligible tutoring partner will
be able to meet the stated outcome benchmarks.
(c) Other criteria, as determined by the department, to ensure
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

270
grants are awarded to the most impactful applicants.
(4) If the amount allocated in subsection (1) is not
sufficient to fully fund all eligible tutoring partners that apply
for funding, the department must prioritize grant awards to
districts with the lowest levels of literacy proficiency, as
determined by student scores on the Michigan student test of
educational progress (M-STEP).
(5) The department may approve applications from eligible
tutoring partners that offer innovative ways to reach students at a
lower cost by waiving elements of high-impact tutoring described in
subsection (11). This must include, but is not limited to, offering
virtual programs. In such cases, the eligible tutoring partner
submitting the application must provide evidence of program impact
and implement an outcomes-based contract model.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that the work
associated with the grant application, oversight, and
administration of awards under this section be performed primarily
by the eligible tutoring partner and not by districts that have
agreed to receive high-impact tutoring.
(7) If a district or intermediate district agrees to receive
high-impact tutoring from an eligible tutoring partner, the
district or intermediate district must do all of the following:
(a) Work with the eligible tutoring partner to identify
students that would benefit from the program. The district or
intermediate district must communicate with parents or legal
guardians of identified students to describe the available program,
outline possible student outcomes, and encourage student
participation.
(b) To the extent possible, integrate the high-impact tutoring
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

271
program with the district's Michigan Integrated Continuous
Improvement Process (MICIP) plan.
(c) If the district or intermediate district is the fiscal
agent for the eligible tutoring partner, except as otherwise
provided in this subdivision, forward the amount awarded to the
tutoring partner. The designated fiscal agent may retain up to 0.5%
of the funding awarded to the tutoring partner for administrative
purposes.
(8) All of the following apply to the funds allocated under
this section:
(a) The department shall make award determinations and
notifications by not later than January 15, 2027.
(b) The department shall make initial payments to identified
fiscal agents by no later than March 1, 2027. Identified fiscal
agents shall forward funding to eligible tutoring partners by not
later than March 15, 2027.
(c) Eligible tutoring partners shall begin deploying services
in recipient districts and intermediate districts before the end of
the 2026-2027 school year.
(9) The funds allocated under this section for 2026-2027 are a
work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027
are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project
is to provide high-impact tutoring through eligible tutoring
partners. The estimated completion date of the work project is
September 30, 2031.
(10) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated
$600,000.00 to the Clinton County Regional Educational Service
Agency to work with the Michigan Association of Intermediate School
Administrators (MAISA), to do all of the following:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

272
(a) Provide a report on high-impact tutoring programs
implemented with the funding allocated under subsection (1).
(b) Develop and provide technical assistance to districts in
selecting high-impact tutoring strategies and integrating these
strategies into district Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement
Process (MICIP) plans. Developing and providing technical
assistance may include the design, review, and integration of
eligible tutoring programs within the MiStrategyBank.
(c) Collect, aggregate, and report data in collaboration with
the MAISA Michigan Collaborative Hub. An amount not to exceed
$300,000.00 of the funds allocated under this subsection may be
used for this purpose.
(d) Provide an annual report of the impact of high-impact
tutoring programs to the office of the governor, the senate and
house education committees, the senate and house appropriations
subcommittees on school aid, and the state budget director.
(11) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible tutoring partner" means a tutoring provider,
including, but not limited to, a tutoring provider created by for-
profit vendors, nonprofit vendors, intermediate districts,
districts, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, that
provides high-impact tutoring and meets at least 1 of the
following:
(i) Is included on the ProvenTutoring list maintained by the
Center for Research and Reform in Education at Johns Hopkins
University.
(ii) Has a Tutoring Program Design Badge as awarded by the
National Student Support Accelerator, a program of the SCALE
Initiative at Stanford University.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

273
(iii) Is a vetted high-impact tutoring program included in the
MiStrategyBank. If necessary, the Michigan Association of
Intermediate School Administrators may convene a committee to
review tutoring programs for inclusion in the MiStrategyBank.
(b) "High-impact tutoring" means, except as otherwise provided
in this section, in-person tutoring that meets all of the
following:
(i) Occurs during the school day.
(ii) Is individualized, with tutor ratios not higher than 1:4.
(iii) Provides intensive support with a minimum of 2 sessions
per week.
(iv) Uses a structured, evidence-based curriculum designed for
tutoring, with formative assessments to track progress.
(v) Uses trained tutors.
Sec. 35q. (1) By not later than March 1, 2027, the department,
in collaboration with the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, and the center, shall publish to a
publicly accessible location on its website and shall update
periodically thereafter, as new data becomes available, a literacy
achievement and opportunity transparency dashboard that includes at
least the following:
(a) The percentage of children in this state with access to
free, full-day prekindergarten opportunities.
(b) The percentage of pre-K to grade 5 educators in this state
who are trained in the science of reading.
(c) The percentage of pre-K to grade 5 classrooms in this
state using curriculum and assessments aligned with the science of
reading.
(d) The percentage of parents and legal guardians in this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

274
state receiving clear communication from their school about their
child's reading action plans and the ability to get extra support
as needed.
(e) Literacy-related results, including multiyear trend data,
from the following state assessments:
(i) The grade 3 Michigan student test of educational progress
(M-STEP).
(ii) The grade 7 Michigan student test of educational progress
(M-STEP).
(iii) The SAT.
(iv) The National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP).
(f) Additional metrics that help the public and policymakers
track statewide literacy progress.
(g) A summary of activities the state is taking to improve
literacy outcomes.
(2) The data published under subsection (1) must be
disaggregated by district and school demographics where possible.
Sec. 39. (1) An eligible applicant receiving funds under
section 32d shall submit an application, in a form and manner
prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential, by a date specified by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential in the immediately preceding
fiscal year. An eligible applicant is not required to amend the
applicant's current accounting cycle or adopt this state's fiscal
year accounting cycle in accounting for financial transactions
under this section. The application must include all of the
following:
(a) The estimated total number of age-eligible children in the
community, as provided to the applicant by the department of
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

275
lifelong education, advancement, and potential utilizing the most
recent population data available from the American Community Survey
conducted by the United States Census Bureau. The department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall ensure that it
provides updated American Community Survey population data at least
once every 3 years.
(b) The estimated number of age-eligible children in the
community who are being served exclusively by Head Start programs
operating in the community.
(c) The number of children whom the applicant will have the
capacity to serve in each eligible great start readiness program
option who meet the age-eligible criteria of section 32d.
(2) The great start readiness target foundation amount for
2025-2026 2026-2027 is $10,650.00.$11,290.00.
(3) After notification of funding allocations, an applicant
receiving funds under section 32d shall also submit an
implementation plan for approval, in a form and manner prescribed
by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, by a date specified by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential, that details how the
applicant complies with the program components established by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential under
section 32d.
(4) Subject to subsection (5), the initial allocation to each
eligible applicant under section 32d is equal to the sum of the
following:
(a) The number of children in the current school year served
in a program determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential to be a school-day program multiplied by
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

276
the great start readiness target foundation.
(b) The number of children in the current school year served
in a program determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential to be a part-day program or a school-day
blended with Head Start multiplied by the great start readiness
target foundation divided by 2.
(c) The total number of children in the current school year
served in a program determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential to be an extended program
multiplied by the great start readiness target foundation
multiplied by 1.2.
(d) The number of children in the current school year served
in a program determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential to be an extended program blended with
Head Start or a part-day extended program multiplied by the great
start readiness target foundation multiplied by 0.6.
(5) Subject to subsection (6), if the calculations under
subsection (4) result in a total allocation exceeding the amount
available as allocated or appropriated under section 32d(2),
initial allocations to each eligible applicant under section 32d
are calculated as the sum of the following:
(a) An amount equal to the calculations described in
subsection (4) but using for those calculations the lesser of the
number of children served in the immediately preceding fiscal year
or the number of children the applicant has the capacity to serve
in the current fiscal year instead of the number of children served
in the current fiscal year.
(b) An amount equal to the remaining available dollars after
calculations in subdivision (a) distributed proportionately to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

277
eligible applicants where calculations under subdivision (a) are
less than the amount originally calculated under subsection (4).
(6) If the calculations under subsection (5) result in a total
allocation exceeding the amount available as allocated or
appropriated under section 32d(2), the initial allocation to each
eligible applicant is the amount calculated under subsection (4)
prorated on an equal percentage basis.
(7) If, taking into account the total amount to be allocated
to the applicant as calculated under this section, an applicant
determines that it is able to include additional eligible children
in the great start readiness program without additional funds under
section 32d, the applicant may include additional eligible children
but does not receive additional funding under section 32d for those
children.
(8) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall review the program components under section 32d and
under this section at least biennially. The department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential also shall convene a
committee of internal and external stakeholders at least once every
5 years to ensure that the funding structure under this section
reflects current system needs under section 32d.
Sec. 39a. (1) From the federal funds appropriated in section
11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to districts,
intermediate districts, and other eligible entities all available
federal funding, estimated at $824,700,000.00, for the federal
programs under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law
107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95.
These funds are allocated as follows:
(a) An amount estimated at $1,200,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

278
2027 to provide students with drug- and violence-prevention
programs and to implement strategies to improve school safety,
funded from DED-OESE, drug-free schools and communities funds.
(b) An amount estimated at $100,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 for
the purpose of preparing, training, and recruiting high-quality
teachers and class size reduction, funded from DED-OESE, improving
teacher quality funds.
(c) An amount estimated at $13,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for programs to teach English to limited English proficient
(LEP) children, funded from DED-OESE, language acquisition state
grant funds.
(d) An amount estimated at $2,800,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for rural and low-income schools, funded from DED-OESE, rural
and low income school funds.
(e) An amount estimated at $585,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 to provide supplemental programs to enable educationally
disadvantaged children to meet challenging academic standards,
funded from DED-OESE, title I, disadvantaged children funds.
(f) An amount estimated at $9,200,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for the purpose of identifying and serving migrant children,
funded from DED-OESE, title I, migrant education funds.
(g) An amount estimated at $40,400,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for the purpose of providing high-quality extended learning
opportunities, after school and during the summer, for children in
low-performing schools, funded from DED-OESE, twenty-first century
community learning center funds.
(h) An amount estimated at $14,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 to help support local school improvement efforts, funded from
DED-OESE, title I, local school improvement grants.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

279
(i) An amount estimated at $55,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 to improve the academic achievement of students, funded from
DED-OESE, title IV, student support and academic enrichment grants.
(j) An amount estimated at $3,100,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for literacy programs that advance literacy skills for
students from birth through grade 12, including, but not limited
to, English-proficient students and students with disabilities,
funded from DED-OESE, striving readers comprehensive literacy
program.
(k) An amount estimated at $1,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for grants to support and demonstrate innovative partnerships
to train school-based mental health service providers, funded from
DED-OESE, mental health service professional demonstration grant
program.
(2) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there
is allocated to districts, intermediate districts, and other
eligible entities all available federal funding, estimated at
$66,415,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the following programs
that are funded by federal grants:
(a) An amount estimated at $3,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 to provide services to homeless children and youth, funded
from DED-OVAE, homeless children and youth funds.
(b) An amount estimated at $30,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for providing career and technical education services to
pupils, funded from DED-OVAE, basic grants to states.
(c) An amount estimated at $14,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for the Michigan charter school subgrant program, funded from
DED–OII, public charter schools program funds.
(d) An amount estimated at $17,700,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

280
2027 for the purpose of promoting and expanding high-quality
preschool services, funded from HHS–OCC, preschool development
funds.
(e) An amount estimated at $1,715,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for the purpose of addressing priority substance abuse
treatment, prevention, and mental health needs, funded from HHS-
SAMHSA.
(3) The department, or, for subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, shall
distribute all federal funds allocated under this section in
accordance with federal law and with flexibility provisions
outlined in Public Law 107-116, and in the education flexibility
partnership act of 1999, Public Law 106-25. Notwithstanding section
17b, the department or the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, as applicable, shall make payments of
federal funds to districts, intermediate districts, and other
eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by
the department.
(4) For the purposes of applying for federal grants
appropriated under this article, the department, or, for
subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential, shall allow an intermediate
district to submit a consortium application on behalf of 2 or more
districts with the agreement of those districts as appropriate
according to federal rules and guidelines.
(5) For the purposes of funding federal title I grants under
this article, in addition to any other federal grants for which the
strict discipline academy is eligible, the department, or, for
subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the department of lifelong
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

281
education, advancement, and potential, shall allocate to a strict
discipline academy out of title I, part A an amount equal to what
the strict discipline academy would have received if included and
calculated under title I, part D, or what it would receive under
the formula allocation under title I, part A, whichever is greater.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "DED" means the United States Department of Education.
(b) "DED-OESE" means the DED Office of Elementary and
Secondary Education.
(c) "DED-OII" means the DED Office of Innovation and
Improvement.
(d) "DED-OVAE" means the DED Office of Vocational and Adult
Education.
(e) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and
Human Services.
(f) "HHS-OCC" means the HHS Office of Child Care.
(g) "HHS-SAMHSA" means the HHS Substance Abuse and Mental
Health Services Project.
Sec. 51a. (1) From the state school aid fund money in section
11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $2,028,696,100.00
for 2024-2025 and there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$2,219,596,100.00 $2,126,096,100.00 for 2025-2026 from and there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $2,280,137,500.00 for 2026-2027.
From state sources and all available federal funding under sections
1411 to 1419 of part B of the individuals with disabilities
education act, 20 USC 1411 to 1419, there is allocated an amount
estimated at $450,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 and $500,000,000.00 for
2025-2026 and $500,000,000.00 for 2026-2027, plus any carryover
federal funds from previous year appropriations. The allocations
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

282
under this subsection are for the purpose of reimbursing districts
and intermediate districts for special education programs,
services, and special education personnel as prescribed in article
3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761; net tuition
payments made by intermediate districts to the Michigan Schools for
the Deaf and Blind; and special education programs and services for
pupils who are eligible for special education programs and services
according to statute or rule. For meeting the costs of special
education programs and services not reimbursed under this article,
a district or intermediate district may use money in general funds
or special education funds, not otherwise restricted, or
contributions from districts to intermediate districts, tuition
payments, gifts and contributions from individuals or other
entities, or federal funds that may be available for this purpose,
as determined by the intermediate district plan prepared under
article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761.
Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments of
federal funds to districts, intermediate districts, and other
eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by
the department.
(2) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is
allocated the amount necessary, estimated at $441,400,000.00 for
2024-2025 and $492,400,000.00 $457,800,000.00 for 2025-2026 and
$495,100,000.00 for 2026-2027, for payments toward reimbursing
districts and intermediate districts for 28.6138% of total approved
costs of special education, excluding costs reimbursed under
section 53a, and 70.4165% of total approved costs of special
education transportation.
(3) If the department determines that the amount allocated for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

283
a fiscal year to a district or intermediate district under
subsection (2) is insufficient to fulfill the specified percentages
in subsection (2), the department shall pay the shortfall to the
district or intermediate district during the fiscal year beginning
on the October 1 following the determination. If the department
determines that the amount allocated for a fiscal year to a
district or intermediate district under subsection (2) exceeds the
sum of the amount necessary to fulfill the specified percentages in
subsection (2), the department shall deduct the amount of the
excess from the district's or intermediate district's payments
under this article for the fiscal year beginning on the October 1
following the determination.
(4) State funds are allocated on a total approved cost basis.
Federal funds are allocated under applicable federal requirements.
(5) From the amount allocated in subsection (1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $3,200,000.00 for 2024-2025 and
2025-2026 and 2026-2027 to reimburse 100% of the net increase in
necessary costs incurred by a district or intermediate district in
implementing the revisions in the administrative rules for special
education that became effective on July 1, 1987. As used in this
subsection, "net increase in necessary costs" means the necessary
additional costs incurred solely because of new or revised
requirements in the administrative rules minus cost savings
permitted in implementing the revised rules. The department shall
determine net increase in necessary costs in a manner specified by
the department.
(6) For purposes of this section and sections 51b to 58, all
of the following apply:
(a) "Total approved costs of special education" are determined
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

284
in a manner specified by the department and may include indirect
costs, but must not exceed 115% of approved direct costs for
section 52 and section 53a programs. The total approved costs
include salary and other compensation for all approved special
education personnel for the program, including payments for Social
Security and Medicare and public school employee retirement system
contributions. The total approved costs do not include salaries or
other compensation paid to administrative personnel who are not
special education personnel as that term is defined in section 6 of
the revised school code, MCL 380.6. Costs reimbursed by federal
funds, other than those federal funds included in the allocation
made under this article, are not included. Special education
approved personnel not utilized full time in the evaluation of
students or in the delivery of special education programs,
ancillary, and other related services are reimbursed under this
section only for that portion of time actually spent providing
these programs and services, with the exception of special
education programs and services provided to youth placed in child
caring institutions or juvenile detention programs approved by the
department to provide an on-grounds education program.
(b) Reimbursement for ancillary and other related services, as
that term is defined by R 340.1701c of the Michigan Administrative
Code, is not provided when those services are covered by and
available through private group health insurance carriers or
federal reimbursed program sources unless the department and
district or intermediate district agree otherwise and that
agreement is approved by the state budget director. Expenses, other
than the incidental expense of filing, must not be borne by the
parent. In addition, the filing of claims must not delay the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

285
education of a pupil. A district or intermediate district is
responsible for payment of a deductible amount and for an advance
payment required until the time a claim is paid.
(c) If an intermediate district purchases a special education
pupil transportation service from a constituent district that was
previously purchased from a private entity; if the purchase from
the constituent district is at a lower cost, adjusted for changes
in fuel costs; and if the cost shift from the intermediate district
to the constituent does not result in any net change in the revenue
the constituent district receives from payments under sections 22b
and 51c, then upon application by the intermediate district, the
department shall direct the intermediate district to continue to
report the cost associated with the specific identified special
education pupil transportation service and shall adjust the costs
reported by the constituent district to remove the cost associated
with that specific service.
(7) A pupil who is enrolled in a full-time special education
program conducted or administered by an intermediate district or a
pupil who is enrolled in the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and
Blind is not included in the membership count of a district, but is
counted in membership in the intermediate district of residence.
(8) Special education personnel transferred from 1 district to
another to implement the revised school code are entitled to the
rights, benefits, and tenure to which the individual would
otherwise be entitled had that individual been employed by the
receiving district originally.
(9) If a district or intermediate district uses money received
under this section for a purpose other than the purpose or purposes
for which the money is allocated, the department may require the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

286
district or intermediate district to refund the amount of money
received. The department shall deposit money that is refunded in
the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund.
(10) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is
allocated the amount necessary, estimated at $1,600,000.00 for
2024-2025 and estimated at $1,600,000.00 $1,900,000.00 for 2025-
2026 and estimated at $1,900,000.00 for 2026-2027, to pay the
foundation allowances for pupils described in this subsection. The
department shall calculate the allocation to a district under this
subsection by multiplying the number of pupils described in this
subsection who are counted in membership in the district times the
sum of the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupil's
district of residence, plus the amount of the district's per-pupil
allocation under section 20m, not to exceed the target foundation
allowance for the current fiscal year, or, for a pupil described in
this subsection who is counted in membership in a district that is
a public school academy, times an amount equal to the amount per
membership pupil under section 20(6). The department shall
calculate the allocation to an intermediate district under this
subsection in the same manner as for a district, using the
foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupil's district of
residence not to exceed the target foundation allowance for the
current fiscal year and that district's per-pupil allocation under
section 20m. This subsection applies to all of the following
pupils:
(a) Pupils described in section 53a.
(b) Pupils counted in membership in an intermediate district
who are not special education pupils and are served by the
intermediate district in a juvenile detention or child caring
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

287
facility.
(c) Pupils with an emotional impairment counted in membership
by an intermediate district and provided educational services by
the department of health and human services.
(11) If it is determined that funds allocated under subsection
(2) or (10) or under section 51c will not be expended, funds up to
the amount necessary and available may be used to supplement the
allocations under subsection (2) or (10) or under section 51c to
fully fund those allocations. After payments under subsections (2)
and (10) and section 51c, the department shall expend the remaining
funds from the allocation in subsection (1) in the following order:
(a) One hundred percent of the reimbursement required under
section 53a.
(b) One hundred percent of the reimbursement required under
subsection (5).
(c) One hundred percent of the payment required under section
54.
(d) One hundred percent of the payments under section 56.
(12) The allocations under subsections (2) and (10) are
allocations to intermediate districts only and are not allocations
to districts, but instead are calculations used only to determine
the state payments under section 22b.
(13) If a public school academy that is not a cyber school, as
that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL
380.551, enrolls under this section a pupil who resides outside of
the intermediate district in which the public school academy is
located and who is eligible for special education programs and
services according to statute or rule, or who is a child with a
disability, as that term is defined under the individuals with
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

288
disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446, the intermediate
district in which the public school academy is located and the
public school academy shall enter into a written agreement with the
intermediate district in which the pupil resides for the purpose of
providing the pupil with a free appropriate public education, and
the written agreement must include at least an agreement on the
responsibility for the payment of the added costs of special
education programs and services for the pupil. If the public school
academy that enrolls the pupil does not enter into an agreement
under this subsection, the public school academy shall not charge
the pupil's resident intermediate district or the intermediate
district in which the public school academy is located the added
costs of special education programs and services for the pupil, and
the public school academy is not eligible for any payouts based on
the funding formula outlined in the resident or nonresident
intermediate district's plan. If a pupil is not enrolled in a
public school academy under this subsection, the provision of
special education programs and services and the payment of the
added costs of special education programs and services for a pupil
described in this subsection are the responsibility of the district
and intermediate district in which the pupil resides.
(14) For the purpose of receiving its federal allocation under
part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, Public
Law 108-446, a public school academy that is a cyber school, as
that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL
380.551, and is in compliance with section 553a of the revised
school code, MCL 380.553a, directly receives the federal allocation
under part B of the individuals with disabilities education act,
Public Law 108-446, from the intermediate district in which the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

289
cyber school is located, as the subrecipient. If the intermediate
district does not distribute the funds described in this subsection
to the cyber school by the part B application due date of July 1,
the department may distribute the funds described in this
subsection directly to the cyber school according to the formula
prescribed in 34 CFR 300.705 and 34 CFR 300.816. Beginning July 1,
2021, this subsection is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of
the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply
retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021.
(15) For a public school academy that is a cyber school, as
that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL
380.551, and is in compliance with section 553a of the revised
school code, MCL 380.553a, that enrolls a pupil under this section,
the intermediate district in which the cyber school is located
shall ensure that the cyber school complies with sections 1701a,
1703, 1704, 1751, 1752, 1756, and 1757 of the revised school code,
MCL 380.1701a, 380.1703, 380.1704, 380.1751, 380.1752, 380.1756,
and 380.1757; applicable rules; and the individuals with
disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446. Beginning July 1,
2021, this subsection is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of
the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply
retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021.
(16) For the purposes of this section, the department or the
center shall only require a district or intermediate district to
report information that is not already available from the financial
information database maintained by the center.
Sec. 51c. As required by the court in the consolidated cases
known as Durant v State of Michigan, 456 Mich 175 (1997), from the
allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated for 2024-2025
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

290
and for 2025-2026 and for 2026-2027 the amount necessary, estimated
at $993,100,000.00 for 2024-2025 and $1,107,900,000.00
$1,055,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 and $1,140,700,000.00 for 2026-
2027, for payments to reimburse districts for 28.6138% of total
approved costs of special education excluding costs reimbursed
under section 53a, and 70.4165% of total approved costs of special
education transportation. Funds allocated under this section that
are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were allocated,
as determined by the department, may be used to supplement the
allocations under sections 22a and 22b to fully fund those
allocations for the same fiscal year.
Sec. 51d. (1) From the federal funds appropriated in section
11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 all available
federal funding, estimated at $83,000,000.00, for special education
programs and services that are funded by federal grants. The
department shall distribute all federal funds allocated under this
section in accordance with federal law. Notwithstanding section
17b, the department shall make payments of federal funds to
districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities
under this section on a schedule determined by the department.
(2) From the federal funds allocated under subsection (1), the
following amounts are allocated:
(a) For 2025-2026, 2026-2027, an amount estimated at
$14,000,000.00 for handicapped infants and toddlers, funded from
DED-OSERS, handicapped infants and toddlers funds.
(b) For 2025-2026, 2026-2027, an amount estimated at
$14,000,000.00 for preschool grants under Public Law 94-142, funded
from DED-OSERS, handicapped preschool incentive funds.
(c) For 2025-2026, 2026-2027, an amount estimated at
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

291
$55,000,000.00 for special education programs funded by DED-OSERS,
handicapped program, individuals with disabilities act funds.
(3) As used in this section, "DED-OSERS" means the United
States Department of Education Office of Special Education and
Rehabilitative Services.
Sec. 51e. (1) From the allocation under section 51a(1), there
is allocated for the amount necessary, estimated at $503,000,000.00
for 2024-2025 and $528,100,000.00 $521,800,000.00 for 2025-2026 and
$535,000,000.00 for 2026-2027, for payments to districts and
intermediate districts for 100% of foundation allowance costs
associated with special education pupils.
(2) The department shall calculate the amount allocated to a
district under this section by multiplying the district's special
education pupil membership, excluding pupils described in section
51a(11), times 100% of the foundation allowance under section 20 of
the pupil's district of residence, plus 100% of the amount of the
district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m, not to exceed
100% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal
year, or, for a special education pupil in membership in a district
that is a public school academy, times an amount equal to 100% of
the amount per membership pupil calculated under section 20(6). For
an intermediate district, the amount allocated under this
subsection is an amount per special education membership pupil,
excluding pupils described in section 51a(11), and is calculated in
the same manner as for a district, using 100% of the foundation
allowance under section 20 of the pupil's district of residence,
not to exceed 100% of the target foundation allowance for the
current fiscal year, and 100% of that district's per-pupil
allocation under section 20m.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

292
Sec. 51g. From the general fund money appropriated in section
11, $3,000,000.00 is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to an
association for administrators of special education services to
develop content for use by special education students, teachers,
and others. Any content that is developed as described in this
section must be accessible throughout this state. Funds received by
an association under this section may be used to support the
development of assessment tools to measure the needs of students
with special education needs in remote learning environments and
the effectiveness of various educational methods and tools, in
collaboration with the department. Funds under this section may
also be utilized to identify any available federal funds for
research related to special education in remote learning.
Sec. 51i. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that,
beginning in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2028, a weighted
special education funding formula be implemented to recognize the
higher costs associated with certain student needs.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that a weighted
special education funding formula described in subsection (1) be
implemented in a way to work toward the following target weights
for payments to districts and intermediate districts for identified
special education students:
(a) Speech and language impairment, 1.1.
(b) Specific learning disability, 1.1.
(c) Other health impairment multiplied, 1.8.
(d) Physical impairment multiplied, 3.1.
(e) Severe multiple impairments, 3.1.
(f) Cognitive impairment, 3.1.
(g) Deaf or hard of hearing multiplied, 3.1.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

293
(h) Deaf-blindness, 3.1.
(i) Emotional impairment multiplied, 3.8.
(j) Visual impairment, 3.8.
(k) Early childhood developmental delays, 3.8.
(l) Autism spectrum disorder, 3.8.
(m) Traumatic brain injury, 3.8.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that payments to
districts and intermediate districts under the formula described in
this section be adjusted to take into account available federal
revenue and local revenue generating capacity of recipient
districts and intermediate districts.
Sec. 53a. (1) For districts, reimbursement for pupils
described in subsection (2) is 100% of the total approved costs of
operating special education programs and services approved by the
department and included in the intermediate district plan adopted
under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to
380.1761, minus the district's foundation allowance calculated
under section 20 and minus the district's per-pupil allocation
under section 20m. For intermediate districts, the department shall
calculate reimbursement for pupils described in subsection (2) in
the same manner as for a district, using the foundation allowance
under section 20 of the pupil's district of residence, not to
exceed the target foundation allowance under section 20 for the
current fiscal year plus the amount of the district's per-pupil
allocation under section 20m.
(2) Reimbursement under subsection (1) is for the following
special education pupils:
(a) Pupils assigned to a district or intermediate district
through the community placement program of the courts or a state
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

294
agency, if the pupil was a resident of another intermediate
district at the time the pupil came under the jurisdiction of the
court or a state agency.
(b) Pupils who are residents of institutions operated by the
department of health and human services.
(c) Pupils who are former residents of department of community
health institutions for the developmentally disabled who are placed
in community settings other than the pupil's home.
(d) Pupils enrolled in a department-approved on-grounds
educational program longer than 180 days, but not longer than 233
days, at a residential child care institution, if the child care
institution offered in 1991-92 an on-grounds educational program
longer than 180 days but not longer than 233 days.
(e) Pupils placed in a district by a parent for the purpose of
seeking a suitable home, if the parent does not reside in the same
intermediate district as the district in which the pupil is placed.
(3) Only those costs that are clearly and directly
attributable to educational programs for pupils described in
subsection (2), and that would not have been incurred if the pupils
were not being educated in a district or intermediate district, are
reimbursable under this section.
(4) The costs of transportation are funded under this section
and are not reimbursed under section 58.
(5) The department shall not allocate more than $10,500,000.00
of the allocation for 2025-2026 2026-2027 in section 51a(1) under
this section.
Sec. 54. Each intermediate district receives an amount per
pupil for each pupil in attendance at the Michigan Schools for the
Deaf and Blind. The amount is proportionate to the total
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

295
instructional cost at each school. The department shall not
allocate more than $1,688,000.00 $4,529,400.00 of the allocation
for 2025-2026 2026-2027 in section 51a(1) under this section.
Sec. 54b. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$1,600,000.00 for 2026-2027 to expand the implementation of the
literacy and social, emotional, and behavioral components of a
multi-tiered system of supports, including positive behavioral
interventions and supports, using the Michigan Multi-Tiered System
of Supports Technical Assistance Center. All of the following apply
to funds allocated under this section:
(a) The department shall use funds allocated under this
section, through an intermediate district, for the purpose of
expanding the statewide expertise, technical assistance, and
implementation of the multi-tiered system of supports, dyslexia
expertise, and evidence-based instructional practices grounded in
the science of reading using the Michigan Multi-Tiered System of
Supports Technical Assistance Center. The department shall identify
an intermediate district to act as a fiscal agent for funds
allocated under this section.
(b) The department shall provide a report each year to the
state budget director, the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid, and the house and senate fiscal
agencies that details the following:
(i) The progress being made by districts in implementing multi-
tiered systems of supports.
(ii) The progress being made by districts in providing reading
intervention services described in section 1280f of the revised
school code, MCL 380.1280f, for pupils in grades K to 12.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

296
(iii) Other information the department determines would be
useful to understand the status of districts' implementation of
effective multi-tiered systems of supports and reading intervention
programs.
(c) Up to 2% of funds allocated under this section may be used
by the intermediate district serving as the fiscal agent for these
funds to administer this section.
Sec. 54d. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $23,670,700.00 $25,120,700.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to
intermediate districts for the purpose of providing state early on
services programs for children from birth to 3 years of age with a
developmental delay or a disability, or both, and their families,
as described in the early on Michigan state plan, as approved by
the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(2) To be eligible to receive grant funding under this
section, each intermediate district must apply in a form and manner
determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential.
(3) The grant funding allocated under this section must be
used to increase early on services and resources available to
children that demonstrate developmental delays to help prepare them
for success as they enter school. State early on services include
evaluating and providing early intervention services for eligible
infants and toddlers and their families to address developmental
delays, including those affecting physical, cognitive,
communication, adaptive, social, or emotional development. Grant
funds must not be used to supplant existing services that are
currently being provided.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

297
(4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall distribute the funds allocated under subsection (1)
to intermediate districts according to the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential's early on funding formula
utilized to distribute the federal award to Michigan under part C
of the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-
446. Funds received under this section must not supplant existing
funds or resources allocated for early on early intervention
services. An intermediate district receiving funds under this
section shall maximize the capture of Medicaid funds to support
early on early intervention services to the extent possible.
(5) Each intermediate district that receives funds under this
section shall report data and other information to the department
of lifelong education, advancement, and potential in a form,
manner, and frequency prescribed by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential to allow for monitoring and
evaluation of the program and to ensure that the children described
in subsection (1) received appropriate levels and types of services
delivered by qualified personnel, based on the individual needs of
the children and their families.
(6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under
this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential.
(7) Grant funds awarded and allocated to an intermediate
district under this section must be expended by the grant recipient
before June 30 of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal
year in which the funds were received.
Sec. 56. (1) For the purposes of this section:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

298
(a) "Membership" means for a particular fiscal year the total
membership of the intermediate district and the districts
constituent to the intermediate district, except that if a district
has elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code,
MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, membership of the district is not
included in the membership of the intermediate district.
(a) "Capped local special education property tax revenue"
means the amount of revenue that would be received if an
intermediate district levied the maximum millage rate permitted for
that intermediate district under section 1724a of the revised
school code, MCL 380.1724a, capped at the statewide average special
education millage rate.
(b) "Membership" means for a particular fiscal year the total
membership of the intermediate district and the districts
constituent to the intermediate district, except that if a district
has elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code,
MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, membership of the district is not
included in the membership of the intermediate district.
(c) (b) "Millage levied" means the millage levied in the
immediately preceding fiscal year for special education under part
30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741. ,
including a levy for debt service obligations.
(d) "Special education head count" means, for a particular
fiscal year, the total special education head count of an
intermediate district and the districts constituent to the
intermediate district from the fall pupil membership count day of
the immediately preceding year, except that if a district has
elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL
380.1711 to 380.1741, special education head count of the district
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

299
is not included in the special education head count of the
intermediate district.
(e) "Statewide average special education millage rate" means
the statewide levy amount divided by the statewide taxable value.
(f) "Statewide average taxable value per unreimbursed costs"
means the statewide taxable value divided by the statewide
unreimbursed costs.
(g) (c) "Taxable value" means the total taxable value of the
districts constituent to an intermediate district in the
immediately preceding fiscal year, except that if a district has
elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL
380.1711 to 380.1741, taxable value of the district is not included
in the taxable value of the intermediate district. Taxable value
also includes both of the following:
(i) The value of personal property exempt under the local
community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to
123.1362, and reimbursed to the intermediate district under section
17 of the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86,
MCL 123.1357.
(ii) Tax increment property captured by a brownfield
redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment
financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, and
reimbursed to the intermediate district under section 15b of the
brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2665b.
(h) "Unreimbursed costs" means the sum of costs reported on
the SE-4094 and SE-4096 reports for all districts in the
intermediate district, less the amount of reimbursement received
under section 51c, and less the capped local special education
property tax revenue.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

300
(2) From the allocation under section 51a(1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $40,008,100.00 for 2024-2025 and
$40,008,100.00 for 2025-2026 and $89,208,100.00 for 2026-2027 for
payments to reimburse intermediate districts levying millages for
special education under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL
380.1711 to 380.1741. The purpose, use, and expenditure of the
reimbursement are limited as if the funds were generated by these
millages and governed by the intermediate district plan adopted
under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to
380.1761. As a condition of receiving funds under this section, an
intermediate district distributing any portion of special education
millage funds to its constituent districts must submit for
departmental approval and implement a distribution plan.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
reimbursement for those millages levied in 2023-2024 is made in
2024-2025 at an amount per 2023-2024 membership pupil computed by
subtracting from $260,200.00 the 2023-2024 taxable value behind
each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by
the 2023-2024 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount
the 2023-2024 local community stabilization share revenue for
special education purposes and 2023-2024 tax increment revenues
captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the
brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651
to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of
personal property exemption loss under the local community
stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362,
and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment
revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the
brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

301
to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the
previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving
funds under this section and section 62, reimbursements paid under
section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of special education
millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of special
education millage levied and vocational-technical education millage
levied, as defined in section 62. Reimbursement in 2024-2025 for an
intermediate district whose 2017-2018 allocation was affected by
the operation of subsection (5) is an amount equal to 102.5% of the
2017-2018 allocation to that intermediate district.
(3) (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
reimbursement for those millages levied in 2024-2025 is made in
2025-2026 at an amount per 2024-2025 membership pupil computed by
subtracting from $278,500.00 $278,700.00 the 2024-2025 taxable
value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting
difference by the 2024-2025 millage levied, and then subtracting
from that amount the 2024-2025 local community stabilization share
revenue for special education purposes and 2024-2025 tax increment
revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created
under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL
125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for
reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local
community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to
123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax
increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority
under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL
125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described
in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district
receiving funds under this section and section 62, reimbursements
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

302
paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of special
education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum
of special education millage levied and vocational-technical
education millage levied, as defined in section 62. Reimbursement
in 2025-2026 for an intermediate district whose 2017-2018
allocation was affected by the operation of subsection (5) is an
amount equal to 102.5% of the 2017-2018 allocation to that
intermediate district.
(4) (5) The For 2025-2026, the department shall ensure that
the amount paid to a single intermediate district under subsection
(2) does not exceed 62.9% of the total amount allocated under
subsection (2).
(5) (6) The For 2025-2026, the department shall ensure that
the amount paid to a single intermediate district under subsection
(2) is not less than 75% of the amount allocated to the
intermediate district under subsection (2) for the immediately
preceding fiscal year.
(6) (7) From For 2025-2026, from the allocation under section
51a(1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $34,200,000.00
for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 to provide payments to intermediate
districts levying millages for special education under part 30 of
the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741. The purpose,
use, and expenditure of the payments under this subsection are
limited as if the funds were generated by these millages and
governed by the intermediate district plan adopted under article 3
of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761. The
department shall provide a payment under this subsection to each
intermediate district described in this subsection as follows:
(a) For 2024-2025 and 2025-2026, except as otherwise provided
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

303
in this subsection, for an intermediate district with a 3-year
average special education millage revenue per pupil in the
immediately preceding fiscal year that is less than $251.00 and
that is levying at least 46.2% but less than 60.0% of its maximum
millage rate allowed under section 1724a of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1724a, an amount computed by subtracting from $251.00
the 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in
the immediately preceding fiscal year and, only if the millage
levied by the intermediate district is less than 1, multiplying
that amount by the number of mills levied divided by 1, and then
multiplying that amount by the 3-year average membership in the
immediately preceding fiscal year, and then subtracting from that
amount the amount allocated under subsection (2) for the current
fiscal year. If the calculation under this subdivision results in
an amount below zero, there is no payment under this subdivision.
(b) For 2024-2025 and 2025-2026, except as otherwise provided
in this subsection, for an intermediate district with a 3-year
average special education millage revenue per pupil in the
immediately preceding fiscal year that is less than $296.00 and
that is levying at least 60.0% of its maximum millage rate allowed
under section 1724a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1724a, an
amount computed by subtracting from $296.00 the 3-year average
special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately
preceding fiscal year, and, only if the millage levied by the
intermediate district is less than 1, multiplying that amount by
the number of mills levied divided by 1, and then multiplying that
amount by the 3-year average membership in the immediately
preceding fiscal year, and then subtracting from that amount the
amount allocated under subsection (2) for the current fiscal year.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

304
If the calculation under this subdivision results in an amount
below zero, there is no payment under this subdivision.
(7) (8) After For 2025-2026, after making allocations to
eligible intermediate districts under subsections (3) , (4), and
(7), (6), if funds remain unallocated from the allocations under
subsections (2) and (7), (6), the department must allocate
remaining funds to intermediate districts proportional to the
amounts allocated to intermediate districts under subsections
subsection (3). and (4).
(8) (9) As used in subsection (7):(6):
(a) "3-year average membership" means the 3-year average pupil
membership for each of the 3 most recent fiscal years.
(b) "3-year average special education millage revenue per
pupil" means the 3-year average taxable value per mill levied
behind each membership pupil for each of the 3 most recent fiscal
years multiplied by the millage levied in the most recent fiscal
year.
(9) Beginning in 2026-2027, the department shall provide
payments under subsection (2) to each intermediate district
described in this subsection as follows:
(a) The department shall first calculate a reimbursement for
those millages levied in the immediately preceding fiscal year at
an amount per special education head count by subtracting the
intermediate district's taxable value per special education head
count from the statewide average taxable value per special
education head count, and multiplying the resulting difference by
the immediately preceding fiscal year millage rate levied, capped
at the statewide average special education millage rate.
(b) The department shall then calculate a reimbursement for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

305
unreimbursed costs by subtracting the quotient of the intermediate
district's taxable value and the statewide average taxable value
per unreimbursed costs from the intermediate district's
unreimbursed costs.
(c) The calculation under subdivision (a) must be greater than
$0.00 for an intermediate district to receive reimbursement under
this subsection. For an intermediate district whose calculation
under subdivision (a) is less than or equal to $0.00, the amount in
subdivision (b) is $0.00 for purposes of the calculation in
subdivision (d).
(d) The department shall then calculate the average of the
amounts calculated under subdivisions (a) and (b) for each
intermediate district. For the purpose of the calculation under
this subdivision, calculations in subdivision (a) or (b) that
result in negative totals are treated as $0.00.
(e) The amount reimbursed under subsection (2) is the 3-year
average of the amount calculated under subdivision (d) for the 3
most recent fiscal years.
(10) If total payments calculated under subsection (9) exceed
the amount allocated in subsection (2), the department must prorate
the payments on an equal percentage basis.
Sec. 61a. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $41,733,800.00 $44,233,800.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to
reimburse on an added cost basis districts, except for a district
that served as the fiscal agent for a vocational education
consortium in the 1993-94 school year and that has a foundation
allowance as calculated under section 20 greater than the target
foundation allowance under that section, and secondary area
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

306
vocational-technical education centers for secondary-level career
and technical education programs according to rules approved by the
superintendent. Applications for participation in the programs must
be submitted in the form prescribed by the department. The
department shall determine the added cost for each career and
technical education program area. The department shall prioritize
the allocation of added cost funds based on the capital and program
expenditures needed to operate the career and technical education
programs provided; the number of pupils enrolled; the advancement
of pupils through the instructional program; the existence of an
articulation agreement with at least 1 postsecondary institution
that provides pupils with opportunities to earn postsecondary
credit during the pupil's participation in the career and technical
education program and transfers those credits to the postsecondary
institution upon completion of the career and technical education
program; and the program rank in student placement, job openings,
and wages, and shall ensure that the allocation does not exceed 75%
of the added cost of any program. Notwithstanding any rule or
department determination to the contrary, when determining a
district's allocation or the formula for making allocations under
this section, the department shall include the participation of
pupils in grade 9 in all of those determinations and in all
portions of the formula. With the approval of the department, the
board of a district maintaining a secondary career and technical
education program may offer the program for the period from the
close of the school year until September 1. The program shall use
existing facilities and must be operated as prescribed by rules
promulgated by the superintendent.
(2) Except for a district that served as the fiscal agent for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

307
a vocational education consortium in the 1993-94 school year, the
department shall reimburse districts and intermediate districts for
local career and technical education administration, shared time
career and technical education administration, and career education
planning district career and technical education administration.
The superintendent shall adopt guidelines for the definition of
what constitutes administration and shall make reimbursement
pursuant to those guidelines. The department shall not distribute
more than $800,000.00 of the allocation in subsection (1) under
this subsection.
(3) A career and technical education program funded under this
section may provide an opportunity for participants who are
eligible to be funded under section 107 to enroll in the career and
technical education program funded under this section if the
participation does not occur during regular school hours.
Sec. 61b. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026
2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $8,368,000.00 $8,868,000.00 for
CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs
authorized under this section and for planning grants for the
development or expansion of CTE early middle college programs. The
purpose of these programs is to increase the number of Michigan
residents with high-quality degrees or credentials, and to increase
the number of students who are college and career ready upon high
school graduation.
(2) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the
department shall allocate an amount as determined under this
subsection to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent
for state-approved CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

308
programs in each of the career education planning districts
identified by the department. An intermediate district shall not
use more than 5% of the funds allocated under this subsection for
administrative costs for serving as the fiscal agent.
(3) To be an eligible fiscal agent, an intermediate district
must agree to do all of the following in a form and manner
determined by the department:
(a) Distribute funds to eligible CTE early middle college and
CTE dual enrollment programs in a career education planning
district as described in this section.
(b) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory
council in the workforce development board service delivery area to
develop 1 regional strategic plan under subsection (4) that aligns
CTE programs and services into an efficient and effective delivery
system for high school students. The department will align career
education planning districts, workforce development board service
delivery areas, and intermediate districts for the purpose of
creating 1 regional strategic plan for each workforce development
board service delivery area.
(c) Implement a regional process to rank career clusters in
the workforce development board service delivery area as described
under subsection (4). Regional processes must be approved by the
department before the ranking of career clusters.
(d) Report CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment
program and student data and information as prescribed by the
department and the center.
(e) The local education agency responsible for student
reporting in the Michigan student data system (MSDS) will report
the total number of college credits the student earned, at the time
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

309
of high school graduation, as determined by the department and the
center.
(f) The local education agency will report each award outcome
in the Michigan student data system (MSDS) that the CTE early
middle college student attained. For purposes of this subsection,
an on-track CTE early middle college graduate is a graduate who
obtained their high school diploma and at least 1 of the following:
(i) An associate degree.
(ii) 60 transferable college credits.
(iii) Professional certification.
(iv) A Michigan Early Middle College Association certificate.
(v) Participation in a registered apprenticeship.
(4) A regional strategic plan must be approved by the career
and educational advisory council before submission to the
department. A regional strategic plan must include, but is not
limited to, the following:
(a) An identification of regional employer need based on a
ranking of all career clusters in the workforce development board
service delivery area ranked by 10-year projections of annual job
openings and median wage for each standard occupational code in
each career cluster as obtained from the United States Bureau of
Labor Statistics. Standard occupational codes within high-ranking
clusters also may be further ranked by median wage and annual job
openings. The career and educational advisory council located in
the workforce development board service delivery area shall review
the rankings and modify them if necessary to accurately reflect
employer demand for talent in the workforce development board
service delivery area. A career and educational advisory council
shall document that it has conducted this review and certify that
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

310
it is accurate. These career cluster rankings must be determined
and updated once every 4 years.
(b) An identification of educational entities in the workforce
development board service delivery area that will provide eligible
CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs including
districts, intermediate districts, postsecondary institutions, and
noncredit occupational training programs leading to an industry-
recognized credential.
(c) A strategy to inform parents and students of CTE early
middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs in the workforce
development board service delivery area.
(d) Any other requirements as defined by the department.
(5) An eligible CTE program is a program that meets all of the
following:
(a) Has been identified in the highest 5 career cluster
rankings in any of the 16 workforce development board service
delivery area strategic plans jointly approved by the department of
labor and economic opportunity and the department.
(b) Has a coherent sequence of courses in a specific career
cluster that will allow a student to earn a high school diploma and
achieve at least 1 of the following:
(i) For CTE early middle college, outcomes as defined in
subsection (3)(f).
(ii) For CTE dual enrollment, 1 of the following:
(A) An associate degree.
(B) An industry-recognized technical certification approved by
the department of labor and economic opportunity.
(C) Up to 60 transferable college credits.
(D) Participation in a registered apprenticeship, pre-
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

311
apprenticeship, or apprentice readiness program.
(c) Is aligned with the Michigan merit curriculum.
(d) Has an articulation or a college credit agreement with at
least 1 postsecondary institution that provides students with
opportunities to receive postsecondary credits during the student's
participation in the CTE early middle college or CTE dual
enrollment program and transfers those credits to the postsecondary
institution upon completion of the CTE early middle college or CTE
dual enrollment program.
(e) Provides instruction that is supervised, directed, or
coordinated by an appropriately certificated CTE teacher or, for
concurrent enrollment courses, a postsecondary faculty member.
(f) Provides for highly integrated student support services
that include at least the following:
(i) Teachers as academic advisors.
(ii) Supervised course selection.
(iii) Monitoring of student progress and completion.
(iv) Career planning services provided by a local one-stop
service center as described in the Michigan works one-stop service
center system act, 2006 PA 491, MCL 408.111 to 408.135, or by a
high school counselor or advisor.
(g) Has courses that are taught on a college campus, are
college courses offered at the high school and taught by college
faculty, or are courses taught in combination with online
instruction.
(6) The department shall distribute funds to eligible CTE
early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs as follows:
(a) The department shall determine statewide average CTE costs
per pupil for each CIP code program by calculating statewide
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

312
average costs for each CIP code program for the 3 most recent
fiscal years.
(b) The distribution to each eligible CTE early middle college
or CTE dual enrollment program is the product of 50% of CTE costs
per pupil times the pupil enrollment of each eligible CTE early
middle college or CTE dual enrollment program in the immediately
preceding school year.
(7) To receive funds under this section, a CTE early middle
college or CTE dual enrollment program shall furnish to the
intermediate district that is the fiscal agent identified in
subsection (2), in a form and manner determined by the department,
all information needed to administer this program and meet federal
reporting requirements; shall allow the department or the
department's designee to review all records related to the program
for which it receives funds; and shall reimburse the state for all
disallowances found in the review, as determined by the department.
(8) There is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 from the funds
under subsection (1) an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 from the
state school aid fund allocation for grants to intermediate
districts or consortia of intermediate districts for the purpose of
planning for new or expanded early middle college programs.
Applications for grants must be submitted in a form and manner
determined by the department. The amount of a grant under this
subsection must not exceed $50,000.00. To be eligible for a grant
under this subsection, an intermediate district or consortia of
intermediate districts must provide matching funds equal to the
grant received under this subsection. Notwithstanding section 17b,
the department shall make payments under this subsection in the
manner determined by the department.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

313
(9) Funds distributed under this section may be used to fund
program expenditures that would otherwise be paid from foundation
allowances. A program receiving funding under section 61a may
receive funding under this section for allowable costs that exceed
the reimbursement the program received under section 61a. The
combined payments received by a program under section 61a and this
section must not exceed the total allowable costs of the program. A
program provider shall not use more than 5% of the funds allocated
under this section to the program for administrative costs.
(10) If the allocation under subsection (1) is insufficient to
fully fund payments as otherwise calculated under this section, the
department shall prorate payments under this section on an equal
percentage basis, using for that proration calculation payments
made for CTE dual enrollment programs only.
(11) If pupils enrolled in a career cluster in an eligible CTE
early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program qualify to be
reimbursed under this section, those pupils continue to qualify for
reimbursement until graduation, even if the career cluster is no
longer identified as being in the highest 5 career cluster
rankings.
(12) As used in this section:
(a) "Allowable costs" means those costs directly attributable
to the program as jointly determined by the department of labor and
economic opportunity and the department.
(b) "Career and educational advisory council" means an
advisory council to the local workforce development boards located
in a workforce development board service delivery area consisting
of educational, employer, labor, and parent representatives.
(c) "CIP" means classification of instructional programs.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

314
(d) "CTE" means career and technical education programs.
(e) "CTE dual enrollment program" means a 4-year high school
program of postsecondary courses offered by eligible postsecondary
educational institutions that leads to an industry-recognized
certification or degree.
(f) "Early middle college program" means a 5-year high school
program.
(g) "Eligible postsecondary educational institution" means
that term as defined in section 3 of the career and technical
preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1903.
Sec. 62. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Membership" means for a particular fiscal year the total
membership of the intermediate district and the districts
constituent to the intermediate district or the total membership of
the area vocational-technical program, except that if a district
has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised
school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, the membership of that
district are not included in the membership of the intermediate
district. However, the membership of a district that has elected
not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code,
MCL 380.681 to 380.690, is included in the membership of the
intermediate district if the district meets both of the following:
(i) The district operates the area vocational-technical
education program pursuant to a contract with the intermediate
district.
(ii) The district contributes an annual amount to the operation
of the program that is commensurate with the revenue that would
have been raised for operation of the program if millage were
levied in the district for the program under sections 681 to 690 of
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

315
the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690.
(b) "Millage levied" means the millage levied for area
vocational-technical education under sections 681 to 690 of the
revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, including a levy for
debt service obligations incurred as the result of borrowing for
capital outlay projects and in meeting capital projects fund
requirements of area vocational-technical education.
(c) "Taxable value" means the total taxable value of the
districts constituent to an intermediate district or area
vocational-technical education program, except that if a district
has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised
school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, the taxable value of that
district is not included in the taxable value of the intermediate
district. However, the taxable value of a district that has elected
not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code,
MCL 380.681 to 380.690, is included in the taxable value of the
intermediate district if the district meets both of the following:
(i) The district operates the area vocational-technical
education program pursuant to a contract with the intermediate
district.
(ii) The district contributes an annual amount to the operation
of the program that is commensurate with the revenue that would
have been raised for operation of the program if millage were
levied in the district for the program under sections 681 to 690 of
the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690.
(2) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$9,190,000.00 each fiscal year for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 to
reimburse intermediate districts and area vocational-technical
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

316
education programs established under section 690(3) of the revised
school code, MCL 380.690, levying millages for area vocational-
technical education under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school
code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690. The purpose, use, and expenditure of
the reimbursement are limited as if the funds were generated by
those millages.
(3) Reimbursement for those millages levied in 2023-2024 is
made in 2024-2025 at an amount per 2023-2024 membership pupil
computed by subtracting from $269,800.00 the 2023-2024 taxable
value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting
difference by the 2023-2024 millage levied, and then subtracting
from that amount the 2023-2024 local community stabilization share
revenue for area vocational technical education and 2023-2024 tax
increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority
created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA
381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for
reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local
community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to
123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax
increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority
under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL
125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described
in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district
receiving funds under this section and section 56, reimbursements
paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of
vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in this
section, and the sum of vocational-technical education millage
levied and special education.
(3) (4) Reimbursement for those millages levied in 2024-2025
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

317
is made in 2025-2026 at an amount per 2024-2025 membership pupil
computed by subtracting from $287,400.00 $288,300.00 the 2024-2025
taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the
resulting difference by the 2024-2025 millage levied, and then
subtracting from that amount the 2024-2025 local community
stabilization share revenue for area vocational technical education
and 2024-2025 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield
redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment
financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each
membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption
loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA
86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section
26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield
redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment
financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the
purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence
only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this
section and section 56, reimbursements paid under section 26d must
be multiplied by the ratio of vocational-technical education
millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of
vocational-technical education millage levied and special education
millage levied, as defined in section 56.
(4) Reimbursement for those millages levied in 2025-2026 is
made in 2026-2027 at an amount per 2025-2026 membership pupil
computed by subtracting from $303,500.00 the 2025-2026 taxable
value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting
difference by the 2025-2026 millage levied, and then subtracting
from that amount the 2025-2026 local community stabilization share
revenue for area vocational technical education and 2025-2026 tax
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

318
increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority
created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA
381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for
reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local
community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to
123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax
increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority
under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL
125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described
in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district
receiving funds under this section and section 56, reimbursements
paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of
vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in this
section, and the sum of vocational-technical education millage
levied and special education millage levied, as defined in section
56.
(5) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a
single intermediate district under this section does not exceed
38.4% of the total amount allocated under subsection (2).
(6) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a
single intermediate district under this section is not less than
75% of the amount allocated to the intermediate district under this
section for the immediately preceding fiscal year.
Sec. 65. (1) From the state school aid pupil support reserve
fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount
not to exceed $900,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 only for a pre-
college engineering K to 12 educational program that is focused on
the development of a diverse future Michigan workforce, that serves
multiple communities within southeast Michigan, that enrolls pupils
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

319
from multiple districts, and that received funds appropriated for
this purpose in the appropriations act that provided the Michigan
strategic fund budget for 2014-2015. It is the intent of the
legislature that the appropriation under this section will be
funded with state school aid pupil support reserve fund money
through 2027-2028.
(2) To be eligible for funding under this section, a program
must have the ability to expose pupils to, and motivate and prepare
pupils for, science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
careers and postsecondary education with special attention given to
groups of pupils who are at-risk and underrepresented in technical
professions and careers.
Sec. 67. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$3,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for college access programs.
The programs funded under this section are intended to inform
students of college and career options, to provide resources
intended to increase the number of pupils who are adequately
prepared with the information needed to make informed decisions on
college and career, support adult learners, support college
completion, and support workforce and employer engagement. The
funds appropriated under this section are intended to be used to
increase the number of Michigan residents with high-quality degrees
or credentials. Funds appropriated under this section must not be
used to supplant funding for counselors already funded by
districts.
(2) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential shall administer funds allocated under this section in
collaboration with the Michigan college access network. These funds
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

320
may be used for any of the following purposes:
(a) Michigan college access network operations, programming,
and services to local college access networks.
(b) Local college access networks, which are community-based
college access/success partnerships committed to increasing the
college participation and completion rates within geographically
defined communities through a coordinated strategy.
(c) The Michigan college advising program, a program intended
to place trained, recently graduated college advisors in high
schools that serve significant numbers of low-income and first-
generation college-going pupils. State funds used for this purpose
may not exceed 33% of the total funds available under this
subsection.
(d) Subgrants of up to $5,000.00 to districts with
comprehensive high schools that establish a college access team and
implement specific strategies to create a college-going culture in
a high school in a form and manner approved by the Michigan college
access network and the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
(e) The Michigan college access portal, an online one-stop
portal to help pupils and families plan and apply for college.
(f) Public awareness and outreach campaigns to encourage low-
income and first-generation college-going pupils to take necessary
steps toward college and to assist pupils and families in
completing a timely and accurate free application for federal
student aid.
(g) Subgrants to postsecondary institutions to recruit, hire,
and train college student mentors and college advisors to assist
high school pupils in navigating the postsecondary planning and
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

321
enrollment process.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "college" means any
postsecondary educational opportunity that leads to a career,
including, but not limited to, a postsecondary degree, industry-
recognized technical certification, or registered apprenticeship.
Sec. 67f. (1) From the state school aid pupil support reserve
fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-
2026 2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for
districts to improve FAFSA completion rates. It is the intent of
the legislature that the appropriation under this section will be
funded with state school aid pupil support reserve fund money
through 2027-2028.
(2) To be eligible to receive funding under this section, each
district must apply in a form and manner determined by the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall
make the application available by not later than November 1, 2025.
A district shall apply for funding to the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential by not later than December 1,
2025. In the application, the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential shall only require a district to certify
that it will do both of the following:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), require
all students to complete the FAFSA to graduate from high school.
(b) Use funds received under this section for participation in
and implementation of activities that are known to drive FAFSA
completion, as determined by the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, in collaboration with the Michigan
College Access Network.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

322
(3) A district shall exempt a student from the requirement to
complete the FAFSA if any of the following are met:
(a) The student's parent or legal guardian, or the student if
the student is 18 years of age or older, is an emancipated minor,
or is an unaccompanied youth, has submitted a parental waiver to
the district exempting the student from completing the FAFSA. The
parental waiver described in this subdivision must be obtained
through a standard form developed by the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential.
(b) The student is unable to complete the FAFSA because of
privacy concerns.
(c) All of the following are met:
(i) After a good-faith effort, the student's parent or legal
guardian refuses to sign the parental waiver, is unresponsive, or
cannot sign the parental waiver.
(ii) The student is unable to complete the FAFSA as an
independent student.
(iii) The student agrees to opt out of completing the FAFSA.
(iv) Other than the requirements in subsection (2), the student
is on track to graduate.
(v) A school administrator of the student's high school
demonstrates to the board that good-faith efforts have been made to
assist the student or the student's parent or legal guardian in
completing the FAFSA or obtaining a parental waiver.
(vi) The board ensures compliance with 42 USC 11432(g)(6)(A).
(4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential may use past participation in the FAFSA Completion
Challenge under this section as a factor in determining district
eligibility.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

323
(5) (4) By not later than January 31, 2026, the The department
of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall pay each
eligible district an equal amount per pupil multiplied by the
number of pupils enrolled and attending grade 12 in the district.
Initial payments must be made by not later than January 31, 2027.
(6) (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments
under this section on a schedule determined by the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential.
(7) Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated under this
section may be available for expenditure until September 30, 2029.
A recipient of funding under this section must return any
unexpended funds to the department in the manner prescribed by the
department by not later than October 30, 2030.
(8) (6) As used in the this section, "FAFSA" means the free
application for federal student aid form.
Sec. 74. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated
in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$3,949,900.00 $4,003,100.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the
purposes of this section.
(2) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated
for 2025-2026 2026-2027 the amount necessary for payments to state
supported colleges or universities and intermediate districts
providing school bus driver safety instruction under section 51 of
the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL 257.1851. The
department shall make payments in an amount determined by the
department not to exceed the actual cost of instruction and driver
compensation for each public or nonpublic school bus driver
attending a course of instruction. For the purpose of computing
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

324
compensation, the hourly rate allowed each school bus driver must
not exceed the hourly rate received for driving a school bus. The
department shall make reimbursement compensating the driver during
the course of instruction to the college or university or
intermediate district providing the course of instruction.
(3) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated
for 2025-2026 2026-2027 the amount necessary to pay the reasonable
costs of nonspecial education auxiliary services transportation
provided under section 1323 of the revised school code, MCL
380.1323. Districts funded under this subsection do not receive
funding under any other section of this article for nonspecial
education auxiliary services transportation.
(4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is
allocated an amount not to exceed $1,924,900.00 $1,978,100.00 for
2025-2026 2026-2027 for the inspection of school buses and pupil
transportation vehicles by the department of state police as
required under section 715a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA
300, MCL 257.715a, and section 39 of the pupil transportation act,
1990 PA 187, MCL 257.1839. The department of state police shall
prepare a statement of costs and submit it to the department and to
an intermediate district serving as fiduciary in a time and manner
determined jointly by the department and the department of state
police. Upon review and approval of the statement of cost, the
department shall forward to the designated intermediate district
serving as fiduciary the amount detailed on the statement within 45
days after receipt of the statement. The designated intermediate
district fiduciary shall make payment in the amount specified on
the statement to the department of state police within 45 days
after receipt of the statement. The total reimbursement of costs
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

325
under this subsection must not exceed the amount allocated under
this subsection. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall
make payments to eligible entities under this subsection on a
schedule prescribed by the department.
Sec. 81. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated
in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to
intermediate districts the sum necessary, but not to exceed
$83,157,700.00, $85,355,700.00, to provide state aid to
intermediate districts under this section.
(2) The amount allocated under this section to each
intermediate school district for the current fiscal year is equal
to the allocation for the immediately preceding fiscal year plus an
equal percentage increase for all intermediate school districts. An
intermediate district shall use funding provided under this section
to comply with requirements of this article and the revised school
code that are applicable to intermediate districts, and for which
funding is not provided elsewhere in this article, and to provide
technical assistance to districts as authorized by the intermediate
school board.
(3) Intermediate districts receiving funds under this section
shall collaborate with the department to develop expanded
professional development opportunities for teachers to update and
expand their knowledge and skills needed to support the Michigan
merit curriculum.
(4) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated
to an intermediate district, formed by the consolidation or
annexation of 2 or more intermediate districts or the attachment of
a total intermediate district to another intermediate district or
the annexation of all of the constituent K to 12 districts of a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

326
previously existing intermediate district which has disorganized,
an additional allotment of $3,500.00 each fiscal year for each
intermediate district included in the new intermediate district for
3 years following consolidation, annexation, or attachment.
(5) To receive funding under this section, an intermediate
district shall do all of the following:
(a) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the
intermediate district employs at least 1 person who is trained in
pupil accounting and auditing procedures, rules, and regulations.
(b) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the
intermediate district employs at least 1 person who is trained in
rules, regulations, and district reporting procedures for the
individual-level student data that serves as the basis for the
calculation of the district and high school graduation and dropout
rates.
(c) Comply with sections 1278a and 1278b of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1278a and 380.1278b.
(d) Furnish data and other information required by state and
federal law to the center and the department in the form and manner
specified by the center or the department, as applicable.
(e) Comply with section 1230g of the revised school code, MCL
380.1230g.
(f) Ensure that all districts located within the intermediate
district's geographic boundaries have equitable access to the
intermediate district's coordination activities and services,
intermediate district-wide or regional meetings, regularly
scheduled superintendent meetings, programming, events, email
distribution lists, listservs, or other coordination or
collaboration activities organized by or hosted in the intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

327
district. In ensuring that all districts located within the
geographic boundaries of the intermediate district have equitable
access to the services, meetings, programming, events, email
distribution lists, listservs, or activities, the intermediate
district shall ensure that districts that are public school
academies and that are located within the intermediate district's
geographic boundaries are not excluded from the services, meetings,
programming, events, email distribution lists, listservs, or
activities organized by or hosted in the intermediate district if
districts that are not public school academies and that are located
within the geographic boundaries of the intermediate district are
not excluded.
Sec. 94. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated to the department for 2025-2026
2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $2,600,000.00 for efforts to
increase the number of pupils who participate and succeed in
advanced placement and international baccalaureate programs, and to
support the college-level examination program (CLEP). It is the
intent of the legislature that, for 2026-2027, 2027-2028, the
allocation from the general fund money appropriated in section 11
for purposes described in this section will be $1,200,000.00.
(2) From the funds allocated under this section, the
department shall award funds to cover all or part of the costs of
advanced placement test fees or international baccalaureate test
fees and international baccalaureate registration fees for low-
income pupils who take an advanced placement or an international
baccalaureate test and CLEP fees for low-income pupils who take a
CLEP test.
(3) The department shall only award funds under this section
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

328
if the department determines that all of the following criteria are
met:
(a) Each pupil for whom payment is made meets eligibility
requirements of the federal advanced placement test fee program
under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or
the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95, as applicable.
(b) The tests are administered by the college board, the
international baccalaureate organization, or another test provider
approved by the department.
(c) The pupil for whom payment is made pays at least $5.00
toward the cost of each test for which payment is made.
(4) If funds remain after the awards granted in subsection
(2), the department shall award funds to reimburse a portion of the
costs associated with the provision of advanced placement (AP),
international baccalaureate (IB), or college-level examination
program (CLEP) exams for students whose family income exceeds low-
income status as determined by the department.
(5) The department shall establish procedures for awarding
funds under this section.
(6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 94a. (1) There is created within the state budget office
in the department of technology, management, and budget the center
for educational performance and information. The center shall do
all of the following:
(a) Coordinate the collection of all data required by state
and federal law from districts, intermediate districts, and
postsecondary institutions.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

329
(b) Create, maintain, and enhance this state's P-20
longitudinal data system and ensure that it meets the requirements
of subsection (4).
(c) Collect data in the most efficient manner possible to
reduce the administrative burden on reporting entities, including,
but not limited to, electronic transcript services.
(d) Create, maintain, and enhance this state's web-based
educational portal to provide information to school leaders,
teachers, researchers, and the public in compliance with all
federal and state privacy laws. Data must include, but are not
limited to, all of the following:
(i) Data sets that link teachers to student information,
allowing districts to assess individual teacher impact on student
performance and consider student growth factors in teacher and
principal evaluation systems.
(ii) Data access or, if practical, data sets, provided for
regional data hubs that, in combination with local data, can
improve teaching and learning in the classroom.
(iii) Research-ready data sets for researchers to perform
research that advances this state's educational performance.
(e) Provide data in a useful manner to allow state and local
policymakers to make informed policy decisions.
(f) Provide public reports to the residents of this state to
allow them to assess allocation of resources and the return on
their investment in the education system of this state.
(g) Other functions as assigned by the state budget director.
(2) Each state department, officer, or agency that collects
information from districts, intermediate districts, or
postsecondary institutions as required under state or federal law
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

330
shall make arrangements with the center to ensure that the state
department, officer, or agency is in compliance with subsection
(1). This subsection does not apply to information collected by the
department of treasury under the uniform budgeting and accounting
act, 1968 PA 2, MCL 141.421 to 141.440a; the revised municipal
finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821; the school bond
qualification, approval, and loan act, 2005 PA 92, MCL 388.1921 to
388.1939; or section 1351a of the revised school code, MCL
380.1351a.
(3) The center may enter into any interlocal agreements
necessary to fulfill its functions.
(4) The center shall ensure that the P-20 longitudinal data
system required under subsection (1)(b) meets all of the following:
(a) Includes data at the individual student level from
preschool through postsecondary education and into the workforce.
(b) Supports interoperability by using standard data
structures, data formats, and data definitions to ensure linkage
and connectivity in a manner that facilitates the exchange of data
among agencies and institutions within the state and between
states.
(c) Enables the matching of individual teacher and student
records so that an individual student may be matched with those
teachers providing instruction to that student.
(d) Enables the matching of individual teachers with
information about their certification and the institutions that
prepared and recommended those teachers for state certification.
(e) Enables data to be easily generated for continuous
improvement and decision-making, decision including timely
reporting to parents, teachers, and school leaders on student
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

331
achievement.
(f) Ensures the reasonable quality, validity, and reliability
of data contained in the system.
(g) Provides this state with the ability to meet federal and
state reporting requirements.
(h) For data elements related to preschool through grade 12
and postsecondary, meets all of the following:
(i) Contains a unique statewide student identifier that does
not permit a student to be individually identified by users of the
system, except as allowed by federal and state law.
(ii) Contains student-level enrollment, demographic, and
program participation information, including data associated with
students who have been identified as having an affiliation to 1 or
more federally recognized Indian tribes and student participation
in federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and
participation in federal programs funded under the Johnson-O'Malley
Supplemental supplemental Indian Education Program Modernization
Act, education program modernization act, Public Law 115-404. Any
reports or data access related specifically to tribal affiliation
must be done through ongoing consultation with the federally
recognized tribes in the state with the expectation that the
center, the department, and the tribes will work iteratively toward
meaningful reports, access, and use of these records to improve
shared education interests and outcomes.
(iii) Contains student-level information about the points at
which students exit, transfer in, transfer out, drop out, or
complete education programs.
(iv) Has the capacity to communicate with higher education data
systems.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

332
(i) For data elements related to preschool through grade 12
only, meets all of the following:
(i) Contains yearly test records of individual students for
assessments approved by DED-OESE for accountability purposes under
section 1111(b) of the elementary and secondary education act of
1965, 20 USC 6311, including information on individual students not
tested, by grade and subject.
(ii) Contains student-level transcript information, including
information on courses completed and grades earned.
(iii) Contains student-level college readiness test scores.
(j) For data elements related to postsecondary education only:
(i) Contains data that provide information regarding the extent
to which individual students transition successfully from secondary
school to postsecondary education, including, but not limited to,
all of the following:
(A) Enrollment in remedial coursework.
(B) Completion of 1 year's worth of college credit applicable
to a degree within 2 years of enrollment.
(ii) Contains data that provide other information determined
necessary to address alignment and adequate preparation for success
in postsecondary education.
(5) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated an amount not to exceed $19,364,700.00
$19,548,500.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to the department of
technology, management, and budget to support the operations of the
center. In addition, from the federal funds appropriated in section
11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 the amount
necessary, estimated at $2,193,500.00, $193,500.00, to support the
operations of the center and to establish a P-20 longitudinal data
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

333
system necessary for state and federal reporting purposes. The
center shall cooperate with the department to ensure that this
state is in compliance with federal law and is maximizing
opportunities for increased federal funding to improve education in
this state.
(6) From the funds allocated in subsection (5), the center may
use an amount determined by the center for competitive grants for
2025-2026 2026-2027 to support collaborative efforts on the P-20
longitudinal data system. All of the following apply to grants
awarded under this subsection:
(a) The center shall award competitive grants to eligible
intermediate districts or a consortium of intermediate districts
based on criteria established by the center.
(b) Activities funded under the grant must support the P-20
longitudinal data system portal and may include portal hosting,
hardware and software acquisition, maintenance, enhancements, user
support and related materials, and professional learning tools and
activities aimed at improving the utility of the P-20 longitudinal
data system.
(c) An applicant that received a grant under this subsection
for the immediately preceding fiscal year has priority for funding
under this section. However, after 3 fiscal years of continuous
funding, an applicant is required to compete openly with new
applicants.
(7) Funds allocated under this section that are not expended
in the fiscal year in which they were allocated may be carried
forward to a subsequent fiscal year and are appropriated for the
purposes for which the funds were originally allocated.
(8) The center may bill departments as necessary to fulfill
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

334
reporting requirements of state and federal law. The center may
also enter into agreements to supply custom data, analysis, and
reporting to other principal executive departments, state agencies,
local units of government, and other individuals and organizations.
The center may receive and expend funds in addition to those
authorized in subsection (5) to cover the costs associated with
salaries, benefits, supplies, materials, and equipment necessary to
provide such data, analysis, and reporting services.
(9) As used in this section, "DED-OESE" means the United
States Department of Education Office of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
Sec. 94e. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026
2026-2027 only an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for support of
the Michigan Education Research Institute.
(2) Funding allocated under this section must be distributed
to the University of Michigan's Michigan Education Data Center and
Michigan State University's Education Policy Innovation Center for
the purpose of working collaboratively with the department, the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and
the center to build and maintain a research ready dataset, and to
conduct research of critical importance to the state's education
goals.
(3) The Michigan Education Research Institute shall use funds
received under this section for the purpose of expanding on
research that includes, but is not limited to, all the following:
(a) Educator shortage.
(b) Early literacy initiative outcomes.
(c) Early childhood development programming outcomes.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

335
(4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 98. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$9,800,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 only for the purposes
described in this section. The Michigan Virtual University shall
provide a report to the legislature not later than November 1 of
each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section
that includes its mission, its plans, and proposed benchmarks it
must meet, including a plan to achieve the organizational
priorities identified in this section, to receive full funding for
the next fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this
section. By not later than March 1 of each fiscal year for which
funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual
University shall provide an update to the house and senate
appropriations subcommittees on school aid to show the progress
being made to meet the benchmarks identified.
(2) The Michigan Virtual University shall operate the Michigan
Virtual Learning Research Institute. The Michigan Virtual Learning
Research Institute shall do all of the following:
(a) Support and accelerate innovation in education through the
following activities:
(i) Test, evaluate, and recommend as appropriate new
technology-based instructional tools and resources.
(ii) Research, design, and recommend virtual education delivery
models for use by pupils and teachers that include age-appropriate
multimedia instructional content.
(iii) Research, develop, and recommend annually to the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

336
department criteria by which cyber schools and virtual course
providers should be monitored and evaluated to ensure a quality
education for their pupils.
(iv) Based on pupil completion and performance data reported to
the department or the center from cyber schools and other virtual
course providers operating in this state, analyze the effectiveness
of virtual learning delivery models in preparing pupils to be
college- and career-ready and publish a report that highlights
enrollment totals, completion rates, and the overall impact on
pupils. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall
submit the report to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, the house
and senate fiscal agencies, the department, districts, and
intermediate districts by not later than March 31 of each fiscal
year for which funding is allocated under this section.
(v) Provide an extensive professional development program to
at least 30,000 educational personnel, including teachers, school
administrators, and school board members, that focuses on the
effective integration of virtual learning into curricula and
instruction. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute is
encouraged to work with the MiSTEM council described in section 99s
to coordinate professional development of teachers in applicable
fields. In addition, the Michigan Virtual Learning Research
Institute and external stakeholders are encouraged to coordinate
with the department for professional development in this state,
including professional development for employees in child care
facilities, early childhood facilities, and after-school programs.
By not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which funding
is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual Learning
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

337
Research Institute shall submit a report to the house and senate
appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget
director, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the department
on the number of teachers, school administrators, and school board
members who have received professional development services from
the Michigan Virtual University. The report must also include both
of the following:
(A) The identification of barriers and other opportunities to
encourage the adoption of virtual learning in the public education
system.
(B) A link to, and explanation of, the Michigan Virtual
University's online course standards for professional development
programming. The standards described in this sub-subparagraph must
inform learners how to file a complaint about course content and
detail the steps that will be taken for the review and resolution
of complaints.
(vi) Identify and share best practices for planning,
implementing, and evaluating virtual and blended education delivery
models with intermediate districts, districts, and public school
academies to accelerate the adoption of innovative education
delivery models statewide.
(b) Provide leadership for this state's system of virtual
learning education by doing the following activities:
(i) Develop and report policy recommendations to the governor
and the legislature that accelerate the expansion of effective
virtual learning in this state's schools.
(ii) Provide a clearinghouse for research reports, academic
studies, evaluations, and other information related to virtual
learning.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

338
(iii) Promote and distribute the most current instructional
design standards and guidelines for virtual teaching.
(iv) In collaboration with the department and interested
colleges and universities in this state, support implementation and
improvements related to effective virtual learning instruction.
(v) Pursue public/private partnerships that include districts
to study and implement competency-based technology-rich virtual
learning models.
(vi) Create a statewide network of school-based mentors serving
as liaisons between pupils, virtual instructors, parents, and
school staff, as provided by the department or the center, and
provide mentors with research-based training and technical
assistance designed to help more pupils be successful virtual
learners.
(vii) Convene focus groups and conduct annual surveys of
teachers, administrators, pupils, parents, and others to identify
barriers and opportunities related to virtual learning.
(viii) Produce an annual consumer awareness report for schools
and parents about effective virtual education providers and
education delivery models, performance data, cost structures, and
research trends.
(ix) Provide an internet-based platform that educators can use
to create student-centric learning tools and resources for sharing
in the state's open educational resource repository and facilitate
a user network that assists educators in using the content creation
platform and state repository for open educational resources. As
part of this initiative, the Michigan Virtual University shall work
collaboratively with districts and intermediate districts to
establish a plan to make available virtual resources that align to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

339
Michigan's K to 12 curriculum standards for use by students,
educators, and parents.
(x) Create and maintain a public statewide catalog of virtual
learning courses being offered by all public schools and community
colleges in this state. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research
Institute shall identify and develop a list of nationally
recognized best practices for virtual learning and use this list to
support reviews of virtual course vendors, courses, and
instructional practices. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research
Institute shall also provide a mechanism for intermediate districts
to use the identified best practices to review content offered by
constituent districts. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research
Institute shall review the virtual course offerings of the Michigan
Virtual University, and make the results from these reviews
available to the public as part of the statewide catalog. The
Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall ensure that the
statewide catalog is made available to the public on the Michigan
Virtual University website and shall allow the ability to link it
to each district's website as provided for in section 21f. The
statewide catalog must also contain all of the following:
(A) The number of enrollments in each virtual course in the
immediately preceding school year.
(B) The number of enrollments that earned 60% or more of the
total course points for each virtual course in the immediately
preceding school year.
(C) The pass rate for each virtual course.
(xi) Support registration, payment services, and transcript
functionality for the statewide catalog and train key stakeholders
on how to use new features.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

340
(xii) Collaborate with key stakeholders to examine district
level accountability and teacher effectiveness issues related to
virtual learning under section 21f and make findings and
recommendations publicly available.
(xiii) Provide a report on the activities of the Michigan
Virtual Learning Research Institute.
(3) To further enhance its expertise and leadership in virtual
learning, the Michigan Virtual University shall continue to operate
the Michigan Virtual School as a statewide laboratory and quality
model of instruction by implementing virtual and blended learning
solutions for Michigan schools in accordance with the following
parameters:
(a) The Michigan Virtual School must maintain its
accreditation status from recognized national and international
accrediting entities.
(b) The Michigan Virtual University shall use no more than
$1,000,000.00 of the amount allocated under this section to
subsidize the cost paid by districts for virtual courses.
(c) In providing educators responsible for the teaching of
virtual courses as provided for in this section, the Michigan
Virtual School shall follow the requirements to request and assess,
and the department of state police shall provide, a criminal
history check and criminal records check under sections 1230 and
1230a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230 and 380.1230a, in
the same manner as if the Michigan Virtual School were a school
district under those sections.
(4) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the
Michigan Virtual University shall support the expansion of new
online and blended educator professional development programs.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

341
(5) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the
Michigan Virtual University shall operate a comprehensive statewide
laboratory designed to function as a hub for cutting-edge research,
the identification and dissemination of best practices, rigorous
experimentation, policy formulation, and proactive efforts to
enhance awareness about the responsible utilization of artificial
intelligence in schools.
(6) If the course offerings are included in the statewide
catalog of virtual courses under subsection (2)(b)(x), the Michigan
Virtual School operated by the Michigan Virtual University may
offer virtual course offerings, including, but not limited to, all
of the following:
(a) Information technology courses.
(b) College level equivalent courses, as that term is defined
in section 1471 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1471.
(c) Courses and dual enrollment opportunities.
(d) Programs and services for at-risk pupils.
(e) High school equivalency test preparation courses for
adjudicated youth.
(f) Special interest courses.
(g) Professional development programs for teachers, school
administrators, other school employees, and school board members.
(7) If a home-schooled or nonpublic school student is a
resident of a district that subscribes to services provided by the
Michigan Virtual School, the student may use the services provided
by the Michigan Virtual School to the district without charge to
the student beyond what is charged to a district pupil using the
same services.
(8) By not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

342
funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual
University shall provide a report to the house and senate
appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget
director, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the department
that includes at least all of the following information related to
the Michigan Virtual School for the preceding fiscal year:
(a) A list of the districts served by the Michigan Virtual
School.
(b) A list of virtual course titles available to districts.
(c) The total number of virtual course enrollments and
information on registrations and completions by course.
(d) The overall course completion rate percentage.
(9) In addition to the information listed in subsection (8),
the report under subsection (8) must also include a plan to serve
at least 600 schools with courses from the Michigan Virtual School
or with content available through the internet-based platform
identified in subsection (2)(b)(ix).
(10) The governor may appoint an advisory group for the
Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute established under
subsection (2). The members of the advisory group serve at the
pleasure of the governor and without compensation. The purpose of
the advisory group is to make recommendations to the governor, the
legislature, and the president and board of the Michigan Virtual
University that will accelerate innovation in this state's
education system in a manner that will prepare elementary and
secondary students to be career and college ready and that will
promote the goal of increasing the percentage of residents of this
state with high-quality degrees and credentials to at least 60% by
2030.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

343
(11) By not later than November 1 of each fiscal year for
which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual
University shall submit to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, and the
house and senate fiscal agencies a detailed budget for that fiscal
year that includes a breakdown on its projected costs to deliver
virtual educational services to districts and a summary of the
anticipated fees to be paid by districts for those services. By not
later than March 1 each fiscal year for which funding is allocated
under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall submit to
the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid,
the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies
a breakdown on its actual costs to deliver virtual educational
services to districts and a summary of the actual fees paid by
districts for those services based on audited financial statements
for the immediately preceding fiscal year.
(12) As used in this section:
(a) "Blended learning" means a hybrid instructional delivery
model where pupils are provided content, instruction, and
assessment, in part at a supervised educational facility away from
home where the pupil and a teacher with a valid Michigan teaching
certificate are in the same physical location and in part through
internet-connected learning environments with some degree of pupil
control over time, location, and pace of instruction.
(b) "Cyber school" means a full-time instructional program of
virtual courses for pupils that may or may not require attendance
at a physical school location.
(c) "Virtual course" means a course of study that is capable
of generating a credit or a grade and that is provided in an
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

344
interactive learning environment in which the majority of the
curriculum is delivered using the internet and in which pupils are
separated from their instructor or teacher of record by time or
location, or both.
Sec. 98d. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027
only an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 to Northern Michigan
University to support the MLC as described in this section.
Northern Michigan University shall not retain any portion of the
funding received under this section for administrative purposes and
shall provide funding to support the MLC. All of the following
apply to the MLC:
(a) The MLC must expand literacy programming aligned with this
state's pre-K to 12 educational standards over the air, online, and
in communities.
(b) The MLC shall provide over-the-air broadcasts 24 hours
each day for 7 days each week of quality instructional content that
is aligned with this state's pre-K to 12 educational standards.
Over-the-air broadcasts as described in this subdivision must be
streamed live and must be archived for on-demand viewing on a
companion website, along with additional learning materials
relevant to lessons.
(c) The MLC must be managed and operated by DPTV, and DPTV
shall assume all risk, liability, and responsibility for the MLC in
accordance with regulations by the United States Federal
Communications Commission, PBS broadcast standards, and standard
nonprofit business standards. DPTV shall serve as the fiduciary
agent and service manager for the MLC. The MLC shall originate from
a central operations center that is responsible for providing the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

345
infrastructure, content, and engagement of the MLC in partnership
with this state's educational leadership organizations.
(d) The MLC shall require that DPTV provide technology,
funding, staff training, and central management of the MLC to
station partners to insert additional channels into each station's
broadcast streams and to support staffing and engagement as
outlined in a memorandum of understanding among the stations.
(e) The MLC shall require that DPTV partner with at least 5
other Michigan public television stations, including, but not
limited to, WKAR, WGVU, WDCQ, WCMU, and WNMU, to deliver the over-
the-air MLC broadcasts described in this section and to support
engagement with local educators. Stations described in this
subdivision must be able to use the infrastructure provided by the
MLC to develop their own local content that best serves their
communities.
(2) By not later than February 1, 2028, the MLC shall provide
a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees
responsible for school aid, the house and senate fiscal agencies,
and the state budget director detailing the MLC's compliance with
ensuring that conditions listed under subsection (1) were met.
(3) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section by not later than December 1, 2026.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "DPTV" means Detroit Public Television.
(b) "MLC" means the Michigan Learning Channel.
Sec. 99. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated
in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$500,000.00 for 2023-2024 only to Kentwood Public Schools and Oak
Park Schools for a plant-based school meals pilot grant program.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

346
Grants shall be used for developing and implementing plant-based
meal options in school cafeterias, training school food service
staff in the preparation of plant-based meals, and purchasing
necessary kitchen equipment to facilitate the preparation of plant-
based meals. Recipients of grants under this program shall submit a
report to the department detailing the use of funds and the impact
of the program on student meal choices and environmental
sustainability.
(2) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 for 2024-
2025 only for a virtual reality youth peace literacy initiative
pilot program.
(3) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for 2024-
2025 only to the American Lightweight Materials Manufacturing
Innovation Institute, in partnership with the Michigan
Manufacturers Association, Amatrol, and the ATS LAB Midwest. Funds
received under this subsection must be used to provide high schools
and intermediate districts in this state with competency-based,
technology infused talent development programs that provide
curricula, e-learning, hands-on e-learning systems, curricula-
specific training equipment, installation, orientation, teacher
training, industry-recognized skill certifications, and connections
to local manufacturers for students in high schools and
intermediate districts in this state.
(4) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$2,500,000.00 for 2024-2025 only to the Dearborn City School
District for costs to expand the career and technical education
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

347
program for the district, including, but not limited to, expansion
of a cybersecurity certificate program. Costs in this subsection
may include both operational and capital costs.
(5) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$1,500,000.00 for 2024-2025 only to the Dearborn City School
District to support the construction of outdoor classrooms and
other green space for Salina Intermediate School in the Dearborn
City School District.
(6) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$2,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 only to the School District of the City
of Harper Woods to support the costs for construction and operation
of the daily life skills training center, an educational and skills
development program with individualized training to improve a
child's abilities to independently perform routine daily activities
and effectively use community resources.
(7) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$2,500,000.00 for 2024-2025 only to the Lansing Public School
District for development and infrastructure improvements.
(8) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to
exceed $700,000.00 to Clintondale Community Schools for safety and
security upgrades.
(9) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed
$500,000.00 to the city of Algonac in St. Clair County to support
asbestos remediation and redevelopment in a former school building.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

348
(10) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to
exceed $700,000.00 to South Lyon Community Schools for student
mental health services.
(11) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to
exceed $200,000.00 to Farmington Public School District for high-
intensity tutoring.
(12) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed
$2,100,000.00 to the Marygrove Conservancy for the creation of the
Marygrove Film School.
(13) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed
$2,900,000.00, and from the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only
an amount not to exceed $3,100,000.00 to Rudyard Area Schools for
infrastructure.
(14) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed
$250,000.00 to Brookview Montessori School for structural updates,
including, but not limited to, electrical and HVAC.
(15) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed
$100,000.00 for Okemos Public Montessori at Central for district
lead abatement.
(16) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed
$500,000.00 to Wellspring Detroit to support the academic and youth
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

349
development program.
(17) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to
exceed $500,000.00 to a district or intermediate district to
support the implementation of the MI Student Voice Perception
Survey.
(18) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11,
there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed
$3,700,000.00 to the recipients identified in this subsection to
support capital costs to increase safety of student pedestrians.
(a) A recipient of a grant under this subsection shall use the
funds to increase the safety of student pedestrians through capital
improvements. A grant recipient may enter into agreements with
other units of local government to complete eligible projects.
Improvements may include, but are not limited to, all of the
following:
(i) Signage and painting for crosswalks.
(ii) Installing or repairing sidewalks.
(iii) Adding turning lanes.
(iv) Installing or repairing traffic signal lights.
(b) From the allocation in this subsection, $3,000,000.00 is
allocated to Macomb Township in Macomb County for road, signal, and
pedestrian crossing improvements at the intersection of 21 Mile
Road and Heydenreich Road. The purpose of the improvements is to
increase safety for student pedestrians at nearby schools.
(c) From the allocation in this subsection, $250,000.00 is
allocated to the Woodhaven-Brownstown School District to construct
sidewalks to connect nearby residential areas to schools in the
district.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

350
(d) From the allocation in this subsection, $450,000.00 is
allocated to the Village of Brooklyn to partner with the Columbia
Charter School District and Columbia Charter Township to improve
student pedestrian safety.
(e) The funds allocated under this subsection for 2024-2025
are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for
2024-2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the
work project is to continue to provide support for capital costs to
increase safety of student pedestrians. The estimated completion
date of the work project is September 30, 2029.
(19) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to
exceed $7,000,000.00 to Detroit Public Schools Community District
to offset the cost of relocating the Davis Aerospace Technical High
School to the Coleman A. Young International Airport.
Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated under this subsection
may be available for expenditure until September 30, 2027. A
recipient of funding under this subsection must return any
unexpended funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the
department by not later than October 30, 2027.
(20) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to
exceed $1,200,000.00 to Grand Rapids Public Schools to supplement
funding for the school meals program in section 30d.
(21) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $750,000.00 to
Livonia Public Schools to support the Thrive Track – Healthy Living
Skills for Independence program.
(22) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

351
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $450,000.00 to
Grosse Pointe Public Schools for technology costs.
(23) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $1,000,000.00 to
a district or intermediate district to partner with the Arab
Community Center for Economic and Social Services (ACCESS) in
Dearborn to rehabilitate and expand the ACCESS Innovation Center.
(24) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $1,200,000.00 to
Lansing Public School District to support renovation of the Don
Johnson Fieldhouse and expansion of the Lansing Student Development
Program.
(25) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $1,000,000.00 to
Clintondale Community Schools for expenses for school buildings
related to flood damage.
(26) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $3,000,000.00 to
an intermediate district to partner with the Michigan Regional
Council of Carpenters and Millwrights, an entity located in the
city of Detroit, for the schools to tools program, which exposes
middle and high school students to the building trades and to
apprenticeship opportunities.
(27) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $12,000,000.00 to
an intermediate district to partner with the Sam Beauford
Woodworking Institute, a 501(c)(3) entity located in the city of
Adrian, to support the expansion of education opportunities.
(28) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

352
section 11, there is allocated $245,000.00 for 2024-2025 only to
Mid Peninsula School District for improvements to a heating,
ventilation, and air conditioning system.
(29) The funds allocated under this section for 2024-2025 are
a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-
2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work
project is to complete projects described in this section. The
estimated completion date of the work project is September 30,
2026.
(30) $53,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only for district supports
and pilot programs. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department
shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by
the department.
Sec. 99h. (1) From the state school aid pupil support reserve
fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount
not to exceed $5,000,000.00 $6,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027
only for competitive grants to districts and intermediate
districts, and from the general pupil support reserve fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $600,000.00
$720,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 only for competitive grants to
nonpublic schools, that provide pupils in grades pre-K to 12 with
expanded opportunities to improve mathematics, science, computer
science, and technology skills by participating in robotics
competition programs hosted by program providers including, but not
limited to, FIRST (for inspiration and recognition of science and
technology) Robotics, including FIRST Lego League - Discover,
Explore, and Challenge, FIRST Tech challenge, and FIRST Robotics
competition, LTU Robofest, MATE (Marine Advanced Technical
Education), REC (Robotics Education Competition) Foundation, Square
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

353
One Education Network, VEX, and other providers approved by the
department. It is the intent of the legislature that the
appropriations under this section will be funded with state school
aid pupil support reserve fund money and general pupil support
reserve fund money through 2027-2028. All approved providers shall
make all programs available to students in this state regardless of
geographical location. Programs funded under this section are
intended to increase the number of pupils demonstrating proficiency
in science and mathematics on the state assessments and to increase
the number of pupils who are college- and career-ready upon high
school graduation. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department
shall make grant payments to districts, nonpublic schools, and
intermediate districts under this section on a schedule determined
by the department. The department shall set maximum grant awards
for each different level of programming and competition in a manner
that both maximizes the number of teams that will be able to
receive funds and expands the geographical distribution of teams.
Districts and intermediate districts that receive funds under this
section must provide relevant student participation information, as
determined by the department, to program and competition providers
described in this section. For a district or intermediate district
to count a program competition provider for purposes of payments
under this section, the program and competition providers must
agree to aggregate data received by districts and intermediate
districts and provide this information to the department in a form
and manner determined by the department.
(2) The department shall do all of the following for purposes
of this section:
(a) Both of the following by not later than 60 days after the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

354
state school aid appropriations bill for the current fiscal year is
enacted into law or October 1 of the current fiscal year, whichever
is later:
(i) Open applications for funding under this section to all
districts, nonpublic schools, and intermediate districts.
(ii) Publish a list of approved programs and vendors for
purposes of this section in a manner that is accessible to all
applicants. To obtain approval under this subparagraph, a program
or vendor must submit to the department registration information,
including any fees; pledge that it will post this information on
its website; and, by not later than January 1 of the current fiscal
year, submit this information to the department for publication on
the department's website.
(b) By not later than 60 days after applications are opened as
described in subdivision (a), close applications under this
section.
(c) By not later than 60 days after applications are closed as
described in subdivision (b), make all determinations concerning
funding under this section.
(d) By not later than July 1 of the current fiscal year,
publish a document listing the requirements for becoming an
approved program or vendor under subdivision (a).
(3) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, if
funding under this section is insufficient to fulfill all funding
requests by qualified applicants under this section, the department
shall prorate the total funding allocated under this section
equally among all qualified applicants. However, for funding under
this section toward grants under subsection (5)(b), in its
proration under this subsection, the department shall ensure that
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

355
each district is paid in an amount equal to the percentage the
department would have paid the district in grant funding under
subsection (5)(b), but for proration under this subsection, with no
district receiving a grant under subsection (5)(b) in an amount
that is greater than the district's total accrued costs under
subsection (5)(b).
(4) A district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district
applying for a grant under this section must submit an application
in a form and manner prescribed by the department. To be eligible
for a grant, a district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district
must demonstrate in its application that the district, nonpublic
school, or intermediate district has established a partnership for
the purposes of the robotics program with at least 1 sponsor,
business entity, higher education institution, technical school, or
individual, must submit a budget, and must provide a local in-kind
or cash match from other private or local funds of at least 25% of
the cost of the robotics program award.
(5) The department shall distribute the grant funding under
this section for the following purposes:
(a) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate
districts to pay for stipends not to exceed $1,500.00 per building
for coaching.
(b) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate
districts for event registrations, materials, travel costs, and
other expenses associated with the preparation for and attendance
at robotics events and competitions.
(c) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate
districts for awards to teams that advance to the next levels of
competition as determined by the department. The department shall
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

356
determine an equal amount per team for those teams that advance.
(6) A nonpublic school that receives a grant under this
section may use the funds for either robotics or Science Olympiad
programs.
(7) To be eligible to receive funds under this section, a
nonpublic school must be a nonpublic school registered with the
department and must meet all applicable state reporting
requirements for nonpublic schools.
(8) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, a
district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district must do all of
the following:
(a) If the district, nonpublic school, or intermediate
district is requesting funding for more than 1 team for a building,
meet the minimum requirements for team size as determined by the
approved program provider.
(b) Participate in at least the minimum number of competitions
as determined by the approved program provider.
(c) Participate in at least 1 in-person competition.
(9) For purposes of this section, an approved program or
vendor under this section that provides a program under this
section shall not work with the department to set prices or
policies for the program.
(10) As used in this section, "current fiscal year" means the
fiscal year for which an allocation is made under this section.
Sec. 99o. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $10,000,000.00 for 2026-2027 only for grants to districts
and intermediate districts for school-based driver's training
programs.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

357
(2) Grants under this section must be used to pay for the
costs of implementing a driver's training program. Costs may
include, but are not limited to, salaries and benefits for staff,
vehicle purchases or leases, insurance, materials and equipment,
and any other costs necessary to run a program.
(3) To receive funding under this section, districts and
intermediate districts must apply in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. An applicant shall certify that the applicant
will run the program using district or intermediate district
employees and will not outsource any programming to an outside
third party.
(4) The maximum grant amount for an applicant is $500,000.00.
The department shall prioritize applicants that received a grant
for the same purpose in a previous year, including awards under
this section, former section 99ii, and former section 99jj, as long
as the applicant continues the driver's training program for
another year. Afterwards, the department shall prioritize awards on
a first-come, first-served basis. No district or intermediate
district may receive more than 1 grant in a single fiscal year.
(5) The funds allocated under this section for 2026-2027 are a
work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027
are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project
is to continue support for district- and intermediate-district-run
driver's training programs. The estimated completion date of the
work project is September 30, 2031.
(6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 99s. (1) From state school aid fund money appropriated
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

358
under section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to
exceed $8,000,000.00 for Michigan science, technology, engineering,
and mathematics programs. Programs funded under this section are
intended to increase the number of pupils demonstrating proficiency
in science and mathematics on the state assessments, to increase
the number of pupils who are college- and career-ready upon high
school graduation, and to promote certificate and degree attainment
in STEM fields. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall
make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
(2) The MiSTEM council annually shall review and make
recommendations to the governor, the legislature, and the
department concerning changes to the statewide strategy adopted by
the council for delivering STEM education-related opportunities to
pupils. The MiSTEM council shall use funds received under this
section to ensure that the MiSTEM council's members or their
designees are trained in a third-party evaluation system such as
the Change the Equation STEMworks program for the purpose of rating
STEM programs.
(3) The MiSTEM council shall make specific funding
recommendations for the funds allocated under subsection (4) by
December 15 of each fiscal year. Each specific funding
recommendation must be for a program or demonstration grant
approved by the MiSTEM council. All of the following apply:
(a) To be eligible for MiSTEM council approval as described in
this subsection, a program must satisfy all of the following:
(i) Align with this state's academic standards.
(ii) Have STEMworks or other third-party certification.
(iii) Provide project-based experiential learning, student
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

359
programming, or educator professional learning experiences.
(iv) Focus predominantly on classroom-based STEM experiences or
professional learning experiences.
(b) The MiSTEM council shall approve programs that represent
all network regions and include a diverse array of options for
students and educators.
(c) To be eligible for MiSTEM council approval as described in
this subsection, a demonstration grant must satisfy all of the
following:
(i) Align with this state's academic standards.
(ii) In collaboration with the department, scale project,
problem, or place-based learning in a building or district in
support of the statewide STEM strategy as recommended by the MiSTEM
council.
(d) The MiSTEM council is encouraged to work with the MiSTEM
network to develop locally and regionally developed programs,
demonstration grants, and professional learning experiences for the
programs on the list of approved programs. At the direction of the
MiSTEM council, funds can be used to evaluate and market regions,
programs, and demonstration grants.
(e) If the MiSTEM council is unable to make specific funding
recommendations by December 15 of a fiscal year, the department
shall award and distribute the funds allocated under subsection (4)
on a competitive grant basis that at least follows the statewide
STEM strategy plan and rating system recommended by the MiSTEM
council. Each grant must provide STEM education-related
opportunities for pupils.
(4) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

360
exceed $3,800,000.00 for the purpose of funding programs or
demonstration grants under this section for 2026-2027 as
recommended by the MiSTEM council.
(5) From the state school aid fund money allocated under
subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$4,200,000.00 for 2026-2027 to support the activities and programs
of the MiSTEM network regions. From the funds allocated under this
subsection, the department shall award the fiscal agent for each
MiSTEM network region $220,000.00 for the base operations of each
region. The department shall distribute the remaining funds to each
fiscal agent in an equal amount per pupil, based on the number of K
to 12 pupils enrolled in districts within each region in the
immediately preceding fiscal year.
(6) A MiSTEM network region shall do all of the following:
(a) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory
council that is located in the MiSTEM region and the department to
develop a regional strategic plan for STEM education that creates a
robust regional STEM culture, that empowers STEM teachers, that
integrates business and education into the STEM network, and that
ensures high-quality STEM experiences for pupils. At a minimum, a
regional STEM strategic plan described in this subdivision should
do all of the following in collaboration with the department:
(i) Identify regional employer need for STEM.
(ii) Identify processes for regional employers and educators to
create guided pathways for STEM careers that include internships or
externships, apprenticeships, and other experiential engagements
for pupils.
(iii) Identify educator professional learning opportunities,
including internships or externships and apprenticeships, that
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

361
integrate this state's science standards into high-quality STEM
experiences that engage pupils.
(b) Facilitate regional STEM events such as educator and
employer networking and STEM career fairs to raise STEM awareness.
(c) Contribute to the MiSTEM website and engage in other
MiSTEM network functions to further the mission of STEM in this
state in coordination with the MiSTEM council and the department of
labor and economic opportunity.
(d) Facilitate application and implementation of state and
federal funds under this subsection and any other grants or funds
for the MiSTEM network region.
(e) Work with districts to provide STEM programming and
professional learning.
(f) Coordinate recurring discussions and work with the career
and educational advisory council to ensure that feedback and best
practices are being shared, including funding, program,
professional learning opportunities, and regional strategic plans.
(g) In collaboration with the department, deploy marketing and
outreach efforts to publish the availability of STEM learning
opportunities.
(7) To receive funds under this section, a grant recipient
must allow access for the department or the department's designee
to audit all records related to the program for which the grant
recipient received those funds. The grant recipient shall reimburse
the state for all disallowances found in the audit.
(8) To receive funds under this section, a grant recipient
must provide at least a 10% local match from local public or
private resources for the funds received under this subsection.
(9) By not later than July 1 of each fiscal year for which
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

362
funding is allocated under this section, grant recipients shall
report to the executive director of the MiSTEM network in a form
and manner prescribed by the executive director on performance
measures developed by the MiSTEM network regions and approved by
the executive director. The performance measures must be designed
to ensure that the activities of the MiSTEM network are improving
student academic outcomes. The report described in this subsection
must be published on a publicly accessible website.
(10) The MiSTEM network may receive funds from private
sources. If the MiSTEM network receives funds from private sources,
the MiSTEM network shall expend those funds in alignment with the
statewide STEM strategy.
(11) Not more than 5% of funds awarded under this section may
be retained by a fiscal agent.
(12) As used in this section:
(a) "Career and educational advisory council" means an
advisory council to the local workforce development boards located
in a prosperity region consisting of educational, employer, labor,
and parent representatives.
(b) "Department" means the department of labor and economic
opportunity.
(c) "MiSTEM council" means the Michigan Science, Technology,
Engineering, and Mathematics Education Advisory Council created as
an advisory body within the department of labor and economic
opportunity by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-3, MCL
125.1998.
(d) "STEM" means science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics delivered in an integrated fashion using cross-
disciplinary learning experiences that can include language arts,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

363
performing and fine arts, and career and technical education.
Sec. 101. (1) To be eligible to receive state aid under this
article, not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil
membership count day and not later than the fifth Wednesday after
the supplemental count day, each district superintendent shall
submit and certify to the center and the intermediate
superintendent, in the form and manner prescribed by the center,
the number of pupils enrolled and in regular daily attendance,
including identification of tuition-paying pupils, in the district
as of the pupil membership count day and as of the supplemental
count day, as applicable, for the current school year. In addition,
a district maintaining school during the entire year shall submit
and certify to the center and the intermediate superintendent, in
the form and manner prescribed by the center, the number of pupils
enrolled and in regular daily attendance in the district for the
current school year pursuant to rules promulgated by the
superintendent. Not later than the sixth Wednesday after the pupil
membership count day and not later than the sixth Wednesday after
the supplemental count day, the district shall resolve any pupil
membership conflicts with another district, correct any data
issues, and recertify the data in a form and manner prescribed by
the center and file the certified data with the intermediate
superintendent. If a district fails to submit and certify the
attendance data, as required under this subsection, the center
shall notify the department and the department shall withhold state
aid due to be distributed under this article from the defaulting
district immediately, beginning with the next payment after the
failure and continuing with each payment until the district
complies with this subsection. If a district does not comply with
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

364
this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the district
forfeits the amount withheld. A person who willfully falsifies a
figure or statement in the certified and sworn copy of enrollment
is subject to penalty as prescribed by section 161.
(2) To be eligible to receive state aid under this article,
not later than the twenty-fourth Wednesday after the pupil
membership count day and not later than the twenty-fourth Wednesday
after the supplemental count day, an intermediate district shall
submit to the center, in a form and manner prescribed by the
center, the audited enrollment and attendance data as described in
subsection (1) for the pupils of its constituent districts and of
the intermediate district. If an intermediate district fails to
submit the audited data as required under this subsection, the
department shall withhold state aid due to be distributed under
this article from the defaulting intermediate district immediately,
beginning with the next payment after the failure and continuing
with each payment until the intermediate district complies with
this subsection. If an intermediate district does not comply with
this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the intermediate
district forfeits the amount withheld.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (11) and (12)
all of the following apply to the provision of pupil instruction:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each
district shall provide at least 1,098 hours and 180 days of pupil
instruction. If a collective bargaining agreement that provides a
complete school calendar was in effect for employees of a district
as of June 24, 2014, and if that school calendar is not in
compliance with this subdivision, then this subdivision does not
apply to that district until after the expiration of that
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

365
collective bargaining agreement. A district may apply for a waiver
under subsection (9) or subdivision (h) from the requirements of
this subdivision.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a district
failing to comply with the required minimum hours and days of pupil
instruction under this subsection forfeits from its total state aid
allocation an amount determined by applying a ratio of the number
of hours or days the district was in noncompliance in relation to
the required minimum number of hours and days under this
subsection. Not later than the first business day in August, the
board of each district shall either certify to the department that
the district was in full compliance with this section regarding the
number of hours and days of pupil instruction in the previous
school year, or report to the department, in a form and manner
prescribed by the center, each instance of noncompliance. If the
district did not provide at least the required minimum number of
hours and days of pupil instruction under this subsection, the
department shall make the deduction of state aid in the following
fiscal year from the first payment of state school aid. A district
is not subject to forfeiture of funds under this subsection for a
fiscal year in which a forfeiture was already imposed under
subsection (6).
(c) Hours or days lost because of strikes or teachers'
conferences are not counted as hours or days of pupil instruction.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (e) and (f),
this subsection, if a district does not have at least 75% of the
district's membership in attendance on any day of pupil
instruction, the department shall pay the district state aid in
that proportion of 1/180 that the actual percent of attendance
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

366
bears to 75%.
(e) If a district adds 1 or more days of pupil instruction to
the end of its instructional calendar for a school year to comply
with subdivision (a) because the district otherwise would fail to
provide the required minimum number of days of pupil instruction
even after the operation of subsection (4) due to conditions not
within the control of school authorities, then subdivision (d) does
not apply for any day of pupil instruction that is added to the end
of the instructional calendar. Instead, for any of those days, if
the district does not have at least 60% of the district's
membership in attendance on that day, the department shall pay the
district state aid in that proportion of 1/180 that the actual
percentage of attendance bears to 60%. For any day of pupil
instruction added to the instructional calendar as described in
this subdivision, the district shall report to the department the
percentage of the district's membership that is in attendance, in
the form and manner prescribed by the department.
(f) At the request of a district that operates a department-
approved alternative education program and that does not provide
instruction for pupils in all of grades K to 12, the superintendent
shall grant a waiver from the requirements of subdivision (d). The
waiver must provide that an eligible district is subject to the
proration provisions of subdivision (d) only if the district does
not have at least 50% of the district's membership in attendance on
any day of pupil instruction. In order to be eligible for this
waiver, a district must maintain records to substantiate its
compliance with the following requirements:
(i) The district offers the minimum hours of pupil instruction
as required under this section.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

367
(ii) For each enrolled pupil, the district uses appropriate
academic assessments to develop an individual education plan that
leads to a high school diploma.
(iii) The district tests each pupil to determine academic
progress at regular intervals and records the results of those
tests in that pupil's individual education plan.
(g) All of the following apply to a waiver granted under
subdivision (f):
(i) If the waiver is for a blended model of delivery, a waiver
that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent
fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the
superintendent.
(ii) If the waiver is for a 100% online model of delivery and
the educational program for which the waiver is granted makes
educational services available to pupils for a minimum of at least
1,098 hours during a school year and ensures that each pupil
participates in the educational program for at least 1,098 hours
during a school year, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012
fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it
is revoked by the superintendent.
(iii) A waiver that is not a waiver described in subparagraph
(i) or (ii) is valid for 3 fiscal years, unless it is revoked by the
superintendent, and must be renewed at the end of the 3-year period
to remain in effect.
(h) For the 2024-2025 school year only, a district does not
need to meet the minimum number of hours and days of pupil
instruction requirement under subdivision (a) if that district
meets all of the following requirements:
(i) The district is located wholly or partially in a county
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

368
that is covered by a state of emergency declared by the governor.
(ii) A majority of the district board votes to exempt the
district from the minimum number of hours and days of pupil
instruction required under subdivision (a).
(iii) The vote by the district board under subparagraph (ii)
exempts the district from providing only the hours and days of
pupil instruction actually missed due to the state of emergency.
(iv) The vote by the district board under subparagraph (ii)
exempts the district from not more than 15 days of pupil
instruction required under subdivision (a). The amount that may be
exempted under this subdivision is in addition to any days counted
as pupil instruction under subsection (4).
(h) Subdivision (d) does not apply to a district-operated
special education program approved by the department if the
district-operated special education program's instructional
calendar exceeds 180 days of pupil instruction. For any day of
instruction provided as part of a district-operated special
education program described in this subdivision, the district-
operated special education program is exempt from the attendance
threshold established under subdivision (d), provided that the
district-operated special education program offers the minimum
hours of pupil instruction required under this section and
maintains documentation of the program's approved instructional
calendar.
(i) At the request of a district with fewer than 100 pupils in
membership as reported in the most recent fall pupil count, the
superintendent shall grant a waiver from the requirements of
subdivision (d) if the district demonstrates that the absence of a
single household may materially reduce the district's daily
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

369
attendance percentage below the threshold established in
subdivision (d). A waiver granted under this subdivision must
provide that the district is subject to the proration provisions of
subdivision (d) only if the district does not have at least 60% of
the district's membership in attendance on any day of pupil
instruction. The district shall maintain records necessary to
substantiate the district's eligibility for a waiver granted under
this subdivision.
(j) (i) The superintendent shall promulgate rules for the
implementation of this subsection.
(4) All of the following apply to the counting of days and
hours of pupil instruction under this section:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the first
6 days or the equivalent number of hours for which pupil
instruction is not provided because of conditions not within the
control of school authorities, such as severe storms, fires,
epidemics, utility power unavailability, water or sewer failure, or
health conditions as defined by the city, county, or state health
authorities, are counted as hours and days of pupil instruction.
(b) With the approval of the superintendent of public
instruction, the department shall count as hours and days of pupil
instruction for a fiscal year not more than 3 additional days or
the equivalent number of additional hours for which pupil
instruction is not provided in a district due to unusual and
extenuating occurrences resulting from conditions not within the
control of school authorities such as those conditions described in
this subsection.
(c) A district that counts hours or days of professional
development for teachers as hours or days of pupil instruction, as
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

370
provided under subsection (10), is eligible to have additional
hours or days counted as hours and days of pupil instruction as
provided under subdivision (b) to the same extent as a district
that does not count hours or days of professional development for
teachers as hours or days of pupil instruction.
(d) In deciding whether or not to approve the counting of
additional hours or days of pupil instruction under subdivision (b)
for a district, the superintendent of public instruction shall not
take into account whether or not the district counts hours or days
of professional development for teachers as hours or days of pupil
instruction, as provided under subsection (10).
(e) Subsequent hours or days beyond those described in
subdivisions (a) and (b) are not counted as hours or days of pupil
instruction.
(5) A district does not forfeit part of its state aid
appropriation because it adopts or has in existence an alternative
scheduling program for pupils in kindergarten if the program
provides at least the number of hours required under subsection (3)
for a full-time equated membership for a pupil in kindergarten as
provided under section 6(4).
(6) In addition to any other penalty or forfeiture under this
section, if at any time the department determines that 1 or more of
the following have occurred in a district, the district forfeits in
the current fiscal year beginning in the next payment to be
calculated by the department a proportion of the funds due to the
district under this article that is equal to the proportion below
the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction
under subsection (3), as specified in the following:
(a) The district fails to operate its schools for at least the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

371
required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction
under subsection (3) in a school year, including hours and days
counted under subsection (4).
(b) The board of the district takes formal action not to
operate its schools for at least the required minimum number of
hours and days of pupil instruction under subsection (3) in a
school year, including hours and days counted under subsection (4).
(7) In providing the minimum number of hours and days of pupil
instruction required under subsection (3), a district shall use the
following guidelines, and a district shall maintain records to
substantiate its compliance with the following guidelines:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a pupil
must be scheduled for at least the required minimum number of hours
of instruction, excluding study halls, or at least the sum of 90
hours plus the required minimum number of hours of instruction,
including up to 2 study halls.
(b) The time a pupil is assigned to any tutorial activity in a
block schedule may be considered instructional time, unless that
time is determined in an audit to be a study hall period.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a pupil
in grades 9 to 12 for whom a reduced schedule is determined to be
in the individual pupil's best educational interest, or a pupil in
grades 6 to 8 for whom a reduced schedule is determined to be in
the individual pupil's best educational interest due to the pupil's
participation in an advanced curriculum, must be scheduled for a
number of hours equal to at least 80% of the required minimum
number of hours of pupil instruction to be considered a full-time
equivalent pupil. A pupil in grades 6 to 12 who is scheduled in a
4-block schedule may receive a reduced schedule under this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

372
subsection if the pupil is scheduled for a number of hours equal to
at least 75% of the required minimum number of hours of pupil
instruction to be considered a full-time equivalent pupil.
(d) For a pupil in grades 9 to 12 enrolled in a cooperative
education program, or for a special education pupil, in determining
full-time equated membership for that pupil, the pupil is not
considered less than a full-time equated pupil solely because of
the effect of the pupil's enrollment in the cooperative education
program or special education program, including necessary travel
time, on the number of class hours provided by the district to the
pupil.
(e) In grades 7 through 12, instructional time that is part of
a Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC) program is
considered to be pupil instruction time regardless of whether the
instructor is a certificated teacher if all of the following are
met:
(i) The instructor has met all of the requirements established
by the United States Department of Defense and the applicable
branch of the armed services for serving as an instructor in the
Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps program.
(ii) The board of the district or intermediate district
employing or assigning the instructor complies with the
requirements of sections 1230 and 1230a of the revised school code,
MCL 380.1230 and 380.1230a, with respect to the instructor to the
same extent as if employing the instructor as a regular classroom
teacher.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (11) and (12),
the department shall apply the guidelines under subsection (7) in
calculating the full-time equivalency of pupils.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

373
(9) Upon application by the district for a particular fiscal
year, the superintendent shall waive for a district the minimum
number of hours and days of pupil instruction requirement of
subsection (3) for a department-approved alternative education
program or another innovative program approved by the department,
including a 4-day school week. If a district applies for and
receives a waiver under this subsection and complies with the terms
of the waiver, the district is not subject to forfeiture under this
section for the specific program covered by the waiver. If the
district does not comply with the terms of the waiver, the amount
of the forfeiture is calculated based upon a comparison of the
number of hours and days of pupil instruction actually provided to
the minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction required
under subsection (3). A district shall report pupils enrolled in a
department-approved alternative education program under this
subsection to the center in a form and manner determined by the
center. All of the following apply to a waiver granted under this
subsection:
(a) If the waiver is for a blended model of delivery, a waiver
that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent
fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the
superintendent.
(b) If the waiver is for a 100% online model of delivery and
the educational program for which the waiver is granted makes
educational services available to pupils for a minimum of at least
1,098 hours during a school year and ensures that each pupil is on
track for course completion at proficiency level, a waiver that is
granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year
remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

374
(c) A waiver that is not a waiver described in subdivision (a)
or (b) is valid for 3 fiscal years, unless it is revoked by the
superintendent, and must be renewed at the end of the 3-year period
to remain in effect.
(10) A district may count up to 38 hours of professional
development for teachers as hours of pupil instruction. All of the
following apply to the counting of professional development as
pupil instruction under this subsection:
(a) If the professional development exceeds 5 hours in a
single day, that day may be counted as a day of pupil instruction.
(b) At least 8 hours of the professional development counted
as hours of pupil instruction under this subsection must be
recommended by a districtwide professional development advisory
committee appointed by the district board. The advisory committee
must be composed of teachers employed by the district who represent
a variety of grades and subject matter specializations, including
special education; nonteaching staff; parents; and administrators.
The majority membership of the committee must be composed of
teaching staff.
(c) Professional development provided online is allowable and
encouraged, as long as the instruction has been approved by the
district. The department shall issue a list of approved online
professional development providers that must include the Michigan
Virtual School.
(d) Professional development may only be counted as hours of
pupil instruction under this subsection for the pupils of those
teachers scheduled to participate in the professional development.
(e) The professional development must meet all of the
following to be counted as pupil instruction under this subsection:
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

375
(i) Be aligned to the school or district improvement plan for
the school or district in which the professional development is
being provided.
(ii) Be linked to 1 or more criteria in the evaluation tool
developed or adopted by the district or intermediate district under
section 1249 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1249.
(iii) Has been approved by the department as counting for state
continuing education clock hours. The number of hours of
professional development counted as hours of pupil instruction
under this subsection may not exceed the number of state continuing
education clock hours for which the professional development was
approved.
(iv) Not more than a combined total of 10 hours of the
professional development takes place before the first scheduled day
of school for the school year ending in the fiscal year and after
the last scheduled day of school for that school year.
(v) Not more than 10 hours of the professional development
takes place in a single month.
(vi) At least 75% of teachers scheduled to participate in the
professional development are in attendance.
(11) Subsections (3) and (8) do not apply to a school of
excellence that is a cyber school, as that term is defined in
section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, and is in
compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL
380.553a. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subsection is subject to
section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the
immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective
July 1, 2021.
(12) Subsections (3) and (8) do not apply to eligible pupils
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

376
enrolled in a dropout recovery program that meets the requirements
of section 23a. As used in this subsection, "eligible pupil" means
that term as defined in section 23a.
(13) At least every 2 years the superintendent shall review
the waiver standards set forth in the pupil accounting and auditing
manuals to ensure that the waiver standards and waiver process
continue to be appropriate and responsive to changing trends in
online learning. The superintendent shall solicit and consider
input from stakeholders as part of this review.
Sec. 104. (1) To receive state aid under this article, a
district shall comply with sections 1249, 1278a, 1278b, 1279g, and
1280b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1249, 380.1278a,
380.1278b, 380.1279g, and 380.1280b, and 1970 PA 38, MCL 388.1081
to 388.1086. Subject to subsection (2), from the state school aid
fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-
2025 $39,509,400.00, and there is allocated for 2025-2026
$37,509,400.00, $40,000,000.00, and there is allocated for 2026-
2027 $44,500,000.00, for payments on behalf of districts for costs
associated with complying with those provisions of law. In
addition, from the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there
is allocated for 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 an amount estimated at
$8,000,000.00 funded from DED-OESE, title VI, state assessment
funds, and from DED-OSERS, part B of the individuals with
disabilities education act, 20 USC 1411 to 1419, plus any carryover
federal funds from previous year appropriations, for the purposes
of complying with the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-
95.
(2) The results of each test administered as part of the
Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP), including
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

377
tests administered to high school students, must include an item
analysis that lists all items that are counted for individual pupil
scores and the percentage of pupils choosing each possible
response. The department shall work with the center to identify the
number of students enrolled at the time assessments are given by
each district. In calculating the percentage of pupils assessed for
a district's scorecard, the department shall use only the number of
pupils enrolled in the district at the time the district
administers the assessments and shall exclude pupils who enroll in
the district after the district administers the assessments.
(3) The department shall distribute federal funds allocated
under this section in accordance with federal law and with
flexibility provisions outlined in Public Law 107-116, and in the
education flexibility partnership act of 1999, Public Law 106-25.
(4) The department may recommend, but may not require,
districts to allow pupils to use an external keyboard with tablet
devices for online M-STEP testing, including, but not limited to,
open-ended test items such as constructed response or equation
builder items.
(5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments on behalf of districts, intermediate districts, and other
eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by
the department.
(6) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated
$500,000.00 for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 for the
operation of an online reporting tool to provide student-level
assessment data in a secure environment to educators, parents, and
pupils immediately after assessments are scored. The department and
the center shall ensure that any data collected by the online
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

378
reporting tool do not provide individually identifiable student
data to the federal government.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "DED" means the United States Department of Education.
(b) "DED-OESE" means the DED Office of Elementary and
Secondary Education.
(c) "DED-OSERS" means the DED Office of Special Education and
Rehabilitative Services.
Sec. 104h. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026
2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $11,500,000.00 to districts to
implement benchmark assessments during the 2025-2026 2026-2027
school year. All of the following apply to the benchmark assessment
system described in this subsection:
(a) The system must provide for all of the following:
(i) That, within the first 9 weeks of the 2025-2026 school
year, the district shall administer 1 or more benchmark assessments
provided by a provider approved under subsection (6), (5),
benchmark assessments described in subdivision (b), or local
benchmark assessments, or any combination thereof, to all pupils in
grades K to 8 to measure proficiency in reading and mathematics.
(ii) That, in addition to the benchmark assessment or benchmark
assessments administered under subparagraph (i), by not later than
the last day of the 2025-2026 school year, the district shall
administer the benchmark assessment or assessments administered
under subparagraph (i) to all pupils in grades K to 8 to measure
proficiency in reading and mathematics. To support fall to spring
growth calculations, the same benchmark assessment that is
administered in the fall must be administered in the spring.last
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

379
marking period of the school year.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a district
may administer 1 or more of the following benchmark assessments
toward meeting the requirements under subdivision (a):
(i) A benchmark assessment in reading for students in grades K
to 9 that contains progress monitoring tools and enhanced
diagnostic assessments.
(ii) A benchmark assessment in math for students in grades K to
8 that contains progress monitoring tools.
(c) The system must provide that, to the extent practicable,
if a district administers a benchmark assessment or benchmark
assessments under this section, the district shall administer the
same benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments provided by a
provider approved under subsection (6), (5), benchmark assessment
or benchmark assessments described in subdivision (b), or local
benchmark assessment or local benchmark assessments that it
administered to pupils in previous school years, as applicable.
(d) The system must provide that, if a district administers a
benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments under this section,
the district shall provide each pupil's data from the benchmark
assessment or benchmark assessments, as available, to the pupil's
parent or legal guardian within 30 days of administering the
benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments.
(e) The system must provide that, if a local benchmark
assessment or local benchmark assessments are administered under
subdivision (a), the district shall report to the department, in a
form and manner prescribed by the department, the local benchmark
assessment or local benchmark assessments that were administered
and how that assessment or those assessments measure changes,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

380
including any losses, as applicable, in learning, and the
district's plan for addressing any losses in learning.
(f) The system must provide that, by not later than 30 days
after a benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments are
administered under subdivision (a)(ii), or within a time frame
specified by the department, the district shall send benchmark
assessment data, including grade level, student demographics, and
mode of instruction, to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, from all benchmark assessments
administered in the 2025-2026 school year, excluding data from a
local benchmark assessment, as applicable. If available, the data
described in this subdivision must include information concerning
pupil growth from fall 2025 to spring 2026.
(2) To receive funding under this section, a district must do
all of the following:
(a) Apply for the funding in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.
(b) Administer 1 or more of the benchmark assessments
described in subsection (6), (5), excluding the benchmark
assessment described in subsection (4).
(c) Administer the same benchmark assessment or assessments in
both the fall and spring, as required under this section.
(d) Meet all reporting requirements pertaining to assessment
and mode-of-instruction data outlined to parents and legal
guardians as described in this section.
(3) Subject to subsection (2), the department shall pay an
equal amount per membership pupil in grades K to 8 in the district
to each district that applies for funding under this section.
(4) The department shall make 1 of the benchmark assessments
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

381
provided by a provider approved under subsection (6) (5) available
to districts at no cost to the districts for purposes of meeting
the requirements under this section. The benchmark assessment
described in this subsection must meet all of the following:
(a) Be aligned to the content standards of this state.
(b) Complement the this state's summative assessment system.
(c) Be internet-delivered and include a standards-based
assessment.
(d) Provide information on pupil achievement with regard to
learning content required in a given year or grade span.
(e) Provide timely feedback to pupils and teachers.
(f) Be nationally normed.
(g) Provide information to educators about student growth and
allow for multiple testing opportunities.
(5) By not later than November 15 of each year subsequent to a
year in which funding is appropriated under this section, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate
appropriations committees, the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on school aid, and the house and senate fiscal
agencies regarding the benchmark assessment data received under
this section, disaggregated by grade level and demographic subgroup
for each district. If information concerning pupil growth is
included in the data described in this subsection, it must be
incorporated in the report described in this subsection.
(h) Include a digital library of teaching resources that are
tied directly to the benchmark assessment and aligned to this
state's standards.
(5) (6) The department shall approve at least 4 but not more
than 6 providers of benchmark assessments for the purposes of this
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

382
section. The department shall inform districts of all of the
providers approved under this subsection in an equitable manner.
The benchmark assessments, with the exclusion of the benchmark
assessment described in subsection (4), provided by approved
providers under this subsection must meet all of the following:
(a) Be aligned to the content standards of this state.
(b) Complement the state's summative assessment system.
(c) Be internet-delivered and include a standards-based
remote, in-person, or both remote and in-person assessment using a
computer-adaptive model to target the instructional level of each
pupil.
(d) Provide information on pupil achievement with regard to
learning content required in a given year or grade span.
(e) Provide immediate feedback to pupils and teachers.
(f) Be nationally normed.
(g) Provide multiple measures of growth and provide for
multiple testing opportunities.
Sec. 107. (1) From the state school aid fund appropriation in
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$32,913,600.00 $42,525,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for adult
education programs authorized under this section. Except as
otherwise provided under subsections (14) and (15), funds allocated
under this section are restricted for adult education programs as
authorized under this section only. A recipient of funds under this
section shall not use those funds for any other purpose.
(2) To be eligible for funding under this section, an eligible
adult education provider shall employ certificated teachers and
qualified administrative staff and shall offer continuing education
opportunities for teachers to allow them to maintain certification.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

383
(3) To be eligible to be a participant funded under this
section, an individual must be enrolled in an adult basic education
program, an adult secondary education program, an adult English as
a second language program, a high school equivalency test
preparation program, or a high school completion program, that
meets the requirements of this section, and for which instruction
is provided, and the individual must be at least 18 years of age by
July 1 of the program year and the individual's graduating class
must have graduated.
(4) By April 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is
allocated under this section, the intermediate districts within a
prosperity region or subregion shall determine which intermediate
district will serve as the prosperity region's or subregion's
fiscal agent for the next fiscal year and shall notify the
department in a form and manner determined by the department. The
department shall approve or disapprove of the prosperity region's
or subregion's selected fiscal agent. From the funds allocated
under subsection (1), an amount as determined under this subsection
is allocated to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal
agent for adult education programs in each of the prosperity
regions or subregions identified by the department. An intermediate
district shall not use more than 5% of the funds allocated under
this subsection for administration costs for serving as the fiscal
agent. The allocation provided to each intermediate district
serving as a fiscal agent must be calculated as follows:
(a) Sixty percent of this portion of the funding must be
distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of
individuals between the ages of 18 and 24 that are not high school
graduates that resides in each of the prosperity regions or
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

384
subregions located within the intermediate district, as reported by
the most recent 5-year estimates from the American Community Survey
(ACS) from the United States Census Bureau.
(b) Thirty-five percent of this portion of the funding must be
distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of
individuals age 25 or older who are not high school graduates that
resides in each of the prosperity regions or subregions located
within the intermediate district, as reported by the most recent 5-
year estimates from the ACS from the United States Census Bureau.
(c) Five percent of this portion of the funding must be
distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of
individuals age 18 or older who lack basic English language
proficiency that resides in each of the prosperity regions or
subregions located within the intermediate district, as reported by
the most recent 5-year estimates from the ACS from the United
States Census Bureau.
(5) To be an eligible fiscal agent, an intermediate district
must agree to do the following in a form and manner determined by
the department:
(a) Distribute funds to adult education programs in a
prosperity region or subregion as described in this section.
(b) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory
council, which is an advisory council of the workforce development
boards located in the prosperity region or subregion, or its
successor, to develop a regional strategy that aligns adult
education programs and services into an efficient and effective
delivery system for adult education learners, with special
consideration for providing contextualized learning and career
pathways and addressing barriers to education and employment.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

385
(c) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory
council, which is an advisory council of the workforce development
boards located in the prosperity region or subregion, or its
successor, to create a local process and criteria that will
identify eligible adult education providers to receive funds
allocated under this section based on location, demand for
services, past performance, quality indicators as identified by the
department, and cost to provide instructional services. The fiscal
agent shall determine all local processes, criteria, and provider
determinations. However, the local processes, criteria, and
provider services must be approved by the department before funds
may be distributed to the fiscal agent.
(d) Provide oversight to its adult education providers
throughout the program year to ensure compliance with the
requirements of this section.
(e) Report adult education program and participant data and
information as prescribed by the department.
(6) An adult basic education program, an adult secondary
education program, or an adult English as a second language program
operated on a year-round or school year basis may be funded under
this section, subject to all of the following:
(a) The program enrolls adults who are determined by a
department-approved assessment, in a form and manner prescribed by
the department, to be below twelfth grade level in reading or
mathematics, or both, or to lack basic English proficiency.
(b) The program tests individuals for eligibility under
subdivision (a) before enrollment and upon completion of the
program in compliance with the state-approved assessment policy.
(c) A participant in an adult basic education program is
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

386
eligible for reimbursement until 1 of the following occurs:
(i) The participant's reading and mathematics proficiency are
assessed at or above the ninth grade level.
(ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive
assessments after having completed at least 450 hours of
instruction.
(d) A participant in an adult secondary education program is
eligible for reimbursement until 1 of the following occurs:
(i) The participant's reading and mathematics proficiency are
assessed above the twelfth grade level.
(ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive
assessments after having at least 450 hours of instruction.
(e) A funding recipient enrolling a participant in an English
as a second language program is eligible for funding according to
subsection (9) until the participant meets 1 of the following:
(i) The participant is assessed as having attained basic
English proficiency as determined by a department-approved
assessment.
(ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive
department-approved assessments after having completed at least 450
hours of instruction. The department shall provide information to a
funding recipient regarding appropriate assessment instruments for
this program.
(7) A high school equivalency test preparation program
operated on a year-round or school year basis may be funded under
this section, subject to all of the following:
(a) The program enrolls adults who do not have a high school
diploma or a high school equivalency certificate.
(b) The program administers a pre-test approved by the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

387
department before enrolling an individual to determine the
individual's literacy levels, administers a high school equivalency
practice test to determine the individual's potential for success
on the high school equivalency test, and administers a post-test
upon completion of the program in compliance with the state-
approved assessment policy.
(c) A funding recipient receives funding according to
subsection (9) for a participant, and a participant may be enrolled
in the program until 1 of the following occurs:
(i) The participant achieves a high school equivalency
certificate.
(ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive
department-approved assessments used to determine readiness to take
a high school equivalency test after having completed at least 450
hours of instruction.
(8) A high school completion program operated on a year-round
or school year basis may be funded under this section, subject to
all of the following:
(a) The program enrolls adults who do not have a high school
diploma.
(b) The program tests participants described in subdivision
(a) before enrollment and upon completion of the program in
compliance with the state-approved assessment policy.
(c) A funding recipient receives funding according to
subsection (9) for a participant in a course offered under this
subsection until 1 of the following occurs:
(i) The participant passes the course and earns a high school
diploma.
(ii) The participant fails to earn credit in 2 successive
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

388
semesters or terms in which the participant is enrolled after
having completed at least 900 hours of instruction.
(9) The department shall make payments to a funding recipient
under this section in accordance with all of the following:
(a) Statewide allocation criteria, including 3-year average
enrollments, census data, and local needs.
(b) Participant completion of the adult basic education
objectives by achieving an educational gain as determined by the
national reporting system levels; for achieving basic English
proficiency, as determined by the department; for achieving a high
school equivalency certificate or passage of 1 or more individual
high school equivalency tests; for attainment of a high school
diploma or passage of a course required for a participant to attain
a high school diploma; for enrollment in a postsecondary
institution; or for entry into or retention of employment, as
applicable.
(c) Participant completion of core indicators as identified in
the workforce innovation and opportunity act, Public Law 113-128.
(d) Allowable expenditures.
(10) An individual who is not eligible to be a participant
funded under this section may receive adult education services upon
the payment of tuition. In addition, an individual who is not
eligible to be served in a program under this section due to the
program limitations specified in subsection (6), (7), or (8) may
continue to receive adult education services in that program upon
the payment of tuition. The local or intermediate district
conducting the program shall determine the tuition amount.
(11) An individual who is an inmate in a state correctional
facility is not counted as a participant under this section.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

389
(12) A funding recipient shall not commingle money received
under this section or from another source for adult education
purposes with any other funds and shall establish a separate ledger
account for funds received under this section. This subsection does
not prohibit a district from using general funds of the district to
support an adult education or community education program.
(13) A funding recipient receiving funds under this section
may establish a sliding scale of tuition rates based upon a
participant's family income. A funding recipient may charge a
participant tuition to receive adult education services under this
section from that sliding scale of tuition rates on a uniform
basis. The amount of tuition charged per participant must not
exceed the actual operating cost per participant minus any funds
received under this section per participant. A funding recipient
may not charge a participant tuition under this section if the
participant's income is at or below 200% of the federal poverty
guidelines published by the United States Department of Health and
Human Services.
(14) To receive funds under this section, a funding recipient
shall furnish to the department, in a form and manner determined by
the department, all information needed to administer this program
and meet federal reporting requirements; shall allow the department
or the department's designee to review all records related to the
program for which it receives funds; and shall reimburse the state
for all disallowances found in the review, as determined by the
department. In addition, a funding recipient shall agree to pay to
a career and technical education program under section 61a the
amount of funding received under this section in the proportion of
career and technical education coursework used to satisfy adult
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

390
basic education programming, as billed to the funding recipient by
programs operating under section 61a.
(15) From the amount appropriated in subsection (1), an amount
not to exceed $4,000,000.00 is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to
approved adult education programs that connect adult education
participants with employers as provided under this subsection. The
department shall determine regional planning allocations under this
subsection to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent
for adult education programs in each of the prosperity regions or
subregions identified by the department in the same proportion as
funding calculated and allocated under subsection (4). Funds not
fully utilized within a region may be transferred to other regions
as appropriate. To be eligible for funding under this subsection, a
program must provide a collaboration linking adult education
programs within the county, state-approved career and technical
education programs, and local employers. To receive funding under
this subsection, an eligible program must satisfy all of the
following:
(a) Connect adult education participants directly with
employers by linking adult education, career and technical skills,
and workforce development.
(b) Require adult education staff to work with Michigan Works!
agency to identify a cohort of participants who are most prepared
to successfully enter the workforce. Except as otherwise provided
under this subdivision, participants identified under this
subsection must be dually enrolled in adult education programming
and in at least 1 state-approved technical course through a career
and technical education program. A program that links participants
identified under this subsection with adult education programming
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

391
and commercial driver license courses does not need to enroll the
participants in at least 1 state-approved technical course through
a career and technical education program to be considered an
eligible program under this subsection.
(c) Employ an individual staffed as an adult education
navigator who will serve as a caseworker for each participant
identified under subdivision (b). The navigator shall work with
adult education staff and potential employers to design an
educational program best suited to the personal and employment
needs of the participant and shall work with human service agencies
or other entities to address any barrier in the way of participant
access.
(16) By not later than December 1 of each year, a program
funded under subsection (15) shall provide a report to the senate
and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, to the senate
and house fiscal agencies, and to the state budget director
identifying the number of participants, graduation rates, and a
measure of transition to employment.
(17) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
participants under subsection (15) must be concurrently enrolled
and actively working toward obtaining a high school diploma or a
high school equivalency certificate. Concurrent enrollment is not
required under this subsection for a participant that was enrolled
in adult education during the same program year and obtained a high
school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate before
enrollment in an eligible career and technical skills program under
subsection (15). Up to 10% of adult education participants served
under subsection (15) may already have a high school diploma or a
high school equivalency certificate at the time of enrollment in an
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

392
eligible career and technical skills program under subsection (15)
and receive remediation services. It is intended that the cap
described in the immediately preceding sentence is continually
lowered on an annual basis until it eventually is 0%.
(18) The department shall approve at least 2 high school
equivalency tests and determine whether a high school equivalency
certificate meets the requisite standards for high school
equivalency in this state.
(19) As used in this section:
(a) "Career and educational advisory council" means an
advisory council to the local workforce development boards located
in a prosperity region consisting of educational, employer, labor,
and parent representatives.
(b) "Career pathway" means a combination of rigorous and high-
quality education, training, and other services that comply with
all of the following:
(i) Aligns with the skill needs of industries in the economy of
this state or in the regional economy involved.
(ii) Prepares an individual to be successful in any of a full
range of secondary or postsecondary education options, including
apprenticeships registered under the act of August 16, 1937,
commonly referred to as the national apprenticeship act, 29 USC 50
et seq.
(iii) Includes counseling to support an individual in achieving
the individual's education and career goals.
(iv) Includes, as appropriate, education offered concurrently
with and in the same context as workforce preparation activities
and training for a specific occupation or occupational cluster.
(v) Organizes education, training, and other services to meet
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

393
the particular needs of an individual in a manner that accelerates
the educational and career advancement of the individual to the
extent practicable.
(vi) Enables an individual to attain a secondary school diploma
or its recognized equivalent, and at least 1 recognized
postsecondary credential.
(vii) Helps an individual enter or advance within a specific
occupation or occupational cluster.
(c) "Department" means the department of labor and economic
opportunity.
(d) "Eligible adult education provider" means a district,
intermediate district, a consortium of districts, a consortium of
intermediate districts, or a consortium of districts and
intermediate districts that is identified as part of the local
process described in subsection (5)(c) and approved by the
department.
Sec. 147. (1) The allocation for 2025-2026 2026-2027 for the
public school employees' retirement system pursuant to the public
school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301
to 38.1437, is made using the individual projected benefit entry
age normal cost method of valuation and risk assumptions adopted by
the public school employees retirement board and the department of
technology, management, and budget.
(2) The annual level percentage of payroll contribution rates
for the 2025-2026 2026-2027 fiscal year, as determined by the
retirement system, are estimated as follows:
(a) For public school employees who first worked for a public
school reporting unit before July 1, 2010 and who are enrolled in
the health premium subsidy, the annual level percentage of payroll
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

394
contribution rate is estimated at 44.93% 41.02% with 29.91% 27.51%
paid directly by the employer.
(b) For public school employees who first worked for a public
school reporting unit on or after July 1, 2010 and who are enrolled
in the health premium subsidy, the annual level percentage of
payroll contribution rate is estimated at 40.19% 36.28% with 25.17%
22.77% paid directly by the employer.
(c) For public school employees who first worked for a public
school reporting unit on or after July 1, 2010 and who participate
in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of
payroll contribution rate is estimated at 36.36% 34.85% with 21.34%
paid directly by the employer.
(d) For public school employees who first worked for a public
school reporting unit on or after September 4, 2012, who elect
defined contribution, and who participate in the personal
healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll
contribution rate is estimated at 30.23% 28.72% with 15.21% paid
directly by the employer.
(e) For public school employees who first worked for a public
school reporting unit before July 1, 2010, who elect defined
contribution, and who are enrolled in the health premium subsidy,
the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is
estimated at 34.06% 30.15% with 19.04% 16.64% paid directly by the
employer.
(f) For public school employees who first worked for a public
school reporting unit before July 1, 2010, who elect defined
contribution, and who participate in the personal healthcare fund,
the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is
estimated at 30.23% 28.72% with 15.21% paid directly by the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

395
employer.
(g) For public school employees who first worked for a public
school reporting unit before July 1, 2010 and who participate in
the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of
payroll contribution rate is estimated at 41.10% 39.59% with 26.08%
paid directly by the employer.
(h) For public school employees who first worked for a public
school reporting unit after January 31, 2018 and who elect to
become members of the MPSERS plan, the annual level percentage of
payroll contribution rate is estimated at 36.43% 34.92% with 21.41%
paid directly by the employer.
(3) In addition to the employer payments described in
subsection (2), the employer shall pay the applicable contributions
to the Tier 2 plan, as determined by the public school employees
retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437.
(4) The contribution rates in subsection (2) reflect an
amortization period of 13 12 years for 2024-2025. 2026-2027. The
public school employees' retirement system board shall notify each
district and intermediate district by February 28 of each fiscal
year of the estimated contribution rate for the next fiscal year.
Sec. 147a. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 an
amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 for payments to participating
districts. A participating district that receives money under this
subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of
offsetting a portion of the retirement contributions owed by the
district for the fiscal year in which it is received. The amount
allocated to each participating district under this subsection is
based on each participating district's percentage of the total
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

396
statewide payroll for all participating districts for the
immediately preceding fiscal year. As used in this subsection,
"participating district" means a district that is a reporting unit
of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under
the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300,
MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan
public school employees' retirement system for the applicable
fiscal year.
(2) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from
From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11,
there is allocated an amount not to exceed $414,900,000.00 for
2024-2025 and an amount not to exceed $336,200,000.00
$361,100,000.00 for 2025-2026 and an amount not to exceed
$307,400,000.00 for 2026-2027 for payments to participating
districts and intermediate districts and from the general fund
money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount
not to exceed $100,000.00 for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 and 2026-2027
for payments to participating district libraries. The amount
allocated to each participating entity under this subsection is
based on each participating entity's reported quarterly payroll for
members that became tier 1 before February 1, 2018 for the current
fiscal year. A participating entity that receives money under this
subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of
offsetting a portion of the normal cost contribution rate. As used
in this subsection:section:
(a) "District library" means a district library established
under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL
397.171 to 397.196.
(b) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

397
district, or district library that is a reporting unit of the
Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the
public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL
38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan
public school employees' retirement system for the applicable
fiscal year.
(3) In addition to the allocations under subsections (1) and
(2), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section
11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed
$11,939,000.00 for payments to participating intermediate districts
and participating district libraries. A participating intermediate
district or participating district library shall use that money
solely for the purpose of offsetting a portion of the retirement
contributions owed by the participating intermediate district or
participating district library for the fiscal year in which it is
received. The amount allocated to each participating intermediate
district or participating district library under this subsection is
calculated as follows:
(a) For each participating intermediate district,
$11,912,000.00 multiplied by each participating intermediate
district's percentage of the total statewide payroll for all
participating intermediate districts for the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
(b) For each participating district library, $27,000.00
multiplied by each participating district library's percentage of
the total statewide payroll for all participating district
libraries for the immediately preceding fiscal year.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(i) "Participating district library" means a district library
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

398
that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees'
retirement system under the public school employees retirement act
of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports
employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement
system for the applicable fiscal year.
(ii) "Participating intermediate district" means an
intermediate district that is a reporting unit of the Michigan
public school employees' retirement system under the public school
employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to
38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school
employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year.
(4) In addition to the allocations under subsections (1), (2),
and (3), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 an amount not to
exceed $598,000,000.00 for payments to participating entities. The
amount allocated to each participating entity under this subsection
is based on each participating entity's percentage of the total
statewide payroll for all participating entities for the
immediately preceding fiscal year. The amount allocated in this
subsection represents an amount to effectively reduce each
participating entity's unfunded actuarial accrued liability from
20.96% to an estimated 15.21% of covered payroll. It is the intent
of the legislature that the allocation under this subsection be
used to support student mental health, school safety, the educator
workforce, and academic interventions.
(a) As used in this subsection:
(i) "District library" means a district library established
under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL
397.171 to 397.196.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

399
(ii) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate
district, district library, or community college that is a
reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement
system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979,
1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to
the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the
applicable fiscal year.
Sec. 147b. (1) The MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve
fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid
fund.
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the MPSERS retirement obligation reform
reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of
the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund. The state
treasurer shall credit to the MPSERS retirement obligation reform
reserve fund interest and earnings from the MPSERS retirement
obligation reform reserve fund.
(3) Money available in the MPSERS retirement obligation reform
reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation.
(4) Money in the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve
fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the MPSERS
retirement obligation reform reserve fund and does not lapse lapses
to the state school aid fund or to the general fund. The department
of treasury is the administrator of the MPSERS retirement
obligation reform reserve fund for auditing purposes.
(5) For 2022-2023, $825,000,000.00 from the state school aid
fund is deposited into the MPSERS retirement obligation reform
reserve fund. It is the intent of the legislature that
$425,000,000.00 of the funds deposited under this subsection for
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

400
2022-2023 are used to offset costs associated with accelerating the
reduction of the payroll growth assumption for reporting units that
are not university reporting units until that rate is zero by
October 1, 2026.
Sec. 147c. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 an
amount not to exceed $1,536,500,000.00 and there is allocated for
2026-2027 an amount not to exceed $1,454,400,000.00 for payments to
districts and intermediate districts that are participating
entities of the Michigan public school employees' retirement
system. In addition, from the general fund money appropriated in
section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 an
amount not to exceed $300,000.00 for payments to district libraries
that are participating entities of the Michigan public school
employees' retirement system. All of the following apply to funding
under this subsection:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, for
2025-2026, the The amounts allocated under this subsection are
estimated to provide an average MPSERS rate cap per pupil amount
for districts of $1,100.00. , which represents an average increase
of $362.00 per pupil compared to the immediately preceding state
fiscal year.
(b) Payments made under this subsection are equal to the
difference between the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
contribution rate as calculated under section 41 of the public
school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341,
as calculated without taking into account the maximum employer rate
of 20.96% 15.21% included in section 41 of the public school
employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341, and the
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

401
maximum employer rate of 20.96% 15.21% included in section 41 of
the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300,
MCL 38.1341.
(c) The amount allocated to each participating entity under
this subsection is based on each participating entity's proportion
of the total covered payroll for the immediately preceding fiscal
year for the same type of participating entities. A participating
entity that receives funds under this subsection shall use the
funds solely for the purpose of retirement contributions as
specified in subdivision (d).
(d) Each participating entity receiving funds under this
subsection shall forward an amount equal to the amount allocated
under subdivision (c) to the retirement system in a form, manner,
and time frame determined by the retirement system.
(e) Funds allocated under this subsection should be considered
when comparing a district's growth in total state aid funding from
1 fiscal year to the next.
(f) By not later than December 20 of each fiscal year for
which funding is allocated under this subsection, the department
shall publish and post on its website an estimated MPSERS rate cap
per pupil for each district.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "District library" means a district library established
under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL
397.171 to 397.196.
(b) "MPSERS rate cap per pupil" means an amount equal to the
quotient of the district's payment under this section divided by
the district's pupils in membership.
(c) "Participating entity" means, except as otherwise provided
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

402
in this subdivision, a district, intermediate district, or district
library that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school
employees' retirement system under the public school employees
retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and
that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees'
retirement system for the applicable fiscal year.
(d) "Retirement system" means the Michigan public school
employees' retirement system under the public school employees
retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437.
Sec. 147e. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 an
amount not to exceed $71,600,000.00, and there is allocated for
2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $118,400,000.00 $116,500,000.00
and there is allocated for 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed
$136,200,000.00 for payments to participating entities.
(2) The payment to each participating entity under this
section is the sum of the amounts under this subsection as follows:
(a) An amount equal to the contributions made by a
participating entity for the additional contribution made to a
qualified participant's Tier 2 account in an amount equal to the
contribution made by the qualified participant not to exceed 3% of
the qualified participant's compensation as provided for under
section 131(6) of the public school employees retirement act of
1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1431.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2017, an amount equal to the
contributions made by a participating entity for a qualified
participant who is only a Tier 2 qualified participant under
section 81d of the public school employees retirement act of 1979,
1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1381d, not to exceed 4%, and, beginning
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

403
February 1, 2018, not to exceed 1%, of the qualified participant's
compensation.
(c) An amount equal to the increase in employer normal cost
contributions under section 41b(2) of the public school employees
retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341b, for a member
that was hired after February 1, 2018 and chose to participate in
Tier 1, compared to the employer normal cost contribution for a
member under section 41b(1) of the public school employees
retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341b.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Member" means that term as defined under the public
school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301
to 38.1437.
(b) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate
district, or community college that is a reporting unit of the
Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the
public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL
38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan
public school employees' retirement system for the applicable
fiscal year.
(c) "Qualified participant" means that term as defined under
section 124 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979,
1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1424.
Sec. 152a. (1) As required by the court in the consolidated
cases known as Adair v State of Michigan, 486 Mich 468 (2010), from
the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there
is allocated for 2025-2026 2026-2027 an amount not to exceed
$41,000,500.00 to be used solely for the purpose of paying
necessary costs related to the state-mandated collection,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

404
maintenance, and reporting of data to this state. From this
allocation, $3,000,000.00 is allocated for costs associated with
collecting data necessary to provide reporting to tribal
governments on the status of students affiliated with their
particular tribe and data necessary to determine student
participation in federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546
and participation in federal programs funded under the Johnson-
O'Malley Supplemental supplemental Indian Education Program
Modernization Act, education program modernization act, Public Law
115-404.
(2) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department
shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts in an
equal amount per pupil based on the total number of pupils in
membership in each district and intermediate district. The
department shall not make any adjustment to these payments after
the final installment payment under section 17b is made.
Sec. 152b. (1) From the general fund money appropriated under
section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed
$1,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 2026-2027 to reimburse actual costs
incurred by nonpublic schools in complying with a health, safety,
or welfare requirement mandated by a law or administrative rule of
this state.
(2) By January 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the
department shall publish a form for reporting actual costs incurred
by a nonpublic school in complying with a health, safety, or
welfare requirement mandated under state law containing each
health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated by a law or
administrative rule of this state applicable to a nonpublic school
and with a reference to each relevant provision of law or
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

405
administrative rule for the requirement. The form must be posted on
the department's website in electronic form.
(3) By June 30 of each applicable fiscal year, a nonpublic
school seeking reimbursement for actual costs incurred in complying
with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or
administrative rule of this state during each applicable school
year must submit a completed form described in subsection (2) to
the department. This section does not require a nonpublic school to
submit a form described in subsection (2). A nonpublic school is
not eligible for reimbursement under this section if the nonpublic
school does not submit the form described in subsection (2) in a
timely manner.
(4) By August 15 of each applicable fiscal year, the
department shall distribute funds to each nonpublic school that
submits a completed form described under subsection (2) in a timely
manner. The superintendent shall determine the amount of funds to
be paid to each nonpublic school in an amount that does not exceed
the nonpublic school's actual costs in complying with a health,
safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule
of this state. The superintendent shall calculate a nonpublic
school's actual cost in accordance with this section.
(5) If the funds allocated under this section are insufficient
to fully fund payments as otherwise calculated under this section,
the department shall distribute funds under this section on a
prorated or other equitable basis as determined by the
superintendent.
(6) The department may review the records of a nonpublic
school submitting a form described in subsection (2) only for the
limited purpose of verifying the nonpublic school's compliance with
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

406
this section. If a nonpublic school does not allow the department
to review records under this subsection, the nonpublic school is
not eligible for reimbursement under this section.
(7) The funds appropriated under this section are for purposes
that are incidental to teaching and the provision of educational
services to nonpublic school students; that are noninstructional in
nature; that do not constitute a primary function or element
necessary for a nonpublic school's existence, operation, and
survival; that do not involve or result in excessive religious
entanglement; and that are intended for the public purpose of
ensuring the health, safety, and welfare of the children in
nonpublic schools and to reimburse nonpublic schools for costs
described in this section.
(8) Funds allocated under this section are not intended to aid
or maintain any nonpublic school, support the attendance of any
student at a nonpublic school, employ any person at a nonpublic
school, support the attendance of any student at any location where
instruction is offered to a nonpublic school student, or support
the employment of any person at any location where instruction is
offered to a nonpublic school student.
(9) For purposes of this section, "actual cost" means the
hourly wage for the employee or employees performing a task or
tasks required to comply with a health, safety, or welfare
requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state
identified by the department under subsection (2) and is to be
calculated in accordance with the form published by the department
under subsection (2), which must include a detailed itemization of
costs. The nonpublic school shall not charge more than the hourly
wage of its lowest-paid employee capable of performing a specific
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

407
task regardless of whether that individual is available and
regardless of who actually performs a specific task. Labor costs
under this subsection must be estimated and charged in increments
of 15 minutes or more, with all partial time increments rounded
down. When calculating costs under subsection (4), fee components
must be itemized in a manner that expresses both the hourly wage
and the number of hours charged. The nonpublic school may not
charge any applicable labor charge amount to cover or partially
cover the cost of health or fringe benefits. A nonpublic school
shall not charge any overtime wages in the calculation of labor
costs.
(10) Training fees, inspection fees, and criminal background
check fees are considered actual costs in complying with a health,
safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule
of this state.
(11) The funds allocated under this section for 2025-2026
2026-2027 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended
funds for 2025-2026 2026-2027 are carried forward into 2026-2027.
2027-2028. The purpose of the work project is to continue to
reimburse nonpublic schools for actual costs incurred in complying
with a health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated by a law or
administrative rule of this state. The estimated completion date of
the work project is September 30, 2027.2028.
(12) The department shall reimburse nonpublic schools for
actual costs incurred in complying with health, safety, or welfare
requirements under a law or administrative rule of this state from
2017-2018 through 2022-2023 using work project funds or, if those
funds are insufficient to fund reimbursements under this
subsection, from the allocation under subsection (1).
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

408
Sec. 152c. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2026-2027 only
an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 to Marquette-Alger Regional
Educational Agency to develop statewide supports for the federal
tribal consultation requirements under the every student succeeds
act, Public Law 114-95.
(2) Marquette-Alger Regional Educational Agency shall use the
funds to support a collaboration that includes, but is not limited
to:
(a) Elected tribal leadership from federally recognized tribes
in Michigan.
(b) The Confederation of Michigan Tribal Education
Departments.
(c) School, district, and intermediate school district
leadership, including elected board members.
(d) Directors of programs impacted by the federal tribal
consultation requirements.
(e) The department's indigenous education initiative.
(3) The collaboration described in subsection (2) shall do
both of the following:
(a) Create, disseminate, and evaluate professional learning to
support the implementation of the federal tribal consultation
requirements.
(b) By not later than January 1, 2028, and January 1 of each
subsequent fiscal year, prepare a summary report that includes
measurable outcomes to evaluate the progress made in the
development of effective government-to-government relations. The
report described in this subdivision must be submitted to the house
and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the house
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

409
and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director.
(4) All of the following apply to professional learning
described in subsection (3)(a):
(a) The professional learning must include at least the
following:
(i) Identification of native students, including:
(A) Federal identification guidelines from the federal office
of management and budget under statistical policy directive number
15 for American Indian and Alaska Native students.
(B) Tribal affiliation data collection guidelines under MCL
388.1694a.
(C) Program participation data collection guidelines under MCL
388.1694a for federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and
the Johnson-O'Malley supplemental Indian education program
modernization act, Public Law 115-404.
(ii) Guidelines and rules related to data sharing from school
districts to federally recognized tribes as governed by the federal
education rights and privacy act, 20 USC 1232, 34 CFR Part 99; the
federal protection of pupil rights amendment, 20 USC 1232g, 34 CFR
Part 98; and section 1136 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1136.
(iii) The federal tribal consultation requirements under the
every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95.
(iv) Key elements of effective tribal consultation.
(b) The initial professional learning must be made available
to all administrators, staff, and board members in each local
educational agency, public school academy, and intermediate school
district by September 30, 2027, with additional resources released
at least annually during the course of the work project.
(5) The funds allocated under this section for 2026-2027 are a
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

410
work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2026-2027
are carried forward into 2027-2028. The purpose of the work project
is to create, disseminate, and evaluate statewide supports for
local education agencies, public school academies, and intermediate
school districts in meeting federal requirements for tribal
consultation. The estimated completion date of the work project is
September 30, 2031.
(6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
Sec. 163. (1) Except as otherwise provided in the revised
school code, the board of a district or intermediate district shall
not permit any of the following:
(a) An individual who is not appropriately placed under a
valid certificate, valid substitute permit, authorization, or
approval issued under rules promulgated by the department to teach
in an elementary or secondary school.
(b) An individual who does not satisfy the requirements of
section 1233 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1233, and rules
promulgated by the department to provide school counselor services
to pupils in an elementary or secondary school.
(b) (c) An individual who does not satisfy the requirements of
section 1246 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1246, and rules
promulgated by the department to be employed as a superintendent,
principal, or assistant principal, or as an individual whose
primary responsibility is to administer instructional programs in
an elementary or secondary school or in a district or intermediate
district, unless the individual is working under a valid substitute
permit issued under rules promulgated by the department.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

411
(2) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (4) or (5),
a district or intermediate district employing an individual in
violation of this section must have deducted an amount equal to 50%
of the amount paid to the individual for the period of employment
that is in violation of this section. Except as otherwise provided
under subsection (4) or (5), if a district or intermediate district
is notified by the department that it is employing an individual in
violation of this section and it continues to employ the individual
in violation of this section 10 business days after receiving the
notification, both of the following apply:if a district or
intermediate district employs an individual in violation of this
section, all of the following apply:
(a) The district or intermediate district must have deducted
an amount equal to 50% of the amount paid to the individual for the
period of employment that is in violation of this section that
occurs before the expiration of the 10-day period described in this
subsection.
(b) The district or intermediate district must have deducted
an amount equal to 100% of the amount paid to the individual for
the period of employment that is in violation of this section that
occurs after the 10-day period described in this subsection.
(a) The district or intermediate district shall, not later 10
school days after receiving notice of the violation, rectify the
noncompliance.
(b) For the first violation within a 3-year period, the
district or intermediate district must receive a letter from the
superintendent of public instruction or superintendent of public
instruction's designee regarding the violation and potential
penalties as a result of further violations.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

412
(c) For the second violation within a 3-year period, the
district or intermediate district must receive a letter with the
information described in subdivision (b) and must have deducted an
amount equal to 25% of the amount paid to the individual for the
period of employment that is in violation of this section.
(d) For the third violation within a 3-year period, the
district or intermediate district must receive a letter with the
information described in subdivision (b) and must have deducted an
amount equal to 50% of the amount paid to the individual for the
period of employment that is in violation of this section.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2), if both of the following
apply:
(a) If a district or intermediate district on behalf of an
individual or an individual successfully completes the credential
application process through the department, including the
submission of an appropriate application, required fees, and all
required supporting documentation, the individual's employment with
the district or intermediate district after this completion is not
considered a period of employment that is in violation of this
section.
(b) If a district or intermediate district has no violations
under this section for a period of 3 years after a violation under
subsection (1), the district or intermediate district is subject
only to the penalties described in subsection (2)(a) upon the next
violation.
(4) A deduction under subsection (2) for employment in
violation of this section may be less than the amount required
under that subsection if the superintendent of public instruction
finds that the district or intermediate district was hindered in
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

413
its ability to obtain a substitute credential to enable the
district or intermediate district to employ the individual in
compliance with this section due to unusual and extenuating
circumstances resulting from conditions not within the control of
school authorities, including, but not limited to, a natural
disaster, death or serious illness of the individual or another
employee, an emergency school closure, fraud or other intentional
wrongdoing of the individual or another employee, or an emergency
health condition as defined by city, county, or state health
authorities.
(5) There must be no deduction under subsection (2) for
employment of an individual if there is a membership adjustment
under section 15 based on the same employment.This section provides
the sole and exclusive penalty for a violation of subsection (1). A
district or intermediate district must not also be subject to a
membership adjustment under section 15 for a violation of
subsection (1).
(6) If a school official is notified by the department that
the school official is employing an individual in violation of this
section and knowingly continues to employ that individual for a
period longer than 10 school days, the school official is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of $1,500.00 for each incident.
This penalty is in addition to all other financial penalties
otherwise specified in this article.
Sec. 164l. (1) Not later than 30 days after the enactment of
the any amendatory act that added to this section, article, the
legislature house and senate shall provide to the responsible
entity and the state budget director a list of legislatively
directed spending items, which may be referred to in this section
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

414
as grants or direct appropriation grants, funded under the
amendatory act that added this section consistent with house or
senate rules and this section. as defined in sections 364 and 364a
of the management and budget act, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a, that
are funded by the amendatory act. The list must include all
information and documents pertaining to the funded items as
publicly disclosed in accordance with house or senate rules and
this section.under sections 364 and 364a of the management and
budget act, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a.
(2) Notwithstanding any other conditions or requirements for
direct appropriation grants, the responsible entity shall perform,
at a minimum, at least all of the following activities to
administer the grants described in subsection (1):
(a) Establish a process to review, complete, and execute a
grant agreement with a grant recipient. The responsible entity
shall not execute a grant agreement unless all necessary
documentation has been submitted and reviewed.
(b) Verify to the extent possible that a grant recipient is a
not-for-profit entity and will use funds as publicly disclosed and
for a public purpose that serves the economic prosperity, health,
safety, or general welfare of the residents of this state.
(c) Review and verify all necessary information to ensure the
grant recipient is reasonably able to execute the grant agreement,
perform its fiduciary duty, and comply with all applicable state
and federal statutes. The responsible entity may deduct the cost of
background checks and any other efforts performed as part of this
verification from the amount of the designated grant award.
(d) Disburse the grant money per the grant disbursement
schedule in the executed grant agreement on a reimbursement basis
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

415
after the grantee has provided sufficient documentation, as
determined by the responsible entity, to verify that expenditures
were made in accordance with the project purpose.
(e) If the state budget director determines that information
provided by the grantee does not meet the disclosure requirements,
that the grant will be used to pay a tax lien, delinquent tax, or
other obligation owed to this state, or that the grant will create
a conflict of interest, the responsible entity shall not release
the grant money to the grantee. Money that is not released under
this subdivision lapses at the end of the fiscal year. There is not
a conflict of interest if the sponsoring legislator certifies that
the sponsoring legislator's immediate family members, legislative
staff members that have worked for the sponsoring legislator within
the past 2 years, and the sponsoring legislator do not have a
direct or indirect pecuniary interest in the legislatively directed
spending item.
(3) An executed grant agreement under this section between the
responsible entity and a grant recipient must include at least all
of the following:
(a) All necessary identifying information for the grant
recipient, including any tax and financial information necessary
for the responsible entity to administer grant money under this
section.
(b) A description of the project for which the grant money
will be expended, including tentative timelines and the estimated
budget. Project budget must include how all grant money will be
used and must indicate if any grant money will be provided to a
third party or subrecipient. The responsible entity shall not
reimburse expenditures that are outside of the project purpose, as
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

416
stated in the executed grant agreement, from appropriations under
the amendatory act that added this section. The grantee shall
return to the state treasury any interest in excess of $1,000.00
earned on the grant money while unexpended and in possession of the
grantee.
(c) Unless otherwise specified in the responsible entity's
policy, a requirement that funds appropriated for the grants
described in subsection (1) may be used only for expenditures that
occur on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that
added this section.
(d) A requirement for reporting by the grant recipient to the
responsible entity and the legislative sponsor that provides the
status of the project and an accounting of all money expended by
the grant recipient, as determined by the responsible entity.
(e) A clawback provision that allows the department of
treasury to recoup or otherwise collect any grant money that is
declined, unspent, or otherwise misused.
(f) The documents publicly disclosed under subsection (1).
(4) If appropriate to improve the administration or oversight
of a grant described in subsection (1), the responsible entity may
adopt a memorandum of understanding with another state department
to perform the required duties under this section.
(5) A grant recipient shall respond to all reasonable
information requests from the responsible entity related to grant
expenditures and retain grant records for not less than 7 years,
and the grant may be subject to monitoring, site visits, and audit
as determined by the responsible entity. The grant agreement
required under this section must include signed assurance by the
chief executive officer or other executive officer of the grant
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

417
recipient authorized to bind the grant recipient that the
requirements of this subsection will be met.
(6) The grant recipient shall expend all grant money awarded
and complete all projects not later than September 30, 2030. If, at
that time, any unexpended money remains, the grant recipient shall
return that money to the state treasury. If a grant recipient does
not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not
later than June 1, 2026, the responsible entity shall return money
associated with the grant to the state treasury.
(7) Any grant money that is awarded to a responsible entity is
appropriated in that responsible entity for the purpose of the
intended grant.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9), beginning
March 15 of the current fiscal year, the responsible entity shall
post a report in a publicly accessible location on its website. The
report must list the grant recipient, project purpose, and location
of the project for each grant described in subsection (1), the
status of money allocated and disbursed under the grant agreement,
and the legislative sponsor, if applicable. The responsible entity
shall update the report and post the updated report in a publicly
accessible location on its website not later than June 15 of the
current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of the
current fiscal year. The responsible entity shall include in the
report the most comprehensive information the responsible entity
has available at the time of posting for grants awarded.
(9) If the state budget office determines that it is more
efficient for the state budget office to compile all affected
responsible entities' information and post a report of the compiled
information rather than the report required under subsection (8)
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

418
being posted by individual responsible entities, the state budget
office may compile that information across all affected responsible
entities and other state departments and post the compiled report
and any updates on the same time schedule as identified in
subsection (8).
(10) If the responsible entity reasonably determines that the
money allocated for an executed grant agreement under this section
was misused or that use of the money was misrepresented by the
grant recipient, the responsible entity shall not award any
additional funds under the executed grant agreement and shall refer
the grant for review following internal audit protocols, which may
include referral for criminal investigation.
(11) As used in this section, "responsible entity" means the
department, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, a district, an intermediate district, or other person
that administers a grant under this article.
(2) In accordance with section 364 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Enacting section 1. In accordance with section 30 of article
IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending on
school aid under article I of the state school aid act of 1979,
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

419
1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1772, as amended by 2025 PA 15 and
this amendatory act, from state sources for fiscal year 2025-2026
is estimated at $18,704,213,800.00 and state appropriations for
school aid to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year
2025-2026 are estimated at $17,433,304,100.00. In accordance with
section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total
state spending on school aid under article I of the state school
aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1772, as amended
by this amendatory act, from state sources for fiscal year 2026-
2027 is estimated at $19,606,320,800.00 and state appropriations
for school aid to be paid to local units of government for fiscal
year 2026-2027 are estimated at $18,102,118,900.00.
Enacting section 2. Sections 11y, 11bb, 25g, 27k, 41, 41b, 55,
61d, 97k, 99aa, 99ee, 99mm, 107a, 147g, and 164k of the state
school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1611y, 388.1611bb,
388.1625g, 388.1627k, 388.1641, 388.1641b, 388.1655, 388.1661d,
388.1697k, 388.1699aa, 388.1699ee, 388.1699mm, 388.1707a,
388.1747g, and 388.1764k are repealed.
Enacting section 3. (1) Sections 11, 22a, 22b, 26a, 26d, 27b,
51a, 51c, 51e, 56, 62, 104, 147a, and 147e of the state school aid
act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1611, 388.1622a, 388.1622b,
388.1626a, 388.1626d, 388.1627b, 388.1651a, 388.1651c, 388.1651e,
388.1656, 388.1662, 388.1704, 388.1747a, and 388.1747e, as amended
by this amendatory act, if granted immediate effect pursuant to
section 27 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963, take
effect on enactment of this amendatory act.
(2) Except as otherwise provided for those sections listed in
subsection (1), the remaining sections of this amendatory act take
effect October 1, 2026.
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma

420
Enacting section 4. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 903 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
CRM S06121'26 (S-1) 14suma